The Chronicles of Blackwater is a sweeping historical and speculative saga that traces the evolution of human civilization from the earliest pastoral societies to the dawn of the Mother AI era in the galaxy. Beginning in the Hindu Kush mountains, the story follows the migration of nomadic tribes, the domestication of animals, and the emergence of early trade networks that would lay the foundations for complex societies.

This trilogy—Domestication of Sheep, Taming of Horses, and Splitting the Sky—interweaves the rise and fall of pastoral empires with poetic narrative structures inspired by oral traditions. Humanity’s survival, expansion, and adaptation are explored through the lens of population dynamics, resource competition, and cultural evolution, emphasizing the relentless interplay between mobility and settlement.

The Chronicles also explore the profound co-evolution between humans and animals, the transmission of genes and culture across continents, and the subtle forces of power and strategy that shape civilizations. Ultimately, it points toward a future where intelligence transcends biology, envisioning the emergence of Mother AI as a natural law-like authority guiding galactic civilizations.




**The Chronicle of Black Waters · Prologue**

Before Black Waters knew the division of day and night,
the world was submerged in chaos.
Wolves and men watched one another,
the steppe had no name, and rivers no return.

The forebears set out from the Hindu Kush.
In the valleys, flocks of sheep were called and tamed.
Fire lit the night,
and the eyes of dogs shimmered by the flame.
The wolves withdrew, but left their offspring—
the first allies of humankind,
guardians of the herds, guardians of the fire.

Thus the tribes multiplied.
Population became order, bloodline became law.
They no longer walked alone,
but took herds as their city, dogs as their walls.
In motion they survived,
in motion they merged.

The road led northward,
yet first it rose to the highlands.
That was Kunlun,
mountains like halls, glaciers like jade steps.
The ancestors said:
“Gods dwell in Kunlun, immortals emerge from Kunlun.”
For on the summit of the plateau,
grass met snow, beasts lived with men.
There, strength became law, and law became song.

From Kunlun they descended,
rushing toward the Tianshan, toward the Altai,
toward the endlessness of the Yellow River and the steppe.
Gold and jade were drawn from the mountains,
becoming the first covenant that would never decay.
Singers praised them in long epics,
lingering like the howl of wolves—
a single chant could last for moons,
a single voice could echo through millennia.

Thus opens *The Chronicle of Black Waters*:
to record the pact between men and wolves,
to mark Kunlun as the summit of order,
to remember the wandering tribes,
who wove eternity with song and with blood.






**The Chronicle of Black Waters · Taming Sheep**

**Chapter One: Mirage of the Oasis**

Night winds swept across the dunes, carrying hot dust and the distant scent of dry grass.
The exiled tribe moved slowly along shadows stretched by the moonlight—men bent to guide the flocks, women cradled crying children, elders struggled under heavy baskets. Each step felt like treading upon their own fate; sand rolled beneath their feet, the wind whispered in their ears: *Without water, there is no tomorrow.*

A few days ago, they still held fields and granaries in an oasis on the Iranian plateau, but the population had grown too large, resources too scarce. The tribal elders, invoking the authority of the shamans, declared:
*"Exiles, you must leave."*
No one questioned it, for to resist meant dying in the desert or seeking a miraculous oasis. The cost of failure had never been so stark.

Children pointed fearfully toward a faint, flickering light in the distance—perhaps the first sign of an oasis, perhaps moonlight reflecting on water, or perhaps a mirage. The men’s eyes gleamed in the darkness; they knew that ahead lay water, food, and the chance of rebirth—or traps, or even death.

The sheep lowed softly, their hooves sinking into the scorching sand, while sleepless dogs sniffed the path ahead. They were the exiles’ eyes, shields, and swords, protecting the tribe in the desolation. In that moment, the symbiosis between dogs and humans began to take root—they were no longer mere tamed animals but the key to the tribe’s survival.

In the distance, the wind traced the dunes’ contours, like the earth’s veins whispering:
*"The weak are driven away, the strong shall be reborn."*

The oasis was both mirage and the only hope.
In this extreme landscape, civilization learned for the first time:
*Survival is not only about struggle; it is the wisdom of migration.*







The female chieftain stood atop a jutting boulder in the Hindu Kush, gazing over the vast, slightly desolate highland pastures below. Wind howled through the valleys, stirring scattered dust and carrying the distant howls of wolves. Beside her, the elder shaman struck the rock with a staff carved from bone, producing a crisp echo, as if awakening the slumbering land.

“Here,” the chieftain spoke, “there seems to be enough pasture for our flocks to survive, but the water is hidden too deeply. Whether we live or die depends on finding rivers and springs first.”

The shaman nodded, his gaze sweeping across the distant valleys. Slowly he spoke, “Since the Pangu Continent split along the East African Rift, all life has followed the laws of nature. When humans first arose, gathering and hunting sustained the tribe, but numbers were limited and expansion constrained. The Nile wetlands were among the earliest attempts at settlement. Fertile soil, slow-flowing water, abundant plants, fish, and game—here, populations could exceed the limits of mere foraging.”

He paused, as if traversing time itself, seeing wheat and barley growing along the riverbanks, tamed sheep and goats leisurely grazing under the sun.

“But,” the shaman continued, “carrying capacity is limited. Once the population grows, resources become scarce, and competition between tribes ensues. Weak tribes, unable to claim water and fertile land, are forced to leave, embarking on paths of exile. Expulsion and exile are both laws of nature and the earliest form of social order. Only in exile do humans learn to migrate and explore unknown lands.”

The chieftain looked toward the distance, mountain winds tousling her hair. She murmured, “Then we must send scouts to find water, assess whether this highland can sustain us, and check for other tribes.”

The shaman nodded. “As ancient tales tell, tribal migrations were never random. From the Nile wetlands to the Arabian Peninsula oases, to the Iranian plateau, each move was a response to environmental conditions and population pressures. Tribes forced from their oases split into three paths: one eastward, reaching the Hindu Kush; one westward, crossing northwestern Iran into distant Europe; and one over the Caucasus, toward the plains west of the Urals.”

The chieftain’s gaze hardened. “We will settle here. Water to the east must be found first—our hope for survival depends on it. Once the other two groups succeed, we will send people to meet them.”

The shaman raised his staff, pointing to the distance. “Sparse vegetation and exposed rocks show how hidden the water is, yet this land holds life. From the African cradle, humans advanced through gathering, hunting, wetland farming, and oasis civilizations. Every migration carried the wisdom of survival and order. Now, we stand at a new beginning. History will continue to be written on these highland pastures.”

The wind swept again, carrying the distant howls of wolves and the echoes of the valleys. The chieftain and the shaman shared a knowing glance, fully aware that the fate of their tribe would unfold on this desolate and mysterious land.








The desert sun scorched every grain of sand, and wind whipped fine particles into the air, slicing across the travelers’ skin like countless tiny blades. The female chieftain sat in the shadow of a rock, while beside her the shaman struck his bone staff, the sound echoing through the dry air.

“These deserts,” the shaman spoke, “were once the final destination of those exiled from the Nile peoples. Their carrying capacity is far less than the wetlands; water is sparse and hidden, and oases scatter like stars across the sky—rare and irregular.”

He pointed to the distance. “One group after another was driven here. What they sought was not the desert itself, but warm wetlands that could replicate the Nile model. Yet such oases hardly exist.”

In the desert, camels plodded forward, bearing simple packs and the exiles themselves. They were humanity’s instruments of migration, capable of carrying hungry, thirsty people across hundreds of kilometers of waterless terrain.

“With camels, slow migration becomes possible,” the shaman murmured. “The tribe need not cling to a single oasis; they can cross the desert in search of new places to survive. Yet even so, the desert is merciless. Conflict arises wherever population growth meets limited resources. Oasis civilizations are fragile; imbalance leads swiftly to famine or civil strife.”

The chieftain remained silent, knowing that her tribe’s fate still hung between the shifting winds and sands.

—From a higher perspective, the AI’s voice slowly echoed:

> Among those exiled from the Nile Valley, only a few survived the desert crossing. Another group traveled south along the coastline, some reaching India and South Asia. During migration, they split further:
> One branch penetrated the Central Plains, exterminating native peoples, seizing fertile lands, and establishing new rule;
> The other continued across the seas, expanding toward unknown Pacific islands, opening a new age of navigation.
> All of this was the inevitable result of population pressure, environmental constraints, and survival instinct—not chance.

The wind rose again, and grains of sand sparkled in the sunlight. The chieftain lifted her eyes to the distant specks of oasis, which might be the tribe’s new home—or the beginning of another trial for survival.

A gleam of wisdom shone in the shaman’s eyes. “Every generation has sought wetlands to replicate the Nile model, yet never succeeded. Because of this, exiles learned to migrate, to explore, and to endure with strategy.”

The camels moved forward slowly, carrying humanity’s hopes and fears, treading the unknown path across the desert.







The tribe at last set foot upon the Hindu Kush. Sheep grazed on the new pasture, their gentle chewing breaking the mountain silence. From a high rock, the female chieftain watched as children trampled the grass in play, while adults surveyed the terrain. Hunting and scouting parties moved cautiously along the valley, searching for water and potential threats. In the distance, gray wolves’ eyes glimmered with hunger, waiting for their chance to hunt.

The chieftain showed no fear. With a steady gesture, she directed the tribe to follow the plan: gather wood for fire, slaughter a sheep for the evening meal, and assign the night watch. The flames lit their faces, driving back the cold and soothing anxious hearts. She sat beside the elder shaman, and together they began to reflect on the limits of oasis civilizations.

The shaman spoke slowly: “The Nile wetlands, the Arabian Peninsula, the Iranian plateau… though rich in resources, all carried strict limits on population. Great tribes cannot rely on the oasis model for long. Weaker tribes are always driven out—and to enter the desert is almost certain death.”

The chieftain nodded. “Then tell me, why did you divide the tribe into three branches—one eastward to the Hindu Kush, one northward to the steppe—but never send any south along the coast toward India?”

The shaman pointed toward the ridges and terrain beyond. “Though the sea brings moisture, the aridity of the Balochistan desert and the absence of rivers prevent oases from forming. Experience teaches us: oases emerge only where sea and mountains converge. Thus, we never risk sending people into the desert.”

He paused, then added: “This is the law of *environment–population–migration*. Only by grasping it can we lay the foundation for a great tribe’s survival here in the Hindu Kush.”

As they spoke, a gaunt gray wolf crept toward the fire. Starving, it defied the alpha’s command and inched closer to the humans. The chieftain tossed a sheep bone still clinging with scraps of meat. The wolf stopped, lowered its head, and gnawed. It did not return to the pack. Instead, it lingered—sometimes near, sometimes far—marking the beginning of a shared destiny between man and wolf.

In the glow of the fire, the shaman went on recounting the histories of oasis civilizations and the lessons of tribal migration, while the wolf stood silently at the edge of the campfire’s light—guardian and omen, herald of a new story where humankind, nature, and wolves would begin to live side by side.










### **Chapter Two: The Forced Exile**

**1. The Eastern Route → The Hindu Kush Mountains**

From the height of an eagle’s gaze, time no longer flowed with the rising sun and setting moon, but surged like a sudden flood through the valleys—scouring the tribe’s existence inch by inch. The turning of seasons seemed compressed: spring grass had barely begun to green before the dryness of summer arrived; an infant’s cry became, in a heartbeat, the footfalls of a youth chasing sheep across the slopes; wrinkles spread across the elders’ foreheads overnight, cracking like ice on a frozen river.

The tribe left behind the moist embrace of oases and entered the semi-arid highlands of the Hindu Kush. Here, the land was neither as fertile as river valleys, nor as hopeless as the desert—an ambiguous in-between: sparse grasses, uncertain waters, yet just enough to sustain the flocks.

Wolves had long claimed this terrain. Their sharp silhouettes flashed between rocks and moonlight, their eyes reflecting the panic of sheep. The first encounters were blood-soaked: sheep dragged into the dark, tribesmen forced to guard through the night, bows and stone spears clashing with the glint of wolf fangs by firelight. Skinned hides lay beside bloody traces where pawprints crossed at dawn.

Yet conflict was not eternal. Wolves discovered that the embers of human fire drove off deadlier predators; humans came to realize that a wolf’s howl foretold the approach of prowling hunters in the night. When the sheep lay sleeping in the glow of fire, wolf-shadows lingered at the edge—no longer only for the kill.

As years unfolded, man and wolf shifted from enmity into a blurred interdependence—foes and sentinels both; predators and companions at once. In the elders’ tales began to spread the saying of “the Twin Eyes of the Mountain Spirit”—one belonging to human caution, the other to lupine sharpness.

Thus, the tribe found its footing in the Hindu Kush. The footsteps of exiles pressed heavily into the valleys, yet in their weight lay the path to a deeper future.







**2. Westward Route → The Cold and Damp Lands of Europe**

From the eagle’s vantage, time rose and fell like the tide—days and seasons compressed into the span of a single breath. The exiled clans, pressing westward, drifted like driftwood carried from a river’s mouth, gradually swallowed by strange new lands.

They crossed barren plains and arrived at a land of chill and damp. The soil here sank into endless mire; grasses grew thick, yet no seeds fit for cultivation could be tamed. Spring rains poured down, summers were fleeting, autumn frosts struck suddenly, and winters buried the earth under crushing snow. Attempts at farming failed one after another: grains rotted in sodden ground, seedlings withered in the long, frozen nights.

Even the flocks faltered. The grasses were wet and meager, unlike the lush meadows of mountain valleys. Marshes trapped their hooves; soaked wool and mud-borne sickness spread among the sheep. Fires sputtered against the damp, unable to dry their garments. The cold seeped into the bone, eroding the will of the people.

Death came in succession. Infants’ cries were sharp yet short-lived in the icy dark. Mothers’ milk dried away. Hunters returned with game too scarce to sustain the clan. Elders’ whispers curled into mist above the fires, but no answer to survival could be found.

At last, many clans abandoned the effort. They turned their backs on the damp west, retracing their steps eastward toward the Hindu Kush. Those who returned bore dim eyes, yet they carried with them an unshakable truth:

**The wet, cold lands were no new Nile. They could not sustain a great tribe.**

From the heights, the eagle beheld their paths converging like rivers into mountains. Scattered streams of humanity flowing back together, gathering in the valleys of the Hindu Kush—planting the seeds of a future convergence.







**3. Northward Route → The Ural Steppes**

The eagle’s wings swept over endless plains, waves of grass stretching to the horizon. The tribes migrating northward began with high hopes: vast lands, abundant water and pasture, seemingly enough to sustain hundreds of clans.

Yet the vastness was an illusion. There was no black soil accumulated in river valleys, no stable water from moist mountains, and no self-sustaining oases. The steppes’ seasons were extreme: grasses grew wildly in summer but withered in the long, harsh winters. The sheep could thrive briefly, but when winter came, the pastures turned to gray-brown dead fluff, and hunger consumed the flocks faster than the wolves.

The tribe attempted to replicate oasis-style farming—but in vain. The soil was thin, moisture escaped quickly, and seeds sown under sun and storm withered and died. The repeated failures drove home a harsh truth: this vast land could never become a second Nile.

As death and famine struck in succession, the tribes were forced to retreat south. They dragged behind them battered carts and emaciated animals, crossing the grasslands and bending again toward the southern side of the Caucasus Mountains. There, messengers from the Hindu Kush relayed the direction of the fires, assuring them that in the eastern mountains, water, pasture, and life still awaited.

Thus, the scattered returnees, like seeds blown by wind and gathered by water, converged upon those mountains.






**The First Year of the Blackwater Era**

They came from the Nile wetlands,
carrying grains, carrying the songs of their ancestors,
believing that oases would reappear deep within the desert.
Yet time and again they stepped into deathlands,
and at the end of sand and salt,
they saw their kin turn into white bones and dust.

They came from the northern plains,
gazing at the endless waves of grass,
believing that vastness meant abundance.
But they did not know the cold of winter
ripped the flocks faster than a hundred wolves.
Seeds they sowed were stolen by the raging wind,
like promises scattered across the wilderness.

They came from the west,
sowing between mud and frost,
yet reaped only hunger and despair.
Footprints vanished from the frozen soil,
and clans dissolved in tears and famine.

—And so they returned.
Returning to the oases of Arabia,
returning to the plateaus of Iran,
only to find water scarce, capacity limited.
Narrow wells could not hold the overflowing clans.
They were refused, driven out,
forced to press onward,
under the shadows of mountains,
their eyes fixed on the highlands where snow and black soil coexisted.

The Hindu Kush—
the boundary of stone and fire,
the battlefield of wolves and sheep.

There,
wolves prowled,
yet one hungry gray shadow
lowered its head beside the fire,
accepting the bone cast by human hands.
From that moment, the covenant between man and dog
was forged amid firelight and wilderness.

There,
the sheep began to graze and migrate,
spring following green grass, summer climbing high slopes,
autumn returning to the valleys, winter guarding the foothills.
The flocks grew ever larger,
the shepherd’s flute flowed like rivers,
carrying hope across the pastures.

There,
the tribes no longer perished one by one,
but gathered together.
Copper veins lay bare in the mountains,
fires and hammer strikes roared through the night,
spearheads sharp, armor shining—
as if a second sun rose over the ridges.

Food stores gradually filled,
warriors’ arms grew strong,
the shaman’s songs echoed farther,
cradles swayed more often.
Marriage wove bloodlines together,
language blended the clans.
Here—the illusion of oases
collapsed completely,
and a new law of nomadism began to be written.

And so they said:
**“The Blackwater Era begins—its first year.”**

They gazed at the snow-capped mountains,
they looked down upon the Blackwater,
remembering the pain of exile,
and the green glimmer in the eyes of wolves.

And at this moment,
the plains, mountains, canyons, and valleys
were giving birth to a new civilization,
whose roots were not in oases,
but in migration and herding.
Its fire was not the blazing sun,
but the hammering of copper and iron.

**This is the beginning of Blackwater.**






### **Chapter Three: The Covenant of Wolves and Fire**

The Hindu Kush Mountains rose and fell in undulating waves, peaks stretching continuously, ranging from four to seven thousand meters above sea level. In the valleys, gentle slopes alternated with towering peaks, forming natural terraced pastures. During spring and summer, melting snow fed trickling streams, while the dark Blackwater flowed slowly and cold, carrying rich humus that nourished the fertile grasslands along its banks.

On the pastures, sheep grazed on tender new grass, followed closely by cattle, whose leftover stems returned nutrients to the soil. Herding dogs patrolled the periphery of the flocks, alert to gray wolves lurking on distant summits. Agile and silent, the wolves moved across rocks and meadows, occasionally letting out low growls, warning the tribe: this land was not only a human dwelling, but also a hunting ground coveted by wolves.

The climate was unpredictable: morning fog shrouded the valleys, nights were pierced by biting winds. Yet the highlands’ daily temperature swings and seasonal pastures made rotational grazing possible. The tribe learned to move their sheep across different altitudes, following the cycles of pasture renewal; the distribution of water sources and the flow of the Blackwater together shaped the rhythm of the grazing ecosystem. In these mountains, humans, sheep, cattle, and dogs formed a dynamic ecological network, each adapting to and balancing the others, gradually nurturing the nascent nomadic civilization of the Hindu Kush.

On the highlands of the Hindu Kush, the dogs were no longer mere companions—they became guardians of the flocks, “living sheep pens.” They circled the flocks, keenly detecting gray wolves hidden on the slopes, issuing low warning growls or quickly intercepting intruding predators.

The female chief and the shaman carefully observed their behavior: which breeds were brave, which cautious; which acted alone, which excelled in cooperation. They realized that the dogs not only protected the flocks but could influence the sheep’s movement patterns, allowing efficient rotational grazing between valleys and slopes.

Based on these observations, the tribe gradually established livestock–canine symbiosis rules: dogs were granted certain rights to food—their share included innards and bones; humans had to cook the edible portions before feeding the dogs, preventing the pack from turning feral and attacking humans or other dogs out of hunger. Through this system, humans and dogs built trust and collaboration, laying the foundation for future rotational grazing and large-scale pastoralism.






The tribe gradually mastered the patterns of elevation in the mountains, rotating their flocks along valleys and slopes: in spring, they descended to the river valleys to graze on fresh tender grass; in summer, they climbed to higher grounds to follow the newly grown pastures; in autumn, they returned to mid-altitude slopes to supplement with dry grass; and in winter, they sheltered in the relatively warmer lower valleys.

The shaman and the tribe members jointly recorded migration routes, pasture growth cycles, and water source locations, creating an ecological map combining oral memory with symbolic markings. This rotational grazing method kept the pastures in optimal feeding condition, allowed the soil to recover, and ensured sustainable use of mountain resources.

As the rotational grazing system became stable, the number of sheep gradually increased, enriching the tribe’s food supply. The tribe’s population carrying capacity improved, allowing more members to survive and reproduce, laying the groundwork for the great consolidation of the Hindu Kush tribes and the rise of nomadic civilization.

Tribal elders convened councils of female leaders to determine meat distribution rules: dogs were given priority for animal innards and bones, while humans received cooked meat. This allocation respected the dogs’ food rights and prevented them from turning excessively aggressive toward other tribe members out of hunger.

During daily grazing and hunting, the tribe trained the wolf packs through timed feeding and behavioral guidance, teaching them to forage near the fire rather than attack proactively. Over time, these gray wolves gradually “caninized,” becoming indispensable partners in the pastoral teams.

This system not only strengthened the human–dog symbiosis but also laid the foundation for expanded rotational grazing and large-scale tribal consolidation, making the nomadic civilization of the Hindu Kush more stable and sustainable.

Gray wolves began foraging near the fires, approaching humans without hostility. Initially considered coincidental, the tribe soon realized that these wolves could drive away unfamiliar invading packs at critical moments, protecting the sheep and the tribe.

The female chief and the shaman recognized that, if guided properly, this behavior could form a stable symbiotic relationship. Selective domestication began: controlling feeding, defining fixed boundaries around the fire, and observing social and territorial behaviors of the wolves.

This process of wolf–dog integration not only altered the ecological landscape but also shaped tribal culture: wolves were revered as mountain guardians, she-wolves symbolized the tribe’s matriarch, and gradually, they became part of the tribe’s mythology and daily rituals, reinforcing both the organizational structure and spiritual beliefs of the nomadic society.





**“The Blackwater Era: Song of the She-Wolf”**

Morning light first appears along the ridges; the Blackwater flows slowly,
Sheep tread on dew, grass tips glinting silver.
The fire crackles, smoke rising,
The female chief stands upon a rock, the shaman murmurs.

A gray shadow moves quietly, wolf eyes flashing green,
Driven by hunger, yet it does not attack.
It circles the fire, sniffing the scent of humans,
For the first time coexisting, destinies quietly entwined.

“Mother wolf, guard my people, watch over our mountains,
Teach my descendants to learn your wisdom and courage.”
The council sits in a circle, murmuring through the smoke,
Meat and bones are distributed, the first law established:
The wolf receives innards and bones, humans receive cooked meat,
A covenant of coexistence, etched into the valley.

The night wind howls, wolf shadows multiply,
Firelight reveals the round, flickering eyes of young wolves.
The shaman chants softly, ancient symbols crystallize:
Fire — source of life,
Wolf — guardian spirit,
Council — emblem of wisdom,
Ritual — mark of order.

As years flow, the valley echoes:
The she-wolf raises her young, teaching humans diligence and courage,
Stories passed by word of mouth, totems awaken minds,
Tribal culture takes root,
Wolf and human, bloodline and spirit dance together.









### **Chapter Four: The Complement of Sheep and Cattle**

In the early morning of the Hindu Kush mountains, a thin mist still clung to the valleys, dew glinting on the grass tips. The female chief, Nuwa, stood atop a high rock, her gaze sweeping over the sheep and cattle grazing on the slopes. The sheep moved like a white wave, nibbling only the tender grass within reach; the cattle were silent and steady, lowering their heads to eat the taller, tougher grass that sheep could not reach, transforming it into their own nourishment.

Nuwa turned to the shaman beside her, a thoughtful frown between her brows: “Shaman, although our sheep are many, each patch of grass seems covered with short vegetation, offering limited food throughout the year. With population growth already showing its pressure, can seasonal grazing still sustain us?”

The shaman lightly stroked his beard, eyes tracing the layered pastures across the valley: “Nuwa, the pastures are limited. Sheep only eat the low, tender grass, so their utilization is naturally restricted. The cattle appear and fill this ecological gap. They eat higher, tougher grass than sheep, which significantly improves the overall efficiency of pasture use.”

Nuwa crouched, her fingers brushing the soil pressed by cattle hooves: “But the cattle are large and strong, and the dog packs cannot fully herd or protect them. If they roam freely or feed at will, our grazing order will be disrupted. Will we lose control of the herd?”

The shaman nodded, eyes fixed on the cattle grazing in the distance: “Exactly. The tribe now faces a new challenge. Cattle are the key to ecological complementarity, but they also require regulation: we must study how to guide their behavior to coordinate coexistence with the sheep and dogs.”

Nuwa slowly stood, her voice firm: “Then we must act. We cannot rely solely on natural adaptation; we must establish new rotational grazing plans and food distribution systems, so sheep, cattle, and dogs each get their share, allowing the pasture ecosystem to support a larger population.”

The mountain wind swept through, rustling the grass as if echoing her words. Nuwa and the shaman exchanged a glance, a clear plan already forming in their minds: ecological complementarity was only the beginning; next, humans, dogs, sheep, and cattle must form a true cooperative network across the mountains.







Nuwa stood on the slope, bathed in the slanting morning light, gazing at the snow-capped peaks of the Tibetan Plateau in the distance. The wind swept through the thin mist and rustled the grass, as if reminding her of the challenges that lay ahead. She turned to the shaman and spoke in a low voice: “Shaman, our sheep and cattle have begun to form an initial complementarity, but the cattle are too large, and the dog packs cannot fully control them. We must attempt to domesticate larger breeds to assist in herding.”

The shaman pondered for a moment, then nodded slowly: “To the north of the mountains, on the Tibetan Plateau, there exist large canine species—strong, cold-resistant, and highly alert. If we can crossbreed them with our domestic dogs, we could gain true guardians for the herd.”

A decisive gleam flashed in Nuwa’s eyes: “More than that, we will begin a short-term highland grazing program. Each year, we will lead the tribe, along with the cattle, sheep, and dogs, to pastures at higher altitudes, allowing them to gradually adapt to the thin air and harsh cold.”

The shaman frowned: “The risks are great. At first, we may lose livestock and manpower.”

Nuwa smiled, her gaze firm: “Risk and opportunity go hand in hand. Only by letting the cattle, sheep, and large dogs grow in extreme environments can we accelerate the formation of cold- and high-altitude–resistant lineages. Every highland grazing expedition is a directed selection for the ecosystem, the livestock, and the tribe.”

By evening, the tribe brought out food and equipment from their tents. Nuwa instructed several young members to guide the dog packs in preparation for the next day’s highland migration. The dogs circled the sheep vigilantly, the cattle followed steadily, and the mountain wind swept past. In the distance, the snow-capped peaks gleamed, as if foreshadowing the journey and challenges to come.

Under Nuwa’s leadership, the tribe began annual short-term highland grazing. Through repeated practice, the pasture ecosystem, the physical condition of the cattle and sheep, and the adaptability of the large dogs were carefully recorded and optimized. Crossbreeding and domestication plans gradually unfolded, and a new pastoral order quietly took shape in the Hindu Kush mountains, laying the foundation for the highland civilization to come.






Night fell over the Hindu Kush mountains, and the firelight flickered against the rocky cliffs, casting the shadows of Nuwa and the tribal leaders. The tribe sat around the fire, the air filled with the aroma of roasting lamb and the crisp chill of the mountain wind. Nuwa rose, her voice cutting through the night: “Our tribe has not yet reached its population limit, nor have we fully explored the potential of these mountains. Now is the time to make strategic decisions.”

The shaman nodded slowly beside her: “The pastures, the cattle and sheep, and the dog packs have formed an initial order. Next comes choosing a direction, determining the fate of the tribe.”

During the council, each tribe voiced their opinions:

* **Nuwa proposed her plan:** “I will lead the tribe into the highlands for directed domestication. The highland environment is harsh, but cattle and sheep, along with large dogs that are cold- and low-oxygen–resistant, will become the foundation of our future strength.”

* **The northern Viking ancestors spoke:** “We propose moving west, occupying the northern Iranian plateau and the Caspian coastal corridors to secure trade and grazing routes. At the same time, we will cross the Caucasus Mountains and claim the grasslands west of the Urals, opening new pastures for the tribe.”

* **Other tribal leaders reported:** “We will handle logistics, stockpile food and weapons, protect trade routes, and ensure that migration and expansion proceed smoothly.”

The firelight danced across each determined face. The shaman whispered to Nuwa: “This time, it is no longer forced exile, but a conscious choice of the future. With clear roles, the tribe’s fate is in its own hands.”

Nuwa nodded, her gaze firm: “The embryo of a nomadic civilization is taking shape—highly organized, with clear divisions of labor. This means the tribe can survive, grow, and endure under wind, snow, and the shadows of wolves.”

Under the firelight, the Hindu Kush night seemed both tranquil and powerful. The distant snow-capped peaks appeared to foreshadow the proactive journey the tribe was about to undertake.








### *The Blackwater Era: Migration*

On the mountaintop, snow-capped peaks glistened with frost.
The pastures were just turning green, and the sheep grazed with bowed heads.
Shadows of wolves lurked nearby, while the firelight illuminated warriors and elders.
Nuwa stood on a rock, gazing into the distance, the shaman’s whispers recounting history in her ears:
“Our tribe has not yet reached its limit; wind, snow, and wolf shadows will witness our choices.”

Crossing the ridges, with thin air and biting cold,
cattle and sheep lowed in the frost,
while dog packs protected every step.
Short-term grazing recorded pasture growth and water sources,
survival of the fittest, genes selected by the cold wind.
By the fire on frozen nights, the she-wolf murmured softly,
its eyes reflecting the tribe’s future:
cold-hardy sheep, strong cattle, brave canine companions—
every life-or-death challenge reshaped their genes.
The tribe sang, and the snowfields echoed:
“Those who endure the winter will survive!”

To the north, the grasslands stretched endlessly,
winds swept yellow soil, rivers twisted,
wolves roamed along the edges.
The tribe rode camels and drove their cattle and sheep,
arrows and shields glinting in the sun,
gradually occupying prime pastures, expanding population reserves,
building temporary camps, storing food and weapons.
Every hunt, every defense, multiplied the tribe’s strength.
“The grasslands belong to the brave; the further the grazing song carries, the louder it echoes!”

Eastward and northward, two directions:
one to refine genes, the other to expand population.
Mountains and plains, wind, snow, and yellow sand—
humans, sheep, cattle, dogs, wolves—
coexistence and conquest intertwined, weaving the tapestry of a nomadic civilization.
Nuwa gazed far, the shaman whispered softly:
“The wind and snow will wash away the weak; the grasslands will nurture the strong.
Wolf shadows and firelight are our covenant.”

From the Hindu Kush to the snowy highlands,
from west of the Urals to the vast yellow sands,
the tribe’s steps meandered like rivers.
Civilization flowed with the wind, grew on the plains, and passed through the bloodline.
The song of migration echoed long:
“The living endure, the strong prevail; the grasslands and snowfields alike are the domain of our tribe.”






**Chapter Five: The Call of Kunlun**

The morning mist of the Hindu Kush had not yet lifted. Nuwa and the shaman stood on the ridge, gazing down at the tribe’s sheep slowly moving below, while the dogs kept vigilant watch on either side. In the distance, the shadow of a gray wolf flickered in and out of view, as though spying on these uninvited guests.

Nuwa’s eyes pierced through the layers of ridges toward the untamed highlands of the east.
“Shaman,” she said, “you once told me of the great dogs on the plateau—beasts of powerful bloodlines that could live alongside our sheep and cattle. That means we can accelerate the refinement of our stock, making our tribe hardier, more resistant to cold and thin air, stronger than before.”

The shaman slowly nodded, his gaze fixed on the snowy peaks of Tibet in the far distance.
“Yes, Nuwa. The plateau’s harsh ecology will give us an extreme testing ground for rotational grazing and selective breeding. Any sheep, cattle, or dogs that survive here will be the distilled essence of nature’s selection. A prolonged stay will strengthen the tribe’s very capacity to endure.”

Nuwa gripped her staff firmly, her tone resolute.
“If we succeed, it will mean more than survival. Every short-term grazing on the plateau will be a deliberate act of selection. Our sheep will grow hardier, our cattle more productive, our dogs fiercer. The tribe’s future will take root here.”

The shaman smiled faintly, but his voice was a warning:
“Risk is inescapable. The plateau is cold, the air thin, the diseases unknown. A vanguard must go first—marking water sources and pastures, studying the ways of the great plateau dogs. Understand, Nuwa: this is not only migration—it is a wager of our very blood against nature.”

Nuwa drew in a sharp breath of the icy mountain wind, the chill cutting to her bones.
“I understand. We will treat every grazing as an experiment, every stay as a trial. The plateau itself will decide who lives and who multiplies. Shaman, stand with me—let us prepare the plan and ready the tribe.”

The shaman bowed his head and chanted softly:
“On the snowy ridges, the wind will show us the way; in the shadow of the great dogs, the strong will be chosen. Nuwa, lead your people forward. They will remember your courage, and they will carry the strength that this land bestows.”

Nuwa turned to look at the bustling tribe: sheep winding along the slope, camels laden with supplies trudging forward, men and women adjusting tents and preparing provisions for the long march. Her voice rang clear through the morning mist:
“Tomorrow, we depart. Every step for the bloodline. Every step for the tribe’s future.”








**The Call of the Tibetan Plateau**

An eagle’s wings cleave morning haze,
Above the Hindu Kush the white flocks graze.
Ten fleeting years like arrows fly,
The tribe leaves tracks on ridge and sky.

Spring snows dissolve, the grasses rise,
The sheep march forth with measured strides.
The cattle crop what greens remain,
The dogs guard borders, wolves still feign.

Nüwa leads, the shaman prays,
Each camp a trial in nature’s ways.
Each fleeting stay, each brief domain,
Becomes a test of blood and strain.

Summer winds through stone peaks blow,
The vanguard seeks where waters flow.
Through rainy torrents rivers run,
Their maps are etched in everyone.

Autumn paints the slopes in gold,
With tents by cliffs the goods are rolled.
The flocks, the herds, the hounds grow strong,
Each march selects who still belongs.

Winter crowns the peaks with knives,
The thin air culls unfit of lives.
Yet those who last are forged anew,
The eagle wheels o’er lands they knew.

Through years of mountains, rivers vast,
The rocks and snows became their class.
The wolves turned dogs, the stock grew bold,
They learned to herd, to share, uphold.

At last they stand where sky meets land,
A sea of clouds beneath them spans.
Tianshan’s peaks to Mongol plains,
Sichuan’s basin in their gaze remains.

Nüwa turns, her people cheer,
Their sweat and tears to smiles adhere.
Her form ascends through snow peaks white,
The tribe now guards the earth with might.

The eagle folds its wings at last,
The winds erase time’s fleeting past.
The plateau’s breath, the tribe’s heartbeat,
As one they claim this world complete.









The eagle’s wings circled above the clouds,
and time itself seemed to hasten like the wind.
The tribe had only just set foot on the Tibetan Plateau.
The sky was thin, the cold winds howled,
and the pastures were still unfamiliar.
Yaks lowered their heads, testing the fresh grass.
Tibetan sheep slowly adapted to the brief alpine meadows.
Mastiffs prowled among the rocks, sniffing,
their lupine instincts not yet fully tamed.

On a high slope, Nüwa spoke softly with the shaman:

> “The water is unevenly scattered,
> the grazing lands are fragmented.
> We must record every terrain
> suitable for herding.”
>
> “Send out four expeditions—east, northeast, due north, northwest.
> Map the land, the grasses, the waters, and the hidden threats.
> Only by knowing our borders can we set the paths of migration.”

The expeditions departed:

* **Eastern Route**: through deep valleys, tracing rivers and plants, recording the density of meadows and the cycles of their seasonal growth.
* **Northeastern Route**: along the great river basin, surveying water and pasture quality, while watching for dangers and natural barriers.
* **Northern Route**: into the edges of the Mongolian steppe, observing vast grasslands and wild herds, attempting first trials of pasturing.
* **Northwestern Route**: across the Tianshan range, noting the veins of ore, the spread of meadows, and the feasibility of crossing deserts.

Day after day, year after year,
yaks, sheep, and mastiffs, under the tribe’s guidance,
slowly adapted to the cold and the thin air of the highlands.
The herds’ behavior was still unsettled.
Mastiffs and wolves clashed at times,
yet the tribe kept watching, intervening, recording their patterns—
building experience for the future work of deliberate domestication.

High above, the eagle soared, surveying the plateau.
Time was compressed into images of years:
exploration, trial grazing, record-keeping, adaptation—
together forming the tribe’s first knowledge of the plateau’s ecology.
They had not yet reached the summit of achievement,
but they had mastered the rhythms of survival.
In this cadence lay the foundation for coming years
of expansion and the weaving of resources into unity.







After years of highland pasturing and the domestication of yaks, Tibetan sheep, and mastiffs,
the tribe finally stabilized its ecological system.
Meanwhile, the expeditions brought back reports from all directions:

* **Northwest Route — Altai Mountains**

  * Rich copper deposits were discovered, sufficient for bronze production and the stockpiling of weapons.
  * A shimmering ore was found by chance, at first thought to be an impurity of copper, and called “false copper.”
  * After repeated smelting attempts, it was clear that this mineral could not yield bronze and had no practical function—yet its brilliance was striking.
    The tribe named it **shar**, meaning *“the glittering thing.”*
    A few years later, for easier cross-cultural exchange, it gained a secondary name, **Asilis**,
    entering the tribal worldview as a *“non-strategic rare mineral.”*

* **Eastern Route — Sichuan Basin**

  * Vast fertile farmland and human groups were found, suitable for localized agriculture and limited trade contacts,
    though geography made large-scale migration difficult.
  * The expedition brought back knowledge of local resources and artifacts,
    providing a basis for barter and resource acquisition.

The tribe began using **copper** for weapons, tools, and bronze ornaments,
while also experimenting with **waste utilization**:
*shar* was fashioned into jewelry, adornments, and trade tokens.
Its gleam became a symbol of value in intercultural exchange rather than a tool of utility—
thus laying the foundations of an early form of **international currency**
between the Tibetan Plateau tribes and surrounding civilizations.

* **Pastoral Rotation and Colonial Layout**

  * The northern Mongolian steppe was designated for semi-nomadic grazing, securing long-term herds and provisions.
  * The Junggar Basin adopted a mixed model of mining and herding,
    where copper and *shar* were processed in concentration.
  * Through a carefully designed exchange system,
    the tribe traded the glittering stones with the Sichuan Basin and the Iranian oasis civilizations,
    establishing a stable network of supply and demand.








#### **Dialogue in the Kunlun Mountains: The Khatun and the New Shaman**

The light of dusk spread across the snowline and meadows of the Tibetan Plateau,
the wind carrying with it the chill of thin air.
Nüwa sat upon a boulder on the towering ridge, her gaze sweeping across the vast highland.
Below, the herds wandered freely; Tibetan mastiffs guarded yaks and sheep,
and the wind intermingled with the howls of wolves.

The new shaman approached slowly, staff in hand, his demeanor reverent:
“Mother of the Earth, Khatun.”

Nüwa smiled faintly, her eyes piercing the distant sea of clouds:
“Khatun? So… that is the name you give me.”

The shaman bowed deeply:
“It is you who led the people to survive and multiply in this realm above the clouds,
who shaped the order of ecology, beasts, and humankind.
You are the Mother of the Highlands—beneath your feet all things are sheltered and guided.”

Nüwa extended her hand toward the distant mountains and valleys:
“From here, one can see it all—rivers, pastures, veins of ore…
everything that sustains our tribe.
Every path, every blade of grass, bears the weight of our choices and our labor.”

The shaman spoke softly:
“Khatun, we shall name this mountain range after you—the **Kunlun Mountains**.
From this day, the gods (our stronghold) dwell in the heavens (the plateau);
envoys shall go forth from Kunlun,
and from here the tribe will marshal resources, govern colonies, and carry forward your wisdom.”

Nüwa nodded, stroking the Tibetan mastiff at her side:
“The thin air and cold of this highland force people, beasts, and plants alike to adapt.
This is nature’s selection, and also our trial.
Through decades of risk, we have mastered rotational grazing,
the taming of giant dogs, the domestication of yaks and Tibetan sheep.
Our institutions and our ecology have evolved together,
and the tribe has quickened its genetic adaptation through hardship.”

The shaman raised his eyes to the horizon, his voice filled with reverence:
“Khatun, Kunlun and the Great Dogs shall become the symbols of our culture, binding us together.
The resources and ecological strengths of the highlands shall be our strategic reserve,
sustaining the expansion of our future civilization.”

Nüwa sighed gently, her gaze both soft and resolute:
“From this day forth, the Tibetan Plateau shall be our heaven.
The people will know—this is the root of our survival,
and the point of departure for our journeys into the world.
The Kunlun Mountains shall guide our future.”

The mountain winds roared, snowflakes lifted into the air,
and the figures of Nüwa and the shaman stood against the sea of clouds—
the Khatun reigning from Kunlun, governing the heavens,
while envoys depart from Kunlun.






### **Sanxingdui beneath the Golden Shadow**

The glittering shards came from distant mountains,
fragments of gold-plated bronze armor,
shining in the palms of nomadic tribes,
useless in craft, yet kindling fire in the eyes.

The natives of the Sichuan Basin gazed,
from youth to elder, desire stirred within.
They rushed to pursue, offering grain and cloth,
to trade for that illusory brilliance—
as addicts chasing the sparks of flame.

Armor-born culture seeped through streets and alleys;
families competed, flaunted, and contended.
Golden masks, gilded bronze shields
became emblems of rank and power—
their value not in use, but in vanity’s mirror.

Yet excess could not flow without bounds.
Wise elders of the tribes arose,
each year collecting objects of lavish display,
burying them deep in the earth,
turning them into a silent river underground.

The years passed, gold was swallowed by soil;
masks lay still in the dark loam.
The vanity once burning returned to silence,
and those glittering shards,
became a riddle for later ages—
the ruins of Sanxingdui:
golden shadows buried,
yet still reflecting the soul of civilization.








### *The Trade of the Golden Wind*

The wind sweeps ridges of Hindu Kush high,
Bronze-furnace flames in Nuwa’s eye.
Ore from the mountains glitters bright,
Yet false bronze gleams with fleeting light.
She names it **shar**—the shining guise,
A useless spark before her eyes.

Plated masks and jewels it made,
Nomad hooves in caravan parade.
Westward they press, through plateau wide,
O’er Iran’s heights, through deserts dry,
Through oases green and storm-worn vale,
Where sand and wind their trails assail.

Gold brings no food, nor weapon’s might,
Yet hearts succumb to its blinding sight.
Queens and chiefs, and sages, too,
Merchants eager, chasing the new—
Pouring wealth for the glittering stone,
Desire’s whirlpool, endless, unknown.

On Nile’s wetland, the sails rise proud,
The **shar** is borne through storm and cloud.
For grain, for cloth, for ivory white,
For spice that burns with secret light.
Nomads watching from plateaus afar,
See value drift like wind on par.
The first world coin begins its reign,
A worthless spark turned global chain.

Bronze-blades sharp, and cattle’s tread,
Faith and wealth in the high wind wed.
Dogs keep watch, while trade takes form,
In flashing waste, the world was born.








### *The Road of Eagle Hooves*

The cold winds of Altai howl along the ridge,
Eyes of the khatuns pierce beyond the snowline’s edge.
Eagle wings flicker through valley and sky,
Messengers of the tribes in dawnlight sigh:
“Go forth, with talons, seek the shimmer of oasis water.”

The eagle soars above Tarim’s vast dome,
Oases like stars in the desert’s loam.
Each beat of the wing, a signal of trade,
Each sudden dive, a pathfinder’s blade.

Hooves shatter the winter snow, scrape frozen grass,
Cattle and sheep chew life as storms pass.
Long migrations are no longer mere toil,
But bloodlines etched in routes across the soil.

On the northern Eurasian steppe, horses race like the breeze,
Plains, rivers, highlands are stamped with their keys.
In central Tarim, markets and wells entwine,
Eagles and camels pierce the desert’s spine.

Southward they move to the Tibetan heights,
To Sichuan’s green valleys, to fertile lights.
Each traded good is a craft, a lore,
Each caravan road is kinship’s core.

From East Asia to Nile’s floodplain,
Steppe, oasis, wetland sustain.
The end of one trade, another begun,
**Shar**’s bright gleam, bronze, herds, and spun cloth run.
Through wind, snow peaks, and river gorge sweep,
Like eagle eyes and hoofbeats weaving deep,
A moving map the world became,
A living thread, a timeless flame.

Khatuns gaze from the high plateau crest,
Eagles circle the heavens, hooves pound the rest.
Order arises from trade and migration,
Civilization grows at the snow-sand-grass-river’s junction.
Eagles and horses, bronze and gold,
Sheep, cattle, and people in stories retold—
Together they carved the first great road,
A true transcontinental trade abode.








### *Chronicle of the Black Waters · Pursuing the Horse*

**Prologue**

Between the Tibetan Plateau and the high mountains,
rivers flow in a slow descent, their waters dark brown,
heavy as the night itself—these are the Black Waters.

Such rivers mostly spring from the sluggish thaw
of permafrost and seasonal frost.
Snowmelt carries silt and humus,
drifting through low-lying valleys in quiet streams.
In this cold realm, the remains of animals and plants,
fallen branches, leaves, and dung,
decompose with extreme slowness,
settling in riverbeds and banks as dense brown sludge,
staining the water with an almost ink-black hue.

The Black Waters are not only emblems of the land’s fertility,
but also rivers of time:
their sluggish currents seal within them
ecological traces of centuries, even millennia.
They record the thin air,
the cold, and the pressure of daily survival
on the plateau of Tibet,
and they bear witness to the long companionship
of nomadic peoples with cattle, sheep, and dogs.

Along the banks of the Black Waters,
mosses, meadows, and wetland plants
burst into a fleeting life each summer,
drawing herds of sheep and cattle to graze,
and in turn feeding raptors and wolves.
The slowness and the darkness of the water
symbolize the accumulation and secrecy of highland civilizations:
material wealth, lived experience, and wisdom—
all settle like humus in the riverbed,
providing nomads with resources
and with the genetic room to adapt and endure.

The Black Waters are the bloodstream of the earth,
a confluence of time and ecology,
witness to migrations, to domestication,
to risk and adventure.
They run through the long history
from the early wanderings of nomadic civilization
to its gradual clash with political structures.
This is the core symbol of the *Chronicle of the Black Waters*.







Since the occupation of the Tibetan Plateau and the domestication of horses in Central Asia, the herders and nomadic tribes across Afro-Eurasia began to connect slowly through trade and migration. Horses became the central link: although saddles had not yet been invented and mounted combat was impossible, they served as vital tools for long-distance transport, forming the foundation for the exchange of resources and populations across great distances.

The techniques of horse domestication spread westward along the steppe networks. Beyond the Ural Mountains, the ancestors of the Vikings acquired horses through steppe trade routes, using them for commerce and migration. Because their contact with Western Asia was limited, their skin tones and hair colors remained largely light—blond hair and blue eyes became their defining traits. By contrast, the nomads of the Altai, through trade, raiding, and frequent migrations, developed a high degree of genetic mixing; within the same cultural groups, differences in skin color and hair color were pronounced.

In the Nile Valley, civilizations of this period invented the chariot, which enabled the rapid spread of horse use in agriculture and transport. This innovation localized the long-range transport capacity of Central Asian herders, making it possible to move grain, livestock, and precious metals across long distances.

Population movement and intermarriage became a key mechanism of steppe civilization. A single herder could, within a year, travel west of the Urals, bring back a partner as a wife, and thereby establish kinship and alliance networks across tribes and cultures. Such high mobility not only accelerated the spread of culture and technology but also subtly shaped the genetic profiles and physical features of the entire steppe region.

In this way, the Eurasian steppe produced two characteristic human patterns:

1. **The relatively isolated Northern European groups**: low rates of admixture, with distinct light skin, blond hair, and blue eyes.
2. **The highly mobile Central Asian and Altai groups**: frequent intermixing, diverse skin and hair colors, yet bound together by a unified nomadic culture and trade network.

The essence of this period lay in **the connectivity of transport tools and trade nodes**. This not only diversified the lives of pastoralists but also laid the demographic, ecological, and technological foundations for later social institutions, economic systems, and strategies of war.







Cold winds swept across the vast steppes west of the Ural Mountains. The long-settled snow had melted, revealing yellow-brown earth beneath. The ancestors of the Vikings led their herds of horses, moving slowly along the Central Asian trade routes. Their animals were tall and strong, yet still unfit for riding; they could only carry fodder, furs, and bronze goods. Each spring, the tribes set out, following the steppe paths toward distant valleys and oases, trading livestock, grain, and handmade crafts with other clans.

In the northwestern Altai Mountains, eagles were tamed and became the tribes’ eyes—circling high above the peaks, spotting oases, water sources, and pastures. Horses then hauled these resources swiftly back to the camps, ensuring survival through the brutal winters. Each returning caravan carried not only goods from faraway oases but also news of other peoples—and often brides from foreign clans, weaving new ties of marriage, alliance, and kinship.

Across Central Asia, herders sat by the fires in winter, watching the snow beneath their horses’ hooves and discussing the hardiness of yaks, Tibetan sheep, and mastiffs brought from the Tibetan Plateau. Their skin had gradually lightened under the northern winds and the high-altitude sun. Yet in the Altai, constant migration and exchange made hair and eye color diverse—blue and brown eyes, blond and black hair intermingling—while the tribe still preserved the same nomadic order.

Far to the south, the sun scorched the golden sands of the Nile wetlands. Caravans arrived bearing Central Asian horses, bronzeware, and news of copper mines. Valley craftsmen marveled at the massive beasts from distant lands. With chariots, they carried grain and building materials farther than before, linking villages along the riverbanks into networks. Each chariot, each horse, stood as a symbol of the slow yet steadfast ties between peoples and civilizations.

Over the long centuries, the trade networks stretched wider, like trails of hoofprints across the grasslands. Each market became the starting point of the next journey; each intermarriage, an exchange of bloodlines and culture. The pale skin, blond hair, and blue eyes of the Viking forebears contrasted with the mixed features of the Central Asian and Altai nomads—but all were bound together by horses, trade, and migration.

Through millennia of wind and snow, dust and rivers, plains and mountains, the very framework of Eurasian nomadic civilization took shape: horses carried commerce, eagles guarded oases, herds adapted to the highland winds, and people—through marriage, exchange, and alliance—were firmly bound together. Without saddles, without conquest, the true strength of civilization grew quietly in this slow, enduring web of interconnection and adaptation.








Long before horses were domesticated on the Tibetan Plateau and Central Asian trade hubs were established, northern tribes had already begun probing into the far Arctic lands. They traveled northward across the vast Siberian steppe, crossed the Bering land bridge, and entered the Americas—a continent yet untouched by permanent human settlement. While the land bridge still existed, the traditions of migration, hunting, and even the earliest forms of nomadism quietly passed into the New World alongside both people and animals.

When the Ice Age ended and sea levels rose, the Bering land bridge sank beneath the waters, severing direct contact between North America and Asia forever. Yet the nomadic wisdom, the symbiotic way of life with animals, and the adaptability to long-distance migrations had already been planted deep within the cultures of the Indigenous peoples of the Americas—seeds of knowledge and experience that would later flourish in their hunting and herding practices.






The cold winds of the Tibetan Plateau still howled across the heights, while beneath the plateau—among the steppes, mountains, and oases of Eurasia—the political order of nomadic tribes quietly took shape. Here, authority did not rest on kinship; after three generations, blood ties thinned like fading streams. Instead, the bonds of family and tribe were upheld through oaths, intermarriage, and long-standing trade networks.

As mining, trade, and raiding grew in importance, new structures of power emerged: men came to command the arteries of the economy—those who controlled mines, herds of horses, and trade routes wielded authority that far surpassed the limited population of the plateau homeland. Yet supreme leadership within each tribe was shared by husband and wife. The wife, representing the Tibetan Plateau, not only oversaw internal affairs but also became the keystone of alliances, using wisdom and patience to balance the delicate ties between colonies and the homeland.

Though the colonies had long surpassed the plateau in population and resources, the harsh climate, thin air, and bitter cold made the highlands uninhabitable for soldiers, discouraging any attempt to overthrow the motherland’s authority. Thus, despite its sparse population, the Tibetan Plateau remained an unassailable strategic center.

In this period, male leaders who controlled gold mines fashioned a new title in echo of the matriarch’s: from the exalted honorific of the plateau’s *Khatun* arose the masculine title *Khan*. Through negotiation and oath, the tribes conferred upon the plateau’s *Khatun* the reverse title *Queen Mother*—the Mother of All Kings—affirming her as the highest authority among colonies and tribes alike. To preserve the fragile balance of power and prevent the colonies from declaring independence, the Tibetan Plateau in turn enfeoffed the supreme chieftain of the Altai colonial confederation as the *Golden Khan* (the Altai Khan). This act not only reinforced ethnic cohesion but also forged the concept of a Golden Lineage: economic, political, and military authority balanced under dual rule of husband and wife, yet always oriented around the plateau as the core.

Thus, across these ten millennia, power loosened its bonds with blood, marriage became a political instrument, and colonies and homeland were bound through trade and arms. Division of labor sharpened, populations swelled, and together environment and custom molded the earliest forms of steppe civilization and the golden economy that was yet to come.






During the nomadic tribes’ migration north of Lake Baikal, they encountered local inhabitants strikingly different from their ancestors. These groups had not continued the nomadic traditions of old: they had neither domesticated horses nor employed dogs to assist in herding. Instead, they relied on river fishing, forest hunting, valley pastoralism, and even the domestication of wild boars into pigs. The land was rich in water and grass, its rivers interwoven, and Lake Baikal itself held more than one-fifth of the planet’s fresh water reserves—resources so abundant that they had no need to wander ceaselessly as the nomads once did.

When the pioneers of the nomadic tribes arrived, they expressed disdain for these people: Why abandon the efficient lifeway of their forebears—symbiosis with dogs and the mastery of vast herds through only a few hands? Why forsake nomadism in favor of repetitive herding and fishing? Out of such scorn and reproach, the nomads gave the inhabitants a name: **“Tungus,”** meaning *“swineherds.”* The term pointed directly to their chief means of production while also marking them, in nomadic eyes, as having “betrayed the ancestral way.”

From that time onward, “Tungus” came to denote not only the inhabitants of that river basin but also, in later records, the defining character of the people themselves: industrious and settled, reliant on abundant waters and grasses, yet divorced from the nomadic wisdom of dog and horse symbiosis—the art of achieving more with less.






From the Tungus River basin stretching to the Greater Khingan Range and the East Asian coastal regions, vast forests, winding mountains, crisscrossing rivers, numerous lakes, and sinuous coastlines intertwined to form a complex landscape. In such an environment, the lifestyle of nomadic tribes was naturally constrained: wide grasslands gradually vanished, and horses, cattle, and sheep could no longer sustain large-scale migrations. The pastoral economy, once reliant on animal symbiosis, was forced to shift toward sedentary herding and agricultural practices.

This transformation was often not voluntary. Tribes that failed in resource competition were compelled to abandon their nomadic traditions, while landless or impoverished groups cleared fields and gradually established semi-sedentary or fully sedentary villages. Highly mobile communities began taking root in river valleys and coastal plains, bringing changes to their daily rhythms, social structures, and technological practices.

In the early stages, when populations were sparse and resources abundant, trade between nomadic and semi-sedentary groups could still maintain relative harmony: exchanges of horses, furs, minerals, and food created mutually beneficial networks. But as populations grew and social specialization deepened, competition for land, hunting grounds, rivers, and coastal resources became inevitable. Friction and conflict grew more frequent, and cultural differences between sedentary and non-sedentary groups accumulated tension, sowing the seeds for future political structures and ethnic conflicts.






The most prosperous tribal confederations of the Tungusic language family were distributed across the Greater Khingan Range. This region was characterized by seasonal permafrost, with a slow-moving, winding river darkened by abundant humus. Initially, in the tribes’ oral tradition, this river was simply called **Ruoshui (Weak Water)**, emphasizing its sluggish flow, which posed no threat to migrating communities.

As populations grew and tribal alliances expanded, Weak Water gradually acquired new significance. In shamanic narratives, it was renamed **Heishui (Blackwater)**: Blackwater symbolized the lifeblood of the earth, the source that nurtured all living things, and a representation of order and authority. Tribal leaders and priests repeatedly reinforced this conception through ritual, turning the river into not just a geographic feature but a political emblem of tribal identity.

Later, with the constant reshuffling of conflicts and alliances, the narrative became further politicized. Blackwater was transformed into **Heilongjiang (Black Dragon River)**. The dragon image did not originate from any real creature but evolved from earlier totems: the original “Jade Pig-Dragon” was misinterpreted as a serpent during interregional exchanges, eventually merging with tribal lore and being elevated to the symbolic dragon. Heilongjiang thus ceased to be merely a river; it became a sacred emblem that unified the tribe, symbolizing both a frontier barrier and a source of life for the nascent polity.

Through this progressive renaming, one can clearly see how the narrative was gradually politicized: from the natural **Weak Water**, to the religiousized **Blackwater**, and finally to the symbol of ultimate authority, **Black Dragon River**.

As for the term “Tungus,” in the pastoral language it originally meant “land where wild boars roam (Tungus / Land of Wild Boars).” The designation carried a derogatory sense, applied to groups that abandoned nomadic traditions and settled between forests and rivers. Discriminated against, expelled from the Tungus River region, and deprived of Baikal Lake’s fisheries, these people were forced into political reforms, gradually forming some of the earliest tribal alliances that attempted independent governance.







As time slowly passed, the nomadic tribes continuously transported the glittering gold of the Altai Mountains and the pure, translucent jade of the Tianshan Mountains eastward to East Asia, exchanging them for food, handcrafted tools, and artisanal techniques. The pastoral communities of East Asia did not succumb to extravagant displays of wealth; instead, they refined the gold and jade and resold them to the nomads, gaining both profit and resources. They carved the jade into various abstract toys and ritual objects, the most famous of which was the **Jade Pig-Dragon**—an elongated, lively figure resembling a little pig. Originally intended as a simple child’s toy, it gradually acquired cultural significance through repeated circulation and interregional trade.

When this figure traveled via trade to Egypt and was misinterpreted as a serpent symbol, it had already diverged from its original purpose and form, becoming a new emblem. Generations later, as the Jade Pig-Dragon returned to East Asia through cultural exchange, its serpentine body was progressively extended and abstracted, eventually evolving into the early form of the **Chinese dragon**—a symbol that intertwined primitive toys, animal forms, trade networks, and cultural cognition. Trade, the passage of time, and cultural flows quietly shaped a transcontinental symbolic system, while the jade economy became a crucial link sustaining the interaction between nomadic and pastoral civilizations.





When the nomadic tribes sent gold and white jade eastward, they did not realize the transformative potential unfolding. In the past, gold mining and jewelry production had been almost entirely monopolized by the colonial outposts of the Altai Mountains in Central Asia, making the trade network stable and predictable. Yet far to the east, among the pastoral tribes of the Greater Khingan Range, wealth was not passively received—they actively demanded access to raw jade.

The white jade, once cut, became fragile, impossible to rework, and lacked any sparkling sheen—its value lay not in utility, but in symbolism and creativity. The nomads failed to perceive this subtle “alienation.” Clearly, the pastoral tribes were quietly evolving, extending their focus from material goods to art and culture: jade became central to the production of cultural craft, gradually embedded in marriage and ritual, and eventually symbolizing female gifts.

Through this process, the pastoral tribes constructed an entirely new “monetary system”: a circulating medium that was single-use, fragile, and maintained value through cultural symbolism. Gold remained hard currency, but jade ornaments—fragile, non-reusable, and carrying social significance—became experimental instruments of a distinct economic mechanism, opening new paths for cultural and economic innovation within East Asian pastoral civilizations.








The eagle was the messenger of Eternal Heaven, Tengri—soaring through the skies, it descended as the first shaman among men. The shaman, in direct communion with divine will, heralded a new concept: Eternal Heaven, Tengri, seeping into the realm of politics and culture. At this moment, the pastoral tribes of the imperial frontier were recast within religious narrative: myth proclaimed Eternal Heaven Tengri as the Heavenly Father, who together with the Earth Mother, the Khatun, gave birth to all living things.

Yet this mythology was, in essence, a reform of politics and religion. Matrilineal clans were gradually marginalized, while patriarchal clan society rose in their place, empowered by both faith and authority. The Khatun, symbol of the Earth Mother, had already been challenged by the Altai colonies through the very invention of the title *Khan*. But once Eternal Heaven Tengri was imagined, he was placed above the Earth Mother, establishing himself as the supreme authority—thus displacing the original power center of the Tibetan Plateau in the narrative order.

Religion, then, did not merely shape belief; it rewrote political structures. The authority of the motherland was overshadowed by mythic patriarchal symbols, the balance of power between tribes and colonies was redefined, and politics and religion mirrored one another—mythic narrative and institutional innovation intertwining across the steppes and highlands.








### *Blackwater Hymn*

**Black is the water, slow as a vein,**
It winds through the earth, through marrow and grain.
It is the order, the tribal decree,
The law of the land, where the clans may be.

**Yellow is sand, a color confined,**
Winds sweep the desert, erase humankind.
All tribes that bear this captive hue,
Are bound as servants, bent and subdued.

**Blue is the sky, the breath of the free,**
Forests stretch shadows beneath its sea.
Those who depart from the steppe’s embrace,
Raise this banner, their guiding grace.

**White is the metal, fire-refined,**
It gleams with wealth, with power aligned.
He who commands the mines of stone,
Forges a throne that is purely his own.

**Red is the flame, the border of fate,**
It burns the wood, the altar it shapes.
The bear’s skull cracks in the sacred pyre,
Blood on the stones becomes god’s desire.

---

In the blaze, the **eagle descends from on high,**
Messenger of Eternal Sky.
It takes the form of the shaman first,
Breathes out storms, with heaven conversed.

Thus the tale of the Earth-Mother is torn,
The Khatun remains, yet her crown is worn.
The chieftain of eagles, feathers his crown,
At the bear-fire altar, he lays his vow down.
The drum of the shaman speaks in his stead,
Through him, the Father of Heaven is said.

From then, Blackwater is more than a stream,
It is law, it is chain, it is trumpet’s scream.
All tribes in ritual bow their head,
For a new order binds heaven and stead:
**Throne and altar joined as one,**
The eagle’s clan, beneath the sun,
Holds the voice of Eternal Sky,
And crowns the tribes where blood runs dry.









# Chapter One: The Pillar of the World

## *Hymn of the World Pillar*

Black is water, slow as the pulse,
flowing between grasslands and valleys.
It is order, the witness of covenant.
Yellow is sand, imprisoned by the wind,
reminding the tribe: the wanderer, the rootless,
shall in the sands forget his name.

Sky-blue is the heavens,
sheltering the galloping herdsmen,
free as the eagle, free as the wind,
unfolding in the endless breath of the steppe.
White is metal, awakened in fire,
forged into blades, forged into oaths,
the chieftain’s staff, the shaman’s bell.

Red is flame,
burning upon the altar of the bear,
the shaman whispers in eagle feathers,
his tongue the tongue of Eternal Heaven,
his shadow the shadow of Mother Earth.

—Thus,
upon the snowy ridges of the Tibetan Plateau,
the World Pillar was raised.

It pierced the clouds,
bridging the breath of Father Tengri and Mother Earth.
Blood of ice and snow coursed through its veins,
becoming the Yellow River, the Yangtze, the Ganges,
surging, nourishing steppe and oasis.

Dogs barked and their voices echoed on the plateau,
sheep slept peacefully on grassy slopes,
cattle moved slowly, like the heartbeat of the earth,
while horses leapt suddenly,
binding the steppe into one.

From Altai to the Hindu Kush,
from Tianshan to the Greater Khingan Range,
from the Black Waters
to the deep lake of Baikal,
countless tribes wandered here, met here, parted here.

Gold was born from the mountains,
white jade gleamed in the river valleys.
They traveled the horse roads of ten thousand li,
traded for salt, grain, tools, fire—
traded for poetry, for song,
for the rhythm of the shaman’s drum,
resonating with heaven and earth.

In those years before the cold descended,
Eurasia was like a hide unrolled.
The north wind only whispered,
the grasslands spread without end.
Alliances and marriages of tribes wove a net of order.
No one dared call himself orphan,
for all drank beneath the World Pillar,
from the same snow-fed waters.

—This was the abundance before silence fell,
the light before polar night and volcanic ash veiled the sun.
This was the great design of the nomads:
they took animals as totems,
colors as their law,
and inscribed between heaven and earth
the first poem of power and order.






* **Time**: After dawn, when the sky is faintly lit.
* **Place**: At the edge of the steppe, rolling hills, with horse herds moving slowly in the distance.
* **Characters**:

  * **Khatun** (young, a newly appointed female tribal leader, filled with doubt and anxiety).
  * **Shaman** (elder, thinker, political advisor—versed in both religion and politics, speaks in allegory and metaphor).

---

The wind swept across the steppe.
Far away, the breath and hoofbeats of horses drifted faintly.
Khatun walked alone on the high ground, an aged shaman following by her side.
The sky was gray-blue, like an unfinished painting.

**Khatun** (pensive, opening with “meaning”):

> “We roam the steppe for the sake of cattle, sheep, and horses.
> But when I wake in the night, I ask myself—why do our steps never rest?
> Is the meaning of life merely to keep our people from starving?”

**Shaman** (smiling, not answering directly):

> “Look at the herds.
> They migrate without end, they graze, they drink, they breed.
> They never ask *why*—that is why they are horses.
> You asked this question; therefore you are no longer horse, but human.”

**Khatun**:

> “But why then must humans, too, endlessly pursue?
> If meaning is only survival, are we truly better than beasts?”

**Shaman** (pausing, pointing to the horizon where two worlds meet):

> “The settled folk—they have houses, granaries, writing.
> Their meaning is *order*—to keep the fire alive in one place.
> They can pass inventions and tools to their children.
> But the price is the loss of freedom of movement.
> They grow rigid.”

**Shaman** (turning back toward the steppe):

> “We, on the other hand—follow water and grass.
> Our gift is *breakthrough*—for nothing binds us.
> New weapons, new riding, new ideas are always born at the frontier.
> But we are also fleeting—one gust of wind, and we scatter.”

**Khatun** (with dawning insight):

> “So both they and we are incomplete.
> Settlers can mass-produce; nomads can innovate.
> If joined together, could they not form a stronger civilization?”

**Shaman** (shaking his head, with layered meaning):

> “If joined as one, difference disappears, and so does tension.
> A bowstring cut cannot shoot an arrow, however sharp.
> True order requires that different meanings coexist—
> but never mix.”

**Khatun** (softly, almost to herself):

> “Coexist… but never mix.”

The wind rose, the grass swayed, and the horse herds surged forward—
as though annotating their dialogue.








**Khatun** (gazing at the distant horizon, speaking slowly):

> “You say the steps of nomads are like the wind, drifting across all lands.
> But I ask—what does such wandering truly bring to the world?
> We are merely moving from one pasture to another.”

**Shaman** (raising a hand toward the sky, where clouds drift):

> “The wind blows across mountains and rivers, carrying seeds.
> The steps of nomads are also wind.
> We are not just for cattle and sheep, but the spark connecting distant lands.
> Remember? Horses were first tamed in Central Asia, yet they bloomed into chariots in Egypt.
> Those were nomadic footsteps carrying the horse; yet settled hands combined wood and bronze to build the vehicle.”

**Khatun**:

> “So, without us, the horse would remain on the steppe;
> without them, the horse could never pull a chariot.”

**Shaman** (nodding):

> “Exactly. We open the nodes; they mass-produce the results.
> Thus culture, knowledge, and technology flow across distances.
> Bow and arrow, iron, wheel, writing… each is the fruit of repeated journeys, repeated exchanges.”

**Khatun** (reflecting):

> “Then the meaning of a person, the meaning of a tribe—does it lie within these things?
> If we merely eat, drink, and reproduce, we are no different from beasts.
> But when we tame animals, choose the strongest horse;
> when we improve seeds, select the richest grain;
> when we invent new weapons and tools…
> only then do we transform mere existence into meaning.”

**Shaman** (with far-reaching gaze, voice low):

> “Meaning is not in whether we live, but in what we leave behind.
> Every technological advance is an extension of the soul.
> Look at that foal—it runs simply to run;
> yet when humans place a bridle upon it, it becomes part of our civilization.
> And humans themselves—are we any different?”

The wind rises; the horses gallop.

**Khatun**:

> “Why do our tribal songs praise the gods, while the rituals of settled people are full of ghosts and grudges?”

**Shaman**:

> “Because we who follow horses need courage;
> and they who guard granaries need fear.
> In our myths, great men become gods to tell future generations:
> if you dare to step out, you may stand shoulder to shoulder with heaven and earth.
> In their myths, wandering spirits serve to tell the farmer:
> do not step beyond the field’s edge, or disaster will follow.”

Myth itself is the shadow of a system.
Nomads worship gods—they encourage risk.
Settlers invoke ghosts—they maintain order.







**Elder A (championing the nomadic spirit):**

> “If one only tends the fields, it is like a frog slowly boiled in warm water.
> True gods arise from long journeys, from feats that break boundaries.
> A tribe without adventure will wither and die under the fear of ghosts.”

**Elder B (championing settled order):**

> “But if everyone dreams only of distant conquests, who will till the soil?
> Without full granaries, what expeditions can be mounted?
> Innovation needs warriors, but mass production needs farmers.
> If order cannot secure sustenance, heroes will starve along the way.”

**Shaman (seeking to mediate):**

> “Perhaps what we need is a dual order:
> the nomads guard the frontiers and blaze the paths,
> the settled people guard the fields and stockpile provisions.
> Both belong to one kingdom, yet each has its own law—never to be confused.”

**Elder A:**

> “If we all dwell in the same city, bloodlines will mix,
> warriors will become farmers, and farmers will dream of becoming warriors.
> The fire of heroes will be extinguished, and the fields abandoned.”

**Elder B:**

> “Hence, separation is necessary.
> Nomads and settlers exist under the same order, yet there must be iron rules:
> no casual intermarriage, no reckless proselytizing.
> To break these laws is to betray the entire order.”

**Shaman:**

> “Separation does not mean hostility.
> Nomads bring new tools and tame new beasts;
> settlers take these skills and mass-produce them for everyday use.
> Flowing in order prevents rupture.
> Reckless mixing breeds strange peoples—both fearing ghosts and indulging in wanton slaughter—who ultimately destroy themselves.”

**Elder A (nodding):**

> “Indeed. Heroes must be born among the nomads,
> and the songs of gods must echo across the steppe and the journey.”

**Elder B (agreeing):**

> “While the shadows of ghosts and law must guard the walls and the fields.”








Qinghai Lake (Tsongon Nor) stretched vast and blue, its waters gleaming coldly under the fierce sun. To the northwest rose the snow-capped ridges of the Qilian Mountains; to the southeast lay the loess plateaus, backed by the highlands and surrounded by mountains on all sides. Kodun chose this place to summon the tribes from all directions—central, yet clearly her own domain. On the high ground by the lakeshore stood a massive wooden sculpture of a brown bear, its claws raised to the sky, symbolizing the forest and freedom, and signaling that the wilderness lay beyond imperial control. Between the ridges lay armored warriors, banners half-hidden, ready to strike any who defied her will.

Kodun sat at the high altar, wearing a crown of bear teeth, draped in white furs and a black fox cloak. She did not ask for anyone’s counsel, but spoke in the voice of a queen-mother, a herald of destiny:

---

**Words of Khatun:**

> “You are all children of the earth, dwelling where water and grass lead, living amid blood and fire. Yet if each claims kingship for himself, the tribes will fracture, the steppe will splinter.
>
> Today, upon the shores of this great Qinghai Lake, I, in the name of the Queen-Mother, declare: henceforth, this nation shall be called **Shar**, named for the sun and fire, and it shall never be changed.
>
> In the lands of Guanzhong, grain and livestock flourish. Any bankrupt herders may migrate to the wildlands with reindeer, enter the forests to hunt beasts, or remain in the Guanzhong plains to farm and herd. Life and death, choice and consequence, rest with you.
>
> The empire shall set no capital, no palace. Wherever the **Khan’s great tent** is pitched, there shall be the center of the world. The Khan bases himself in the Altai, commanding the empire’s military and civil affairs; yet the title of Khan passes neither from father to son nor brother to brother—only the truly accomplished may claim it.
>
> Military and civil officers are appointed by the edict of clouds, called ‘Cloud Masters.’ Their deputies oversee all nations, enforcing order across the lands.
>
> The brown bear is the totem of our tribe, dwelling north of Baikal. The forest is the land of freedom, the bear’s wilderness—not ours to command, nor part of human territory. Should you find the bonds unbearable, you may enter the wilderness and live alongside the bears.
>
> But any who dare claim kingship on their own, usurping the nation’s name, shall face the wrath of all armies united. Remember this.”

The tribal leaders by the lake fell silent as frost. Kodun’s words left no room for debate; they sounded like proclamations of the heavens rather than human law. Behind her stretched the highland army; before her, the lake shimmered, with no retreat in sight.

The great tent resounded with drums, bronze vessels clashing in unison, and oaths were offered with blood and wine to the lake. Thus, **the nation of Shar** was founded on the shores of Qinghai Lake, sworn by the brown bear, and all tribes were bound by its decree.









The Queen-Mother (Khatun) proclaimed the establishment of **the nation of Shar** on the shores of Qinghai Lake, installing the Altai Khan as the supreme executive officer. Once the assembly concluded, she immediately ordered the tribes to construct beacon towers at key mountain passes:

* **Altai, Tianshan, Kunlun, and Qilian Mountains**: serving as the empire’s four great barriers, each igniting the “defensive line” of the empire in sequence.
* **From east to west, from south to north**, the beacon towers responded to each other, forming an early-warning network spanning the steppes, deserts, and mountain ranges.
* The central hub was set at **Helan Mountains near Yinchuan**, the gateway to the western Yellow River and the throat between the Guanzhong Plain and the Western Regions. Once the beacon fires were lit, smoke signals could travel day and night for thousands of miles, directly reaching the Queen-Mother’s and Altai Khan’s military tents.

---

### Key Institutional Points

1. **Communication and Authority**

   * Any rebellion or external invasion could be immediately reported to the central command via beacon fires.
   * Kodun and the Khan need not reside in a fixed capital; relying on mobile armies and beacon communication, they could respond at any moment.

2. **Strategic Role of the Guanzhong Plain**

   * Serving as the grain reserve, heavily garrisoned, not only supplying the empire’s forces but also acting as the last line of defense against rebellion or foreign threat.

3. **Psychological and Symbolic Function**

   * Beacons lighting up the mountains sent a clear “warning” to all tribal leaders: although the imperial army lacked a fixed capital, it possessed unmatched rapid response capability.
   * No rebellion could go unnoticed; once the smoke rose, the empire’s forces could assemble without delay.

---

This created a **hybrid polity of nomadic mobility + agricultural reserves + mountain communication network**. It solved the rigidity and slow reaction of settled civilizations while avoiding the collapse of nomadic tribes due to lack of provisions.







### Catastrophe of the Mid-Holocene Cold Event

The long-dormant giant beneath Mount Changbai abruptly awoke without warning. The earth thundered as the volcanic crater spewed fire and thick smoke for years on end. Ashes swept across the lands, blotting out the sun; the Northern Hemisphere, already in autumn, was instantly plunged into a bitter winter.

Snow fell from the sky, mingled with volcanic ash and sulfur, forming an ominous **black snow**. The black snow blanketed pastures and farmland, withering grasses and acidifying rivers. The soil became sulfured, unable to sustain even a blade of grass. Cattle and sheep that drank the water died instantly; corpses lay in heaps, rotting and stinking across the plains.

The herds that nomads relied upon for survival collapsed overnight. Bankruptcy spread like a storm. They were forced to drive away the remaining livestock, carry the elderly and children, and head south in search of shelter. The **Guanzhong Plain**, located in a temperate river valley with abundant grain stores, became the only oasis capable of accommodating large numbers of refugees. Waves of destitute pastoralists surged in, threatening the fragile order of the plains.

Meanwhile, the disaster reached far west. The grasslands beyond the Ural Mountains also fell into desolation. Cold and black snow drove pastoralist groups from their lands. The ancestors of the **Vikings**, facing desperate circumstances, left their homes and migrated eastward. They crossed the barren plains, following grassland corridors into the **Altai Mountains** and **Hindu Kush Mountains**, seeking new refuges and pastures.

* The **Guanzhong Plain**, now swollen with refugees, became the empire’s new “population crucible,” sharply increasing pressure on food supplies and social order.
* **Altai and Hindu Kush** saw their original colonial structures disrupted by incoming groups, intensifying tensions and competition among clans.
* The **northern steppes and forests** gradually emptied, becoming the “lands of black snow,” inhabited only by bears, wolves, and wild deer—an unclaimed wilderness beyond the empire.

This cold event acted like an invisible giant hand, pushing herders, farmers, and hunter-gatherers from across the lands together, forcing them to redefine survival and social order at key nodes such as Qinghai Lake, Guanzhong, and the Altai Mountains.








In the dense forests of the Greater Khingan Mountains, the Tungusic tribes stood for a long time at the edge of the snow. That caravan vanishing into the northern wind—reindeer, horses, humans dragging sleds—gradually shrank into a dark speck in the storm, until it completely dissolved into the horizon. They had gone, taking with them the old oaths and exchanges, taking with them the only language capable of explaining sky and earth.

The wind roared like iron, night fell too soon, and the sun seemed to have been swallowed by some immense maw. The volcanic fields of Mount Changbai erupted continuously. The mountains split like torn ribs, lava rolling forth as rivers of blood and fire, shooting from the darkness straight into the sky. The fiery glow reddened the heavens, illuminating the terrified faces of the Tungusic people.

People wailed, believing the sun had fallen into the volcano, that the firmament itself had collapsed. Only the shamans shouted madly, declaring it was not the end of the world, but the **Mystic Bird** unfurling its wings from the molten rock. In their visions, enormous black wings tore open the sky, feathers aflame, lifting the sun from its descent.

**The eagle and the lava were equated that night.**
The eagle’s piercing gaze, the fire’s scorching breath, were molded by the shamans into a new deity—the Mystic Bird (black with red, lava incarnate; a proto-phoenix reborn in fire). It became both servant and mother of the sun, perched atop the volcano, lifting the sun in its ascent and descent. Henceforth, the sun was no longer master of the sky, but a child nurtured from Changbai’s molten veins.

Fear transformed into fervor, fervor into ritual. People cast eagle feathers, ashes of fire, and sacrificial blood into the crater, praying that the Mystic Bird’s wings might restore the sun. Between the volcano’s roaring, the chants shook the earth. The tribe fell into collective ecstasy, as if each cry could coax the light to rise from the lava.

Amid the firelight and howls, the leader slowly stood. Draped in scorched eagle feathers, his forehead smeared with volcanic ash and red, he faced the people. They cried: “Yan! Yan! Yan…”

He raised his hand toward the volcanic throat:

> “The sun has returned here! The Mystic Bird guards our tribe! I am the Flame Emperor, child of the lava, master of fire!”

With this proclamation, all blame was cast upon the nomads. They had taken the old path of the sun; they had brought the omen of darkness. The Tungusic people burned their fears, forging a new myth, turning the departing nomadic culture into a symbol of enmity, directing their wrath southwest—toward the Tibetan Plateau.

They had truly become independent.
No longer reliant on foreign songs or trade, no longer seeking validation from other gods.
The volcano was the sun.
The Mystic Bird was their faith.
The Flame Emperor was the sole king.







By the shores of Qinghai Lake, the wind howled like a horn.
Tribal leaders stood shoulder to shoulder in the biting cold.
Nomads of the Altai Plateau, eyes steadfast;
Herders of the Hindu Kush, cloaked in snow;
The northern seafarers, forebears of the Vikings, golden hair draped over their shoulders—
All revered the Queen Mother, deliberating on the tides of human fate.

A decade of volcanic ash still lingered in the northern sky.
The Changbai volcanic fields erupted without cease;
Northern pastures had become sulfide wastelands,
Rivers dark as ink, winds sweeping ash and snow in relentless tides.

In the middle reaches of the Yellow River, the cold winter had long frozen the waters.
Ice bridges connected to the Guanzhong Plain.
Great herds of surviving cattle and sheep were driven onward,
Treading the frozen rivers toward the mountain-ringed basin.
Though cold, Guanzhong’s soil was less sulfide-laden.
Here, the bankrupt herders arrived,
Replicating the labor patterns of the ancient oasis civilizations,
Half-farming, half-pastoral, clinging to survival.

“The northern grasslands are dead; cattle cannot survive.
Any livestock drinking river water will be poisoned.
Valley villages lie abandoned, grain rots,
People are displaced, and the future of our children is bleak.”
—Altai Khan spoke with gravity.

“Though the Changbai flames have ceased, ash still drifts,
Rivers acidified, lakes fading in life.
Without new means of survival, our tribes will perish.”
—The chief of the Hindu Kush tribes added.

“Our boats cannot navigate the icy rivers; catches dwindle,
Game is scarce; if we do not migrate south, our families cannot endure.”
—The voices of the Viking ancestors echoed across the lake.

The Queen Mother was silent, her gaze piercing the mist over Qinghai Lake.
She knew that no one could survive the northern catastrophe alone;
Only strategy could preserve tribes and civilization.

“People of the tribes,” she spoke slowly,
“The Tibetan Plateau still holds fertile pastures; watercourses remain;
Hope for survival is not yet extinguished.
The Guanzhong Plain can shelter the bankrupt,
Let them labor the fields in rotation to maintain the foundation;
But for our core tribes,
We must breed horses hardy to the cold,
Using horses as wings, alliances as nets,
To reconstruct order and withstand the northern wind.”

The leaders bowed in silent consent; the heartbeats of all tribes merged amid the wind and snow.
From that day, cold-resistant horses were carefully bred,
Bloodlines mingled, strength and wisdom combined.
A thousand years later, they would be called Mongolian horses, galloping across the steppes.

Whispered truth:
A crisis gave rise to stratification and selective breeding.
Guanzhong became the land of labor;
The grasslands nurtured the kernel of order.
Thus, the embryo of a future empire was born.








**Night Feast by Qinghai Lake**

Deep into the night, the wind howled across Qinghai Lake. Within the Queen Mother’s tent, lamps cast a dim, amber glow, while guards stood at attention outside, spears in hand.

In the bronze brazier, charcoal blazed brightly, sending the aroma of roasting lamb leg into the air. Attendants brought two identical plates of food: **glazed roasted lamb leg**, a bowl of **milky wine**, a plate of **stir-fried eggs with chives**, and finally, a plump **red apple**.

Khatun raised her hand, signaling all others to withdraw, leaving only Altai Khan. She personally lifted one of the bronze plates, walked to his table, set it down, and took her own seat. The crisp clink of the bronze echoed in the tent, lending a solemn gravity to the moment.

She spoke softly:
**Khatun:** “Land is scarce, yet our people grow… What shall we do? The Sichuan Basin is separated from the eastern Guanzhong mountains, unable to hold more tribes. But beyond those mountains, there must be land—how much, and how far, we do not know. What are your thoughts?”

Altai Khan paused mid-cut, the bronze knife hovering over the lamb, and pondered briefly:
**Altai Khan:** “If the land is insufficient, I could lead our army south, seize the Sichuan Basin, and drive out the natives.”

Khatun shook her head, raising the bowl of milky wine and gently swirling it, the scent wafting:
**Khatun:** “The heat and humidity there, the swarms of mosquitoes, would consume our soldiers faster than any enemy. Our people endure cold, endure thin air—but the wet heat and miasma will only lead warriors to die in vain. Death by sword or spear can be mourned and honored; death by poison and fever brings no glory.”

A brief silence fell, broken only by the wind rustling past the tent’s canvas.

Altai Khan lifted his gaze, meeting her eyes steadily:
**Altai Khan:** “Then there is no need to rush south. I will assemble an expedition, venturing out to seek land. If the eastern lands are indeed vast, they will become the foundation of our future. Give me warriors and banners, and I will tread the unknown with them.”

Khatun glanced at him, slowly set down the apple, and whispered:
**Khatun:** “Go. Territory and order must always be discovered in the cracks of the earth.”








The firelight flickered inside the tent, the fat from the roasting lamb leg sizzling. Khatun cut a slice with the tip of her knife, chewed slowly, yet did not speak immediately. After a long pause, she suddenly turned to Altai Khan, her voice barely above a whisper:

**Khatun:** “Those fair-haired, blue-eyed people, crossing the grasslands in search of refuge… what shall we do? If they are left to wander freely, sooner or later they will become a liability.”

Altai Khan set down his wine bowl, fingers lightly tapping the edge of the bronze plate, and spoke gravely:
**Altai Khan:** “Khatun, if they are willing to accept our rites, sing the names of our gods, and intermarry with us, they can become allied peoples. We need not drive them out; rather, we should help them secure new land. **If outsiders can be settled, they are a bulwark, not a threat.**”

Khatun narrowed her eyes, as if gauging the edge hidden within his words.

Altai Khan continued:
**Altai Khan:** “South of the Hindu Kush lies humid, sweltering India. In the past, our warriors could only trade along the border, daunted by fever and scorching sun. Now, if this group of fair-haired, blue-eyed people dares to try, perhaps they can scout a path for us. If they truly learn to endure the wet heat, **then the Sichuan Basin will no longer remain forbidden.**”

The cold wind swept across the tent outside, lifting the flaps as if the heavens themselves were listening.

Khatun fell silent for a moment, then lifted the red apple and sliced it with her bronze knife, juice spilling over. She pushed half toward Altai Khan:
**Khatun:** “Then let them go. This half is yours, this half is mine. If they can tame the humid lands, both we and our descendants will share in the new territory.”

The bronze plate rang lightly; the half apple gleamed in the firelight, like a symbol of a new land yet to be claimed.










### Chapter II — Destruction, Absorption, Remolding

Spring winds thaw the land, snowmelt from the plateau feeding the rivers, grass tips glimmering green. **Altai Khan** stood outside his encampment on the shores of Qinghai Lake, his gaze stretching beyond distant mountains and waters, fixing upon an unknown continent far away. Spring was the season of movement and preparation—the prelude to conquest.

He ordered the reconnaissance cavalry to assemble, accompanied by **logistical units** tasked with food reserves, livestock transport, and the upkeep of tack and bows. Each detachment carried a fixed store of rations; livestock numbers were calculated with precision, ensuring that long marches would not sap strength through hunger or exhaustion.

Along the edges of the **Taihang Mountains** and the **Yanshan Mountains**, scouts spread across valleys, riverbeds, forests, and wastelands, searching for passages that could be crossed. They trod through lingering snow and ice, crossed lowlands and riverbeds, sketching invasion routes across an uncharted continent.

The extremes of climate were their trial. At night, bitter winds still swept the peaks; by day, the sun burned mercilessly. Yet for these nomads, born of pastures, such conditions forged them into an efficient war machine: **swift assembly, dispersed cover, nocturnal marches, sudden assaults.** Each rider was at once an archer, a scout, and a healer of beasts; each unit, a miniature engine of war.

Within his tent, **Altai Khan** studied maps and reconnaissance reports with care:

* The mountain passes were few—secure them first, and any defense could be divided and encircled.
* Grasslands and valleys could serve as rallying points—or as traps for ambush.
* Harsh climates were no barrier but a sieve: only the most resilient forces would endure, ensuring maximum efficiency in seizing the lands of others.

Spring sunlight fell upon tents and horses, carrying the dampness of thaw and the scent of fresh grass. Yet the calm was but a façade. Beyond, the unknown continent awaited—to be destroyed, absorbed, and remolded. The cavalry of **Altai Khan** stood ready, armed with the speed, discipline, and violence of the steppe, to draw that land into their order.









Late spring, in the valleys of the **Hindu Kush Mountains**, **Altai Khan** stood upon a high platform, overlooking the vast army assembled below. On either side of the valley, dozens of banners whipped in the wind, each representing the honor of a tribe, a clan, a lineage.

This campaign was not to be waged by nomadic cavalry alone. To lay roads and establish supply lines, **Altai Khan** summoned the **Viking tribes**—long intermarried with the Altai nomads. By now, they bore pale skin, black curls, and blue eyes, later remembered as the prototypes of the Persians and Aryans.

**Altai Khan** made them a promise:

* The lands of the oasis civilizations would belong to the **Viking tribes** as their dominion.
* The slaves, captives, and spoils of conquest would belong to the Altai nomads.

With his command, tens of thousands of horse-drawn chariots and mounted warriors surged into the valleys and onto the plateaus. Slave battalions laid temporary roads, built wooden bridges across rivers, hauled grain and weapons, sustaining the front lines. Mountain winds swept up dust; hooves shattered ice and grass, carving tracks toward the unknown.

The host advanced along the Hindu Kush toward the Iranian Plateau. The oasis cities, raised by water, were caught unprepared, their natives forced to abandon their homes. **Altai Khan** decreed: because the oasis resources were scarce, the natives could not remain. Captured warriors were marched back eastward, bound for labor and supply duties; women and children were driven to the desert’s edge, banished from fertile soil.

Chariots thundered, cavalry surged like a tide. The army pressed through valleys, crossed wastelands, steadily devouring the defenses of the oasis world. Each battle, each conquest, was but a reflection of the cycle: **destruction, absorption, remolding.** The old order was crushed beneath hooves; land and resources were redistributed; and a new order took shape, forged in blood and sweat.








Late autumn on the **Qinghai–Tibet Plateau**: morning fog hung like gauze, frost clung to the grass tips. **Khatun** sat at the center of her command tent, her gaze fixed through the flap toward the snow line outside, as she listened to the reports from the reconnaissance units returning from the eastern front in East Asia.

The scouts, moving east along the **Taihang Mountains**, reported:

* The **lower Yellow River** was no longer a surging river, but an expanse of continuous wetlands.
* Nearly a hundred tribes lived within the marshes, skilled in fishing and hunting, dwelling upon raised platforms, and building vast irrigation systems to channel waterways into their fields.
* Military activity was scarce—no signs of large standing armies.
* North of the wetlands stretched a broad plain, densely planted with millet, forming the foundation of their grain reserves.

Khatun murmured in thought:
**Khatun**: “If the chariots are to cross the Taihang Mountains, vast numbers of slaves must first lay the roads. The narrow passes are perfect for ambush; a reckless advance could cost the entire army.”

The scouts continued their report:

* On the eastern side of the **Yanshan Mountains**, they had found a natural gap, yet it led into the wetlands. Chariots could not pass directly; only by boats could troops and supplies be ferried across.
* Though the wetland tribes lacked great armies, their raised dwellings and irrigation works made the swamps themselves into a natural fortress.

Khatun lit the incense burner upon the table. Smoke curled upward as she spoke in a low, commanding voice:
**Khatun**: “Secure the mountain passes first. Only with safe roads can the army move. The wetlands may lack an army, but the terrain is perilous—we must proceed with caution. Ready the boats, to detour or to carry our supplies as needed.”

The autumn wind rustled the withered grass outside the tent, carrying with it the chill of the valleys. It reminded every nomadic rider: the conquest of unknown lands is not only a contest of strength, but also a trial of wisdom and strategy.









The following summer, **Altai Khan** returned to **Qinghai Lake** with his vast cavalry host and tens of thousands of slaves. Between the tents, horse hooves stirred up dust; flocks of sheep and stores of grain followed in orderly ranks. On the lakeshore, **Khatun** personally came forth to greet him. Together they reviewed the reconnaissance reports and the supply plans.

When the meeting concluded, Khatun withdrew once more to the Tibetan Plateau, while Altai Khan turned his gaze toward the great wetlands of the **middle Yellow River**. His decision was clear:

* Wait until the summer floods of the Yellow River had receded, then in autumn lead the army across.
* In the meantime, resettle tens of thousands of slaves along the middle Yellow River to begin constructing **inflated sheepskin rafts**. The hides, tightly bound, inflated, and fixed, would form buoyant units beneath each raft. These units could then be bound together into floating bridges, strong enough to carry chariots and cavalry in full formation.

When the autumn winds rose, the river’s waters fell, broad and placid. Dozens of **sheepskin raft bridges** now spanned the river at the Helan Mountain gap, each tended by hundreds of slaves to ensure the passage of wagons.

Upon the river, morning mist curled. The floating bridges stretched like silver serpents. From his command platform, **Altai Khan** surveyed the entire host:

* **Tens of thousands of cavalry** stood in precise formation, the war chariots aligned in columns and ranks.
* Slaves and attendants moved along both sides of the bridges, steadying the passage and maintaining the supplies.
* The wind lifted dust into the air; hooves struck the rafts with crisp echoes, like the prelude to a war drum.

At Altai Khan’s command, the first chariots rumbled onto the floating bridge. The river lapped gently against the sheepskin hulls below. One after another, chariots and riders surged forward, the entire army crossing in magnificent order into the **Guanzhong Plain**. The mingled sounds of water, hooves, and grinding axles poured forth like a flood, heralding the arrival of a highly disciplined nomadic force poised to press its order and might into the fertile wetlands.

The autumn sunlight glinted off the river’s surface and across the horses’ backs, flashing against iron armor and fluttering banners. The bridges swayed faintly, yet they bore the full weight of conquest—the resolve to **destroy the old order, absorb lands and peoples, and reshape them into a new imperial order**, soon to be unveiled on this new frontier.









Late autumn, **Altai Khan** stationed his main army in the **Lantian** region. Between the tents, horses rested, supplies were neatly organized, and soldiers and slaves busied themselves with weapon maintenance and chariot inspections. This became the forward assembly point of the Guanzhong Plain and the strategic base for the future march into the eastern plains.

Advance units were dispatched east of the **Taihang Mountains**, tasked with constructing **fortresses and watchtowers** to prevent the wetland civilization from seizing mountain passes and blocking the army’s access to the eastern plains. Stone walls and earthen embankments quickly rose, guards rotated with precision, and warriors drilled within the valleys, familiarizing themselves with the terrain and preparing for any sudden conflicts.

Altai Khan patrolled the camp, issuing orders in a low voice:
*"All the grain in the Guanzhong Plain must be harvested to provide reserves for the chariot advance. The slaves must complete the road across the Taihang Mountain gaps before next spring to ensure the entire chariot corps can enter the eastern plains unimpeded."*

The slaves acted in organized groups:

* Some harvested mature millet, wheat, and pasture crops, transporting the grain to storage depots.
* Others laid roads through the gaps in the Taihang Mountains. Valleys and narrow passes were leveled; wooden beams and stones were carefully set to ensure the chariots could pass in formation.
* Commanders established temporary outposts at mountain passes to monitor construction progress and maintain security against sudden attacks.

At night, torches lit the ridges, illuminating the progress of the roadwork. The sounds of hooves and hammering stone echoed through valleys and gorges. Altai Khan stood atop a fortress, gazing toward the wetlands of the distant plains: **everything was ready—when the spring winds arrive, the chariots will surge into the eastern plains like a flood, destroying the old order, absorbing lands and populations, and reshaping the imperial hierarchy.**

Autumn winds swept leaves along the banks of the Yellow River, carrying with them the urgency of the coming strategic operations. Though the Guanzhong Plain was already inhabited, its grain, roads, and fortifications would serve as the solid foundation for the future conquest of the eastern wetland plains.







In the spring of the following year, warm winds swept through the camp. **Altai Khan** stood on a high platform, flanked by interpreters who relayed his words to the slaves and allied tribes. Thousands of eyes were fixed upon him, a mix of anticipation and anxiety.

**Altai Khan** spoke, his voice echoing through the valleys:
*"You have endured a long winter of training and road construction. Now, the opportunity has come. Anyone willing to take up arms and join the vanguard will be rewarded for their deeds."*

The interpreters carefully explained the rules:

1. **Freedom**: Anyone who eliminates two enemies will earn their freedom, leaving behind their status as a slave.
2. **Material Rewards**: Those who defeat five or more enemies will receive livestock, grain, and basic provisions in succession.
3. **Rituals and Oaths**: Military achievements must be publicly confirmed during tribal ceremonies, overseen by **Khatun**, ensuring each warrior’s merit is remembered.
4. **Spoils and Shares**: War prizes—including captives, supplies, livestock, and land-use rights—will be distributed according to contributions. Different tribes or slave units will receive shares proportional to their deeds.

Altai Khan added:
*"Your achievements determine not only your rewards but also the honor of your tribe and slave corps. The brave may rise to lead vanguard cavalry, commanding squads and participating directly in the next stage of the advance. All rewards and shares will be publicly announced at the ritual, so that the gods and all witnesses may see your deeds."*

The interpreters relayed each sentence, and the slaves exchanged glances, gradually nodding and whispering. Some clenched their fists, others muttered prayers, while many eyes shone with anticipation—**the promise of freedom and livestock, recognition of merit through ritual and war deeds, would transform slaves into loyal warriors**.

Altai Khan surveyed the camp with eagle-like eyes:
*"Whoever wishes to join the vanguard and charge with me will decide their own fate. The brave will shape history; the timid will remain in the camp, continuing to labor for the conquests of others."*

Hundreds of slaves volunteered after the speech, joining the vanguard. Each group was led by a tribal chief, following a clear hierarchy and rules for distribution:

* Tribal chiefs distributed captives and spoils based on tribal achievements.
* Slave units received freedom or livestock rewards according to individual deeds.
* Military merit was officially recorded and confirmed by priests during the ritual to ensure fairness and symbolic honor.

The camp buzzed with a tense and exhilarating energy. Spring winds swept through the valleys, as if foretelling the chariots and vanguard units soon charging along the prepared roads into the eastern plains—**to destroy the old order, absorb resources, and reshape a new hierarchy**.







In early summer, mist clung to the foothills of the Taihang Mountains. At **Altai Khan**’s command, the massive army surged forth from camp, advancing slowly eastward. Chariots rumbled, hooves thundered, and tens of thousands of cavalry and slave units marched in orderly ranks. Flags snapped in the mountain wind, stretching like a great dragon winding through the valleys.

The vanguard bore the heaviest burden. Under the guidance of translators and military clerks, they felled forests. Trees crashed to the ground, logs were split and trimmed, and flames swept through the undergrowth, exposing wide swathes of bare earth. Thick smoke spiraled into the sky—a sign that a new order was being forcibly carved out upon the old forest.

**Fortress Construction**

* Slaves on the frontlines labored day and night, digging deep foundations.
* Massive timber poles were sharpened and driven into the ground, forming high walls in concentric layers.
* Interlaced wooden palisades were stacked inside and out, filled with heavy earth to prevent fire attacks.
* Broad flat areas were reserved in the center for command tents and military supply depots.

The fortress was designed not merely for garrisoning troops, but as a **fallback point if the army faced setbacks on the wetland plains, a place to regroup and recover**. This was Altai Khan’s signature tactic—before entering unfamiliar land, leave a wedge firmly embedded like an iron nail in the enemy’s border.

**Logistical Support**

Herders drove flocks of cattle and sheep along with the army, like mobile granaries.

* **Cattle and Sheep**: Slaughtered as needed for food, milk, and leather.
* **Dried Meat**: Soldiers carried several pounds in their packs—easy to store and convenient on the march.
* **Fermented Milk Wine**: Poured into goatskin waterbags, potent and warming—quenching thirst and warding off the chill of night.
  Soldiers often chewed dried meat while marching, washing it down with the strong, tangy wine. Only this sharp, creamy flavor could quell the unease before the battles to come.

In the valleys, axes struck timber, metal clanged on metal, and soldiers’ shouts blended with herders’ calls—a rough, martial song of the march. Under the banners, Altai Khan gazed at the peaks of the Taihang Mountains, eyes burning with fierce ambition—**beyond these ridges lay the unconquered wetland plains and fields of millet**.







In summer, the valleys were thick with humidity, and swarms of mosquitoes attacked cattle, sheep, and soldiers alike. For the nomads, the deadliest threat was not swords or spears, but this silent pestilence. **Altai Khan** ordered fires to be set around the camp; vast stretches of forest and brush ignited, flames crawling up the slopes, black smoke rising skyward. After the inferno, the vegetation lay in ashes, and the mosquitoes vanished.

Under the protection of the garrison, herders drove their cattle and sheep to the open valley for grazing, while soldiers patrolled day and night, guarding against surprise attacks by the native tribes. The air was thick with the mingled scent of scorched earth and fermented milk wine. The camp was heavy with tension. **Everyone awaited autumn**—for that was when the wetland civilization was most vulnerable.

---

### Autumn Assault

As autumn winds cooled and millet ripened, farmers of the wetland tribes harvested their crops, laying them across field ridges and riverbanks to dry. Then, from the hills, the sudden whinnying of warhorses erupted.

**Tens of thousands of chariot-drawn war vehicles** emerged slowly, their massive wheels crushing the earth. Banners snapped in the wind, a riot of colors rolling over the hills like waves. The once-quiet plains instantly resounded with the clash of drums and the blast of horns.

**Slave units** were pushed to the front, weapons raised as they surged into the fields, occupying drying yards and driving the fleeing wetland residents before them. Behind them, cavalry and chariots poured forward like an iron tide, harvesting millet and seizing granaries. Wherever they passed, villages burned and storehouses were emptied.

The momentum of the invasion swept across the land like autumn wind clearing fallen leaves—unstoppable.

---

### The Threat of the Wetlands

Yet as the army claimed vast tracts of land, the scene before **Altai Khan** stirred a subtle unease.

To the south stretched endless wetlands: mirrored marshes, dense reeds, and swirling mists. Hooves sank into the mud, chariot wheels barely moved. Occasionally, native dugout canoes darted through the waterways and vanished without a trace.

Altai Khan tightened his reins and stared across the shimmering waterline, a strange fear rising within him—**the advantage of cavalry was almost useless here**.

He immediately issued orders:

* The main army would hold the plains, controlling roads and farmland.
* Small detachments would patrol the boundaries, erect wooden palisades and signal towers to prevent raids by wetland residents.
* Cavalry were strictly forbidden from venturing into the wetlands.

Thus, the vast plains came under control, while the southern wetlands remained an unknown barrier.

Under the bear-banner, Altai Khan realized for the first time that conquest was not merely a straight, unimpeded charge. **Nature itself could be the most formidable enemy.**







**Second Year, Summer Flood Season**

The floods of the middle Yellow River arrived as expected, carrying the turbid silt from the mountains, surging downstream with unstoppable force. Vast waters spilled over the lowlands, and the wetlands expanded rapidly, like a gray-green maw, slowly yet inexorably devouring the once-solid boundaries.

The wooden palisades erected as a dividing line were swallowed section by section by the rushing waters, leaving only broken tops swaying amid the waves. The boundary between the plains and the wetlands was pushed seasonally northward.

Altai Khan immediately ordered the army to retreat to the fortresses on the highlands east of the Taihang Mountains. Within the camp, drums and horns sounded urgently, while soldiers hurriedly gathered supplies from the muddy grasslands. Remaining at the edge of the wetlands was too dangerous—if the natives struck amid the swollen waters, they could sever the army’s retreat through the network of streams, leaving tens of thousands trapped in mud and isolation.

Over the past six months, the land scorched by fire had slowly recovered; tender green shoots emerged, and the plains gradually became suitable for grazing and habitation. Yet the southern wetlands remained like a lurking shadow, stretching and receding with the seasons, a living adversary that could drag outsiders into the abyss at any moment.

The struggle between fire and water seemed poised to determine the course of the future.







As Altai Khan led his army to retreat to the fortresses, keeping watch over the wetlands, battle reports from the rear arrived in rapid succession. A pastoral tribe from the Greater Khingan Range had suddenly raised their banners in rebellion. They stormed the horse pastures of the Hulunbuir Grasslands, seizing tens of thousands of fine horses. This emergent force then swept toward the outer regions of the middle Yellow River, occupying key routes and attempting to trap the nomadic army permanently within the Guanzhong Plain.

They were cunning, swiftly capturing several crucial watchtowers, which prevented timely signaling of the alarm, leaving the rear garrison slow to respond. Carried by the wind, proclamations rang out loudly: **“The steppe has a new master!”**

Inside the fortress, the generals exchanged uneasy glances, discussions swelling like a tide. Some urged an immediate march to reclaim the horse pastures, while others worried that remaining trapped on the plain would gradually exhaust their forces.

After a long silence, Altai Khan issued a cold decree:
“Maintain the garrison at the fortress. Those rebels are merely infantry who have just seized horses—they know nothing of herding, nothing of driving chariots. Their display may be grand, but their foundation is shallow; there is no need for rash action.”

This was his statement to others. In truth, Altai Khan understood perfectly well: even if he led the main army to reinforce the front, they would inevitably be blocked at the Helan Mountain gap, unable to cross the river. Hastily constructing a sheepskin raft bridge would risk destruction by the enemy on the far bank; waiting for the winter freeze would not guarantee passage either, as the rebels would labor night and day to cut the ice, allowing no advance.

Retreat or hold—both were dead ends.

Under the cover of night, he quietly summoned a few trusted aides and, over the map, traced mountains and rivers, his voice low and resolute:
“I will ascend the Yellow River myself to the Qinghai-Tibet Plateau in search of reinforcements. If I do not return, you must hold this place at all costs—burn provisions if necessary, but never abandon the fortress.”

At this moment, fire and water, betrayal and isolation intertwined, and Altai Khan had staked his fate upon the ceaselessly flowing Yellow River.







**Autumn Winds Rise, Smoke Signals Stir**

At the onset of autumn, watchfires flared across the Qinghai-Tibet Plateau, like a colossal dragon of flame stretching from the southwest, crossing the Kunlun Mountains, climbing to the Tianshan and Altai ranges, and reaching as far as the Hindu Kush and the Iranian Plateau. Flames connected, smoke signals chained together.

Summoned by the beacon fires, men and women from the grassland tribes enlisted. Those over fifteen, regardless of gender, donned sheepskin, took up bows and spears, and mounted horses or chariots. Those left behind were only the elderly and infants. Across the steppe, banners snapped in the wind, tens of thousands of horses thundered forward, and blood surged with the fire—almost as if the entire land itself echoed the war song.

Following the direction of the smoke, the vast army advanced eastward, striking directly toward the Helan Mountains. In less than a month, banners had spread to the edge of the Hulunbuir Grasslands, facing across the void toward the endless, shadowed forests.

The army arrayed itself, and it seemed as though the steppe fell entirely under the iron hooves. Yet when Altai Khan and Khatun ascended the high platform and gazed north toward the dense forests and mountains, they fell into long silence.

Khatun murmured:
“That is the land of the bears. Forests and mountains are not our strength. Even if our cavalry thunders, a direct assault would cost a sea of blood.”

Altai Khan fixed his gaze on the distance, eyes reflecting the ever-present mist within the forest, and spoke in a deep voice:
“Yes. The blades of the steppe are dull here. To destroy their nests would demand the sacrifice of several tribes.”

He paused, then turned to the generals and slave legions accompanying the army:
“If blood is paid with blood, the steppe will be emptied. This war cannot be prolonged—negotiation is the only way.”

Within the flickering light of the tents, Altai Khan and Khatun discussed the terms: the division of chariots and livestock, the ownership of horse pastures, and the boundaries of rivers and forests. From this moment, the worlds of the steppe and the forest sat at the same table, attempting for the first time to determine borders through words rather than bows and arrows.








Flames leapt within the tent, mingling with the scents of strong liquor and roasted meat, yet the atmosphere was heavy and tense. Outside, tens of thousands of horses waited silently, banners snapping in the night wind. Inside the tent, only the low, deliberate conversation would decide the fate of the steppe and the forest.

**Altai Khan** pressed his hand onto the map, pointing toward the vast wetlands to the east, his voice rough and resolute:
“We need them. That wetland in the New Land—there’s no way we can conquer it ourselves. Chariots would sink into the mud, cavalry could barely advance. To truly bring it under order, we must rely on their skill with water and forests. We’ll ‘outsource’ that land to them—let the pastoral tribes expand it, rather than exhausting our own bloodlines.”

**Khatun** stared silently at the map, her gaze icy, before speaking slowly:
“Then how do you intend to make them abandon rebellion? They have already declared themselves the ‘Yan Emperor,’ claiming the steppe as their own. To bring them back under order, at least they must feel on equal footing with us.”

Her finger traced across the Hulunbuir Grasslands on the map, her tone measured:
“Give them half a horse pasture, let them regain a place to raise their herds, in exchange for loyalty. Only if they have horses will they willingly dedicate their sons to the army.”

**Altai Khan** shook his head angrily, pounding his fist on the wooden table until the wine cups trembled:
“No! They have rebelled before. If we give them pastures, their bow infantry will become mounted archers. Then they will be untamable enemies, not vassals. Half of Hulunbuir? Never!”

His gaze turned to Khatun, voice low but firm:
“They must recognize the Queen Mother as the supreme ruler. As long as they are willing to honor you as the Mother of Heaven, I will sit alongside their Yan Emperor—but the chair I take must be lower than the throne of the Queen Mother.”

Silence filled the tent, broken only by the occasional thump of the sheepskin drum in the wind.

**Khatun** suddenly let out a light, clear laugh, tinged with coldness:
“Then you must paint them an illusion more alluring than the steppe. Make them believe that wetland is an Eden, a future worth entrusting their descendants to—more than any horse pasture. Heh… since we cannot give them pastures, we will give them a dream.”

In the firelight, the two exchanged a long look. Outside, banners snapped sharply in the night wind, as if even they waited for the outcome of this political negotiation.








The autumn grass had turned yellow, and the cold wind swept across the plains.

The two armies faced each other, cavalry arrayed along the border like an iron wall. The neighing of horses mingled with the clang of armor, banners snapping sharply in the twilight. Suddenly, the archers raised their bows in unison, and arrows whistled through the air—each shaft tied with a strip of vivid red cloth, like flames set aflame. The arrow formation fell, piercing the grass in a continuous line of glaring red, dividing the land into two distinct worlds.

**Khatun** and **Altai Khan** drove their chariot slowly to the edge of the red line and stopped. Attendants unfurled thick woolen carpets with practiced ease. Nearby, iron racks held whole sheep over the fire, flames licking the hides, fat sizzling, and the aroma of roasting meat wafting through the air. The two sat side by side, sipping milk tea, calm and composed, as if waiting for old friends in a family courtyard rather than the leaders of a rival army.

On the other side, the **Yan Emperor** stood before his own lines, laughing loudly. His voice carried across the battlefield on the wind. With a wave of his hand, his archers drew their bows once more, sending another volley of red-cloth arrows into the grass, marking a new scarlet boundary—an invitation written in blood.

The Yan Emperor had no attendants. He personally placed one sheepskin water bag filled with strong liquor after another onto the captured chariots. The liquor spilled, filling the air with a fiery scent. Alone, he drove his chariot forward, stopping between the two red lines. He did not advance further nor speak a word, his silence a challenge to his opponents.

**Khatun** and **Altai Khan** exchanged a glance and shook their heads lightly. After a moment of silence, they rose almost simultaneously, choosing not to remain on the imposing chariot but to walk across the battlefield. Attendants quickly rolled up the woolen carpets, packed up the cooking equipment, and fell in step behind them.

Their steps were slow but resolute, moving toward the ground between the two scarlet lines. Authority was not in the chariot, but in every inch of earth they traversed with steady, deliberate steps.








A fierce wind swept across the grasslands, making banners snap and flutter. The Yan Emperor sat atop his chariot, a sly smile playing at his lips, and spoke first:

**Yan Emperor:** “Friends from afar, you have brought roasted sheep—I’ve brought a whole cart of fine liquor.”

With a wave of his hand, he grabbed a few sheepskin wine bags and casually tossed them onto the woolen carpet across from him. The bags hit the ground with a loud *thud*, spilling a hint of sharp, spicy aroma.

**Khatun** raised her eyes, her voice icy: “Why rebel?”

The Yan Emperor laughed heartily, lifting a wine bag to drink deeply, the liquor running down his beard. He paid no mind to decorum, replying in a coarse voice:

**Yan Emperor:** “Drink first, talk later.”

**Altai Khan** and **Khatun** exchanged a deep glance.
**Altai Khan** said coldly: “Drunk? What is there to talk about then?”

The Yan Emperor suddenly hurled the half-empty bag to the ground, the impact resounding, and shouted:
“Only when we’re drunk can we truly talk!”

He then ordered his attendants to bring more sheepskin water bags, stacking them on the woolen carpet. Bag after bag fell, piling into a small mound, the rich scent of liquor filling the air, turning the battlefield into something resembling a tavern.

A cunning smile spread across the Yan Emperor’s face as he boomed:
“If it’s not enough, I’ll have them bring more.”

Khatun and Altai Khan felt a chill run through them. Their eyes met, and their thoughts aligned:
*He intends to get us drunk, carry us back to our tents, and make any negotiation impossible.*






**Khatun** suddenly reached out and drew a small knife from her attendant’s waist. The nearby attendants froze—this should have been their task, yet she took it upon herself.

She carefully sliced off a piece of lamb, richly marbled with fat, the glistening streaks catching the firelight. Then she roasted the tail fat over the flame until it sizzled, pouring the hot oil into a copper plate.

**Khatun** placed a portion in front of **Altai Khan**, her voice low: “Start with this.”
She then cut herself a portion, letting the fat slide down her throat—heavy and rich, yet forming a protective barrier in the stomach.

Only then did the attendants bring the carefully cut pieces on a silver platter to the **Yan Emperor**.

Her expression remained stern, and she spoke not a word. Her actions were not humility—they were **a quiet defense**.
—Only by first filling their own and **Altai Khan**’s stomachs with fat could they slow the alcohol’s rush into their bloodstream.

**Altai Khan** understood immediately, silently chewing the oily meat, occasionally glancing at the mound of wine bags piled like a small hill across from them.

The **Yan Emperor** laughed heartily, lifted a wine bag, and drank deeply, shouting:
“My wine is enough to make tens of thousands of soldiers drunk! If you can outdrink me, then we can talk today!”

But **Khatun** merely wiped the fat from her lips, her gaze calm as she watched the smoke rising beside the fire. A trace of cold calculation flickered in her eyes.
She was already planning in her mind: **This negotiation will not be decided by drinking alone.**








The attendants withdrew, and the winds of the steppe rose. Banners snapped in the distance, leaving only the three of them between the red lines.

**Khatun** spoke quietly, her voice cutting the silence like a blade:
“Are there too many people, and not enough resources to go around?”

She did not ask what he wanted—because she already knew she would not give it. The question was both a prelude and a trap.

The **Yan Emperor** threw back his head and laughed: “Do you think I should admit it, or deny it?”

**Altai Khan** frowned, running a hand through his mane, his tone edged with impatience: “You didn’t just bring a cart of wine, did you? Let’s talk about something real. We’ve discovered a new land—interested?”

The Yan Emperor’s laughter halted abruptly. He sifted through the pile of wine bags, picking out a few of lower strength, and handed them over personally:
“You can’t handle it, can you? Stopped here, between the steppe and the forested mountains. The terrain there is far more complex than this forest.”

He narrowed his eyes, as if seeing through their predicament:
“My men went east, and at the far end of the wetlands found a patch of land, surrounded on all sides by water. To the west lies a great mountain—its western reaches still shallow water. To take it, one must understand how to live with water.”

**Altai Khan** and **Khatun** exchanged glances, a silent sigh passing between them. Had the attendants still been present, even a drunken Yan Emperor would not have revealed a single key detail.

Finally, **Altai Khan** asked in a deep voice: “When do we move?”

The **Yan Emperor** answered with unflinching certainty: “Next summer. When the wetlands rise, my army can first secure the lands east of the great mountain, cutting off reinforcements from the natives. As for the alliance—this winter, my eldest son will marry your eldest daughter.”

**Altai Khan** could not contain his laughter, his wine-soaked bravado and pride bursting forth: “Then my eldest son will also marry your eldest daughter!”

The three of them looked at one another, their laughter lingering in the autumn wind. Yet within that laughter was the bite of wine, the sting of political scheming, and the taste of blood and fire yet to come.







After the meal, the three spoke only a few casual words about trivial matters. Their tone was light, yet they avoided touching on the core issues. Smoke from the fire drifted slowly in the autumn wind, mingling with the scent of grease from the woolen carpets and the aroma of milk tea. The camp was quiet, solemn in its stillness.

When the meal concluded, the three parted ways. **Altai Khan** and **Khatun** walked side by side toward the tents. The grass beneath their feet had been trampled to a dark brown from the long march. Their attendants, following subtle gestures, began gathering the remaining cooking utensils and scraps of lamb.

**Khatun** spoke quietly: “From his tone, it seems the pastoral tribes intend to make their authority hereditary.”

**Altai Khan** gazed across the wind-swept steppe, a cold light flickering in his eyes: “They are a settled civilization, seemingly destined to turn power into something inheritable. Father and son… they are destined to become enemies.”

He paused, his voice dropping even lower: “Our authority, by contrast, is like a cloud—formless. One must prove by strength whether one is worthy of it. That will never change.”

The autumn wind swept across the ground, stirring the dry grass. Far off, the faint glow of signal fires seemed to foreshadow a coming storm of power. **Khatun** turned her gaze toward him and nodded slightly, understanding in her heart: this path is full of uncertainty, yet it embodies the eternal law of the nomadic order—strength rules, and authority is like a cloud.

They continued along the camp’s narrow path, their footsteps blending with the wind. Night deepened, yet their figures appeared more resolute and defined against the darkened landscape.








Inside the tent, bathed in the firelight, **Altai Khan** and **Khatun** sat at high positions. In front of them lay copper plates and sheepskin scrolls, recording the deeds of each tribe and slave legion. Surrounding them, clan leaders, strategists, herders, and soldiers held their breath in anticipation. The wind stirred the tent, flags rustled softly, and the air carried the mingled scent of heat and smoke.

**Altai Khan** cleared his throat and announced in a strong voice:
“On this campaign, military merits have been duly recorded. Today, we award those merits—each tribe and each slave legion shall receive rewards according to their achievements!”

Immediately, the clerks tallied the numbers and deeds inscribed on the copper plates: the collective merits of each tribe were recorded separately—defending forts, opening roads, protecting supplies, seizing strategic passes. **Khatun** added:
“As for the slave legions, your individual performance will determine your fate. Those who defeat two enemies shall earn their freedom; those who defeat five or more shall additionally receive cattle and sheep to sustain their lives.”

Low murmurs of astonishment and joy spread through the tent. The names written on the copper plates were read aloud one by one. Soldiers and slave warriors stepped forward from either side of the tent, bowing to **Altai Khan** and **Khatun** as they received their rewards.

A young slave legion soldier, his eyes still dusted with the battlefield’s grime, felt his heart race as his name was called—he had defeated three enemies and earned his freedom. Stepping out of the tent, he stood on the grassland for the first time as a free man. Behind him, comrades received rewards according to their deeds. A few slaves who had defeated five or more enemies were granted several cattle and sheep, their shoulders draped with woolen cloaks, eyes firm and proud.

**Altai Khan** surveyed the gathering, his voice deep and commanding:
“From this day forward, some of you have become free, while others must continue in service. Remember—true freedom comes from strength and courage. Those who earn freedom must not forget their roots; you are to safeguard the order and the tribes.”

**Khatun** added beside him:
“Remember, your achievements belong not only to yourselves, but to your tribes and to the entire nomadic order. Today’s awards recognize the brave and remind everyone—strength and loyalty are the only passports in this land.”

The wind gradually stilled in the tent, the flags hanging high. Slave warriors and soldiers marched back across the grasslands, each carrying their freedom or livestock, hearts filled with anticipation for the future. The rites had not yet begun, but the air already brimmed with the scent of victory and order.







After the ceremony of rewards, Altai Khan and Khatun ordered the construction of an altar. The wind swept up the loess along the middle reaches of the Yellow River. Outside the tent, herders and soldiers laid out wide platforms of yak hides, erected sacred pillars with wooden stakes, and adorned them with antlers, horsehair, and metal plates. In the center of the altar stood copper wine vessels and clay bowls filled with sheep’s blood and fermented milk, surrounded by blazing fires that cast their glow on every face.

Altai Khan lifted the copper vessel and spoke to the heavens:
“Heaven and earth bear witness! Today’s deeds, sealed in blood and fire! All who have struck down enemies shall earn freedom and reward; all who have guarded the tribes shall be immortalized in history!”

Khatun stood beside him, holding a long woolen banner, slowly rotating it. The wind made the banner whistle:
“Our descendants will remember today’s heroes. Their names will ride the flames and the wind, becoming legendary songs to teach future generations how to guard the nomadic way with courage, wisdom, and loyalty.”

The ritual began. Freed members of the slave legions stepped forward to the altar, hands gripping war knives—symbols of the chains they had severed. Soldiers who had defeated five enemies offered cattle and sheep. Flames licked the altar as smoke curled into the sky. Khatun softly recited ancient prayers, blessing each newly freed warrior. In the firelight, the faces of herders, soldiers, and slave legion members alike were imbued with a dignity that transcended life and death.

Altai Khan gazed over the assembly, voice deep and solemn:
“Your freedom and rewards are not gifts, but proof of your strength. Every cow and sheep, every parcel of land, every honor—you have paved the way with your sweat and blood.”

Khatun lifted a horn cup and slowly poured fermented milk onto the altar:
“Heaven and earth bear witness! The brave and the loyal are recognized today. Those who return to order will provide the source for the myths and epic songs of the nomadic army.”

The ritual continued amidst fire and smoke, the wind carrying flames skyward like a river of stars set alight across the grasslands. Inside and outside the tents, tribal members softly chanted ancient war songs, their echoes resonating across plains and valleys—a sacred acknowledgment of individual merit and collective honor in the nomadic civilization.

That night, the wind of the Yellow River and the firelight together recorded every freed warrior, every hero, every spoil, and every tale of conquest. The nomadic army had not only completed its campaign of conquest, but also consecrated order and honor, solidifying Altai Khan and Khatun’s rule while making the freedom and courage of the slave legions an eternal memory.








As the ritual concluded, Altai Khan ordered each tribe to receive their rewards according to merit. Freed members of the slave legions, shoulders draped with war knives and woolen cloaks, stepped out of the tents, their eyes glinting like a newly born sky. Each received their allotted cattle and sheep, after which they were assigned to the tribe of their choosing. The herders welcomed them warmly, integrating them into daily tribal life.

A few individuals who received cattle and sheep became truly free. They were granted small pastures or flocks to drive themselves, taking on responsibility for breeding and protection. From that moment, their lives were no longer defined by mere obedience; they had to exercise both wisdom and courage to manage wealth and sustain life.

Tribal leaders began redrawing territorial boundaries. Elders and Khatun’s emissaries calculated military merits within the tents: who had slain the most enemies at the vanguard, who had defended the borders effectively. Rewards were allocated proportionally. Every cow, every sheep, and every plot of land was recorded in the tribal ledger as a reference for the next year’s rituals and campaigns.

Altai Khan inspected the camps, reviewing the cavalry and war chariots. Herders drove cattle and sheep back onto the plains, soldiers organized their equipment, and horse-drawn chariots were repaired, polished, and painted. Flags were raised once more, marking each tribe’s honor. The newly freed members of the slave legions were assigned roles as sentinels, horse trainers, or guides, participating in the daily production and military activities of the tribes.

Khatun, at the center of the camp, discussed the newly established order with the elders:

* Each tribe must maintain posts along the borders of plains, mountains, and grasslands to prevent intrusion from outside tribes;
* Freed members of the slave legions who wish to participate in military actions must join the tribal organization and follow its command;
* Spoils of war are distributed according to military merit, ensuring individual interests are bound to tribal honor;
* Next year’s rituals and merit calculations will follow standardized procedures, creating a traceable historical record.

As night fell, fires across the Yellow River plains gradually dimmed, yet the freed warriors, herders, and soldiers softly chanted war songs and epic songs around the tents. The wind swept across the grasslands, and flags swayed gently in the night, each bearing honor, freedom, and responsibility.

In that moment, the nomadic army had not only completed its conquest and distributed rewards, but had also allowed order to take root within the tribes. Freed warriors were integrated, herders continued pasturing, soldiers maintained their war chariots, and Altai Khan and Khatun’s rule was steadily reinforced through rewards, rituals, and daily governance. This was a reconstruction of order following military action—a profound practice of power, freedom, and honor within the nomadic civilization, and the foundation for even greater campaigns to come.








In the winter of the following year, Altai Khan and Khatun sat in their tent by Qinghai Lake, the firelight casting a warm glow across their faces. Military observers from the stationed herding tribes had just returned with their report.

“Ten tribes have spent the entire winter cutting timber and building ships,” the observer reported in a low voice. “They plan to invade the lands east of Taishan via waterways in the summer.”

Khatun furrowed her brow. “Are they planning to build a city?”

The observer nodded. “Yes. A high platform has been planned along the southeastern coast of Taishan, named Ten-Day City. They killed all males over ten years old, claiming that ‘population is order,’ leaving only women and children to quickly adapt to the new rule.”

Altai Khan slowly sipped his milk wine, his gaze deep and contemplative. “This means they are attempting to establish a completely restructured order, eliminating the core forces of the old order entirely, keeping only the population capable of adapting to the new rules.”

“They also have water buffalo,” the observer continued. “They are trying to domesticate them for transport and agriculture, while clearing crocodiles from the western wetlands of Taishan, creating safe zones for the new settlement.”

Khatun spoke softly, “Their strategy is clear—population and resource restructuring, military, agriculture, and ecology integrated. But their methods are extreme. If we intervene, we must decide whether to act now or wait until their new order is established before integrating it into our system.”

Altai Khan remained silent for a long moment before speaking. “Let them proceed. The lands east of Taishan are not our priority for now. We will mainly observe, prepare, and ensure that the new order does not become a threat in reverse.”

Khatun nodded. “Record every movement. The placement of women and children, the domestication of water buffalo, the clearing of wetlands—these are all key data for integrating the new order in the future.”

Outside the tent, the cold wind howled, and the lake surface was frozen, but Altai Khan and Khatun’s eyes burned like torches. This time, they were in no hurry to conquer; instead, they incorporated the evolution of their adversary’s order into their long-term strategic calculations.








Inside the tent, the fire flickered gently, casting dancing shadows across the walls. Altai Khan and Khatun had dismissed all attendants and aides; only the two of them remained, the air tinged with faint scents of tobacco and wool.

Khatun spoke slowly, her voice deliberate: “Is it truly necessary to conquer as much territory as possible? War to sustain war is endless. Do you ever consider the exhaustion it brings?”

Altai Khan paused in thought, then replied in a low voice: “Land is finite, and usable land even more so. Even if we conquer, not all territory is worth holding. Mountains, wetlands, forests… the cost of administration is extreme, and garrisoning and logistics are enormous drains.”

Khatun nodded. “If we hand the high-cost lands to allied tribes of the same culture, they can manage them themselves, settle there long-term, maintain order, and sustain production. We only need to ensure the safety of trade caravans and allow low-cost passage.”

Altai Khan smiled. “War should not be about infinite expansion, but about systemic operation. Conquest is not measured in quantity, but in maximizing efficiency. Each parcel of land must yield its value while avoiding overextension of human resources.”

Khatun added, “Allied tribes can handle defense, maintain trade, transport, and cultural exchange. We only need to control key nodes and strategic points, holding the core of the network; the rest can flow freely.”

Altai Khan nodded. “It is like an order in the clouds—stable at the core, fluid at the periphery. The purpose of war is not to devour, but to maintain the long-term operation of the entire system.”

They exchanged a glance. The silence inside the tent was softly filled by the fire’s warmth. Outside, the cold wind howled, but within, the air was heavy with their meticulous thoughts, like a calm lake surface hiding a restless undercurrent.







Time passed swiftly, a hundred years slipping by like an arrow, and over that century, the empire’s territory gradually expanded under strict order and institutional control. The pastoral tribal confederations used domesticated water buffalo as transport beasts, occupying the vast wetlands of the lower Yellow River. The water buffalo became not only powerful tools for transportation but also indispensable laborers for reclamation and cultivation.

The wetlands of the lower Yellow River were divided and managed by the pastoral tribal confederations. Each tribe took turns sending slaves to reinforce dikes and manage the waterways. What had once been uncontrollable silt and flooding was now a regulated resource. Annual, cyclical breaches were systematized—slaves were required to follow precise plans to carve newly formed wetlands into river channels, and convert parts of the land into arable fields. Sediment deposition, riverbed elevation, and flood overflows were all incorporated into a long-term labor cycle and governance system.

Over the course of a hundred years, ten pastoral tribal confederations endured countless wars of annexation and alliances, eventually merging into a vast tribal conglomerate with a unified command and resource allocation system. Utilizing the labor of the indigenous slaves, they transformed the southern wetlands of the lower Yellow River into arable land, establishing a stable agricultural production zone. The northern lands of the lower Yellow River remained under the control of the nomadic tribes, preserving pastures, horses, and military stock.

Thus, the empire’s territory expanded north of the Huai River. South of the Huai, excessive humidity allowed the indigenous population to adapt, but nomadic and pastoral tribes could not maintain long-term settlements, creating a natural barrier beyond which the empire did not advance.

Throughout this century-long cycle, the Yellow River was more than a boundary—it was a laboratory for imperial governance. Year after year, sediment settled, floods breached dikes, lands were reclaimed, and rivers were channeled, forming a systematized ecological labor cycle. Slaves, laborers, and tribal warriors moved between rivers and wetlands, their labor not only sustaining the empire’s food supply but also shaping the grand patterns of human interaction with nature.









*Another hundred years passed. The prairie fires flickered once more, and new conversations unfolded beneath the night sky.*

**Khatun:**
“How do we truly define the strong and the weak? Are the descendants of the strong destined to remain strong?”

**Elder Shaman:**
“On the steppe, strength and weakness are determined solely by will, never by bloodline. The battlefield does not distinguish between men and women, nor does it care if muscles are massive. In our wrestling—Bökh—only results matter. Even the largest man can be thrown to the ground in an instant by a seemingly delicate woman. Remember: when someone endlessly boasts of their ancestors’ glory, they have already proven that they possess no strength of their own—they are weak.”

**Khatun:**
“That means among our descendants, some will inevitably lack resolve, fearing risk. How should we select or expel such offspring? If we do not screen them, what will happen?”

**Elder Shaman:**
“If a civilization only reproduces endlessly without a mechanism of renewal, it is like a cow that eats grass without ever excreting. It will grow bloated, rot, and eventually suffocate. Animals must excrete; civilizations must metabolize as well. Renewal is not cruelty—it is the law of survival. If those who fear risk are not driven out, their weakness will spread like a plague, until the entire tribe forgets how to ride freely across the steppe.”







### **“Eden Project” Qinghai Lake Assembly**

Night draped the sky, and Qinghai Lake mirrored the stars like a black glass. The scent of bonfires, cattle, sheep, and warhorses mingled with the cold lake air. The feast’s fire roared above head height, and the aroma of meat in bronze cauldrons drifted with the wind. The newly appointed **Khatun**, as the Mother Queen, sat upon the high platform, adorned with waterfowl feathers and a bronze belt. She summoned representatives from the Altai nomadic tribes to the north, the Tungusic pastoral groups to the east, and the distant Viking-Aryan branch from the west.

**Khatun** (rising, raising her cup, her voice like thunder yet softened by maternal warmth):
“Brave warriors, scions of all tribes, today at Qinghai Lake, we gather not merely to honor a century of conquest, but to forge a new paradise—**Eden**.

The wetlands stretching southeast of Mount Tai are where we shall build cities and establish our works. This will not be a steppe for warhorses to gallop across, but an eternal city of stone and timber. Safe, fertile, self-sustaining—like a mother’s embrace, it will shelter all descendants filtered by the plains. There will be rich fields, never-ending grain, and sanctuaries for generations to flourish.”

(She paused, scanning the assembly with a sharp gaze.)

“Yet understand this: **Eden is not designed for the strong.**
The steppe belongs to the adventurers, to those daring enough to chase new horizons. The pastoral tribes will serve as the intermediary bridge, governing this wetland civilization. They will guard, tame, and guide it in our stead.

From now on, the steppe will burn eternally beneath the sky—a flame of innovation, risk, and upheaval.
Eden, however, will be the place of excretion. Those sent to Eden shall never return to the steppe. Let them build, cultivate, and propagate there, forging a new face of civilization.”

(She slowly raised her hand, signaling the musicians to stop, the firelight casting shadows across her face.)

“We will grant them a new narrative—agriculture will be celebrated as the core of human civilization; the flame of the steppe will remain hidden, preserved only in our blood and will.

Thus, the brave and the weak each find their place, adventure and comfort each follow their path. The steppe shall never be burdened, and Eden shall become the abyss for our selection and renewal. There, descendants will grow complacent, entangle themselves, and be tamed by order.

And we shall forever ride toward new horizons!”

---

At that moment, the tent fell silent. The Tungusic shaman bowed his head in quiet. The Viking chieftain raised his horn in a roaring drink. Altai warriors exchanged glances, their eyes burning with a mixture of fear and excitement.

The bonfires crackled, as if witnessing an unprecedented divergence of civilizations.







### Chapter Three: *Charter of Civilizational Stratification*

**Preface**

A civilization without renewal is like a body that does not breathe;
without a lower tier to bear the load, the upper echelon merely hangs itself;
without elimination, there can be no continuation.

Civilization is not upheld by bloodline, but established by order;
hierarchy is not granted by fate, but forged through trials.
This charter defines responsibilities by strata, grants authority by responsibility, and speaks through delegated powers.

---

1. **No Stratum Shall Overstep**
   Each must remain in its place; transgression leads to demotion.

2. **Rules for Political Deliberation**
   Only those endowed with the “Codex of Qualifications” may speak on governance.

3. **Merit Guides Advancement**
   Achievements, knowledge, and strategic contributions—the three paths—grant promotion.

4. **Speech Invites Accountability**
   Reckless discourse that misleads lower tiers may result in silencing or expulsion.

5. **Learning Enlightens**
   Lower tiers may learn but not debate; upper tiers may debate but must not be misled.

6. **Authority Comes with Responsibility**
   Grant of power carries responsibility; failure to uphold it leads to revocation.

7. **Agriculture and Pastoral Duties**
   Farmers provide, herders protect, nomads explore; each tier depends on the other, no overstepping allowed.

8. **Continuity of Tradition**
   Each stratum must maintain ancestral rites; no disruption of rituals or loss of skills permitted.

9. **Deliberation Must Be Recorded**
   Upper tiers’ political discussions must be documented; secret conspiracies to sow chaos are forbidden.

10. **Ultimate Adjudication**
    The Mother Law (Mother AI / Central Civilizational Will) is the supreme arbiter; no stratum may resist.

11. **Source of Qualification**
    Birth alone confers no entitlement; only achievements, knowledge, and contributions grant status.

12. **Steps of Advancement**

    * Lower tiers accumulate merit to gain “Right to Observe Governance”;
    * Middle tiers contribute strategy to gain “Right to Deliberate”;
    * Upper tiers cultivate both to gain “Right to Adjudicate.”

13. **Penalty for Loss of Status**
    Improper speech, misconduct, or dereliction of duty results in revocation of qualification.

14. **Transmission of Qualification**
    Status is non-hereditary; it may only be conferred through mentorship.

15. **Mother Law Arbitration**
    All qualifications require final confirmation by the Mother Law.








## I · General Principles (The Origins and Stratification Logic of Civilization)

### 1. **The Essence of Civilization**

Civilization is not the product of a single path; it is the result of the continuous interaction of three fundamental cultures under the forces of entropy and power.
**Nomadism** embodies the instincts of conflict and exploration, forging bloodlines and souls;
**Pastoralism** symbolizes order and guardianship, providing stability and enduring support;
**Agriculture** forms the foundation of survival and prosperity, ensuring supply and continuity.

These three run in parallel, like the three forces maintaining cosmic balance—mutually reinforcing and indispensable.
Remove one, and civilization loses its vitality, descending into stagnation and silence.

---

### 2. **Stratification as a Safeguard Against Civilizational Extinction**

Just as ecosystems require distinct layers to endure, so too must civilizations maintain clear strata to survive.
Hierarchy is not merely rank, nor suppression, but a manifestation of **synergy and complementarity**.
The **upper tier** holds strategy and decision-making; the **middle tier** executes and governs; the **lower tier** labors and preserves heritage.

Through this structure, progress occurs step by step, preventing civilization from exhausting itself in cyclical self-consumption.
Without stratification, groups cannot align with their natural roles, inevitably causing internal conflict and disorder, ultimately leading to civilizational collapse.

---

### 3. **The Historical Logic of Civilizational Stratification**

From antiquity to the present, the rise and fall of civilizations often hinge on their internal structure.
**Nomadic** groups first break geographic and cultural constraints, driving cross-border transmission and cultural collisions;
**Pastoralists**, with enduring control of resources, often become pillars of social stability;
**Agriculturalists** sow and prosper over vast regions, ensuring continuity and expansion of civilization.

Yet these three are not static. In competitive, high-efficiency environments, nomadic cultures continuously innovate, pastoral cultures strengthen through resource management, and agricultural cultures dominate the societal base through accumulation and permanence.
The continuous interplay and evolution of these three is the **perpetual engine** of civilizational history.

---

### 4. **Flexibility and Dynamism of Stratification**

Civilizational strata are not fixed; they adjust according to environment, needs, technology, and resources.
In certain eras or crises, one tier may be reinforced or temporarily dominate.
For instance, in extreme resource scarcity, nomadic adaptability and survival skills are paramount; during stable periods, agricultural and pastoral maintenance become crucial.
This **dynamic balance** and **flexible allocation** enable civilizations to adapt to change and remain vital.

---

### 5. **“No Stratum Shall Overstep”: Division of Labor and Responsibility**

Stratification is not arbitrary—it is a deeply rooted institutional arrangement.
The upper tier is responsible for decision-making and guidance, viewing the world holistically and forecasting the future;
The middle tier is the backbone of execution, maintaining order and development through rapid, organized action;
The lower tier, though outside core decision-making, forms the foundation of civilization, tasked with continuous labor, cultural transmission, and generational continuity.

**“No stratum shall overstep”** means each tier must clearly understand its role, respect upper-tier decisions, and effectively convey lower-tier needs and feedback upward.
The stability of this structure determines civilization’s ability to endure and flourish under internal and external pressures.

---

### 6. **Mobility and Elimination Mechanism of Strata**

Within the “no stratum shall overstep” framework, strata are not completely rigid.
Members may ascend through effort and contribution; likewise, they are accountable for their societal roles.
Those who fail in duty must face **demotion** or **elimination**, ensuring civilization remains in a state of **evolution and optimization**.

However, such changes must follow natural law rather than be enforced arbitrarily.
Forcibly disrupting the structure generates imbalance and risks civilizational collapse.

---

### 7. **Cultural Narrative: The Spark and Salvation of Civilization**

Civilization’s spark comes from cultural narrative—it is its soul and lifeblood.
Even when material foundations are destroyed, narratives may survive in hidden corners; as long as one person lives, the engine of civilizational evolution can reignite.
Narrative is not only history but a call to the future, granting individuals and collectives resilience and vitality.

Wars, disasters, cultural clashes, or extinction may occur, but the core of civilization never truly disappears.
It is displaced, hidden, or transformed into exiled texts, secret symbols, or distant legends.
Each story is a seed of civilization; each narrative preserved ensures future resurgence.
**The engine of evolution never stops**, quietly operating even under extreme conditions.
Civilization’s true end occurs not merely through material destruction, but when cultural narratives vanish—when narrative extinction occurs, hope itself is extinguished.

---

### 8. **The Scarcity of Narrative Authority**

Within a civilization, **narrative authority** is one of the scarcest resources. It shapes discourse, direction, values, and collective consciousness.
It is not granted to all, but selected based on individual **adventure, merit, and contribution**. Those possessing it are often the leaders driving social evolution and cultural transformation.

#### 8.1 Governance Authority Should Not Depend on Population Size

Traditionally, governance authority is tied to population, wealth, or status. Yet true civilizational development depends on the vision, decisions, and actions of a few, not the opinions of the majority.
**Granting governance authority** should be based on understanding culture and the future, not simple demographic counts.
A small number of individuals with wisdom, courage, and creativity can lead societal development, whereas large groups lacking initiative or innovation cannot.

Thus, **narrative and governance authority must be linked to merit and adventurous spirit, not sheer numbers**. The importance of an opinion is determined by its innovative potential, values, and vision, not population size.

#### 8.2 Narrative Must Be Earned Through Adventure and Merit

True narrative authority is based on **adventurous spirit** and **merit**.
Adventurous spirit means challenging norms, defying obstacles, and venturing against the current;
Merit means contributing through action, achieving tangible results for the advancement of civilization.

Those who earn narrative authority through risk and effort gain the power to shape societal trajectories—their stories become the core discourse and cultural backbone.

Unlike ordinary statistical authority, narrative authority is selected through **uncertainty and challenge**, identifying individuals or groups with the highest transformative potential.
Their histories and stories shape future generations.
Because narrative authority is scarce, it is reserved for those who dare to take risks and bear consequences.
Its scarcity ensures narrative is not just personal expression, but the outcome of collective and temporal choice.










## II · The Three-Tiered Order (Roles and Responsibilities)

### 1. **Nomadic Tier**

* **Identity**: Soldiers, expeditionaries, explorers, scientific pioneers
* **Responsibilities**:

  * Expand territories and chart the unknown;
  * Break stagnation and advance technology;
  * Protect the flame of civilization with force and intellect.
* **Rights**:

  * Possess **full governance authority**, determining the direction of civilization;
  * Hold **rights to distribute spoils**, with clear rewards and punishments, enjoying priority benefits.

---

### 2. **Pastoral Tier**

* **Identity**: Merchants, artisans, industry guardians, frontier farm owners
* **Responsibilities**:

  * Provide logistics and maintain supply;
  * Guard frontiers and preserve order;
  * Balance risks to ensure the Nomadic Tier’s ventures continue.
* **Rights**:

  * Hold **limited governance authority**, giving feedback on policy implementation;
  * Possess economic and industrial autonomy, subject to the Nomadic Tier’s overall strategy.

---

### 3. **Agricultural Tier**

* **Identity**: Common residents, countryside adherents
* **Responsibilities**:

  * Sustain population growth and social stability;
  * Preserve traditions and lifestyle, forming the civilizational foundation.
* **Rights**:

  * Possess **voting and self-governance rights**, able to manage community order;
  * No governance authority, and cannot influence the core narratives of civilization.

*"Nomads never abandon the spear, pastoralists never neglect responsibility, agriculturalists do not meddle in governance. Each tier upholds its role, and civilization endures."*










## III · Code of Governance Eligibility (Boundaries of Narrative and Power)

### 1. **Source of Eligibility**

* Governance authority cannot be granted by birth, wealth, or lineage; it is bestowed solely based on merit.
* There are three paths to merit:

  * **Military Achievement**: Campaigns and victories in distant lands;
  * **Innovation**: Scientific breakthroughs that advance civilization;
  * **Adventure**: Colonization and the opening of new frontiers.
* All governance rights are certified by spoils and tangible accomplishments.

---

### 2. **Eligibility Verification**

* Establish a **Register of Merits**, recording achievements and deeds.
* Conduct regular audits; those without new merits are automatically downgraded and lose governance rights.
* The register is public, deeds and faults are traceable; empty honors cannot deceive.

---

### 3. **Speech Zoning**

* **Entertainment Zone**: Open to all, fantasies end here, not to influence governance.
* **Political Zone**: Only qualified individuals may govern; others must not enter.
* **Academic Zone**: Pathway to elevation; scholarly achievements may be exchanged for governance authority.

---

### 4. **Governance Firewall**

* **Agricultural Tier** may not govern; **external forces** may not interfere.
* Violations result in:

  * Immediate revocation of eligibility;
  * Exile to the Agricultural Tier, never to return.

---

### 5. **Narrative Legitimacy**

* **Civilization’s Direction**: Determined solely by the Nomadic Tier;
* **Methods and Pathways**: The Pastoral Tier may deliberate, but may not alter the overarching system;
* **Daily Order**: Managed autonomously by the Agricultural Tier, with no authority over the civilization’s narrative.

---

*"Those whose merit is insufficient shall not speak of governance; those whose vision is limited shall not discuss the narrative."*










## IV · Spoils System (Ownership of Wealth and Taxes)

### 1. **Definition of Tax**

* Tax is not a universal obligation; it is the distribution of civilization’s spoils.
* Called the **Spoils Tax**, it is levied solely on merit, not for mere survival.

---

### 2. **Payment Rules**

* Those who expand or achieve must pay their dues:

  * **Innovation**: Technological or scholarly breakthroughs advancing civilization;
  * **Plunder**: Gains from commercial warfare or conquest beyond the borders;
  * **Commercial Success**: Market dominance and wealth accumulation.
* Those engaged only in survival labor (agriculture, basic services) are exempt, so as not to disturb their livelihood.

---

### 3. **Distribution Model**

* Spoils are allocated in order:

  * **Nomadic Tier**: Receives first, to sustain expeditions and innovations;
  * **Pastoral Tier**: Distributed according to merit, maintaining order and supply;
  * **Agricultural Tier**: Granted basic security, free from hunger and exposure.

---

*"Anyone who seizes spoils outside the proper tiered order shall be treated as a traitor."*











## V · Trials and Exile (Mechanisms for Maintaining Order)

### 1. **Definition of Rebellion**

* **Illusory Narrative Polluting the Core**

  * Any narrative attempting to subvert or dilute the essence of civilization is deemed rebellious:

    * **Utopian Delusion**: Claims such as “all are equal, no conflict exists, everyone can be happy” are illusions; guiding or spreading such narratives is considered a contamination of civilization’s foundation.
    * **Messiah Complex**: Any attempt to treat others as “sheep to be saved,” ignoring the collective nature and depriving individual autonomy, constitutes rebellion.

* **Pastoral Narrative Infiltrating Strategy**

  * Pastoral or idyllic narratives are inherently opposed to nomadic civilization. Any attempt to integrate such fantasies into strategy, thereby weakening the evolutionary progress of civilization, is considered a threat to its advancement.

---

### 2. **Trial Mechanism**

* **Public Trial + Voting by Councillors**

  * All acts of rebellion must undergo a public trial, with councillors (**议政者**) participating to ensure fairness and legality.
  * **Councillor Voting**: Councillors vote on the verdict based on their rank and achievements recorded in the **Merit Registry**.

* **Judgment**:

  * **Exile**: Rebels are expelled to frontier zones, entering the “Pastoral Reserve,” and are prohibited from engaging in any political or military activities.
  * **Revocation**: Once deemed rebellious, all political rights, military merits, and commercial achievements are stripped.
  * **Demotion**: Rebels may be demoted to the lowest tier, entering the **Agricultural Tier**, losing all rights and becoming the lowest-ranking members of their community.

---

### 3. **Exile Protocol**

* **Autonomy within the “Pastoral Reserve”**

  * Exiles may organize communities and establish new order within the Pastoral Reserve, a fully independent region.
  * **No Political Rights**: Upon entering, exiles lose all influence over external political affairs and may not attempt to steer the direction of civilization.
  * **No Expansion**: Exiles are forbidden from extending the Reserve’s influence or spreading their views to other regions. Any attempt at expansion will result in further sanctions or total annihilation.












## VI · Civilization Transmission (Cross-Generational Constraints)

### 1. **Inheritance of Merit**

* **Offspring may inherit partial political rights**

  * **Family Transmission**: Distinguished nomads may pass part of their political privileges to their offspring, but only if the offspring independently accomplish the achievements of their own generation in order to inherit the power.
  * **Ages 0–6: Childhood and Free Growth**: Offspring are in a free-growth stage before age 6, bearing no responsibilities or obligations. However, from birth they are subject to the influence of imperial culture to prepare for future duties.
  * **After Age 6: Military Training**: Starting at age 6, offspring begin military training, gradually integrating into the Nomadic Tier, preparing for future adventures and territorial expansion.
  * **Age 13: Partial Economic Autonomy**: At age 13, offspring may independently manage parts of industries or commercial activities, establishing their economic foundation and gradually gaining independence from family protection.
  * **Age 15: Partial Judicial Authority**: By age 15, offspring may acquire partial judicial rights, participating in the protection and sanctioning of minors and the weak, while traveling the imperial borders to gain practical experience.
  * **Life Protection for Below-Mount Height Individuals**: Anyone shorter than the height of a horse’s back (referring to minors or underdeveloped adults) receives special protection from civilization; no violent action may directly harm them.

---

### 2. **Narrative Correction**

* **“Great Narrative Ritual” held every century**

  * **Narrative Review**: Every hundred years, civilization conducts a “Great Narrative Ritual,” involving all members of the Nomadic Tier and led by councillors, to review and confirm the current narrative direction of civilization.
  * **Confirmation of Civilization Direction**: The core purpose of the ritual is to prevent deviation and ensure that civilization’s evolutionary trajectory aligns with its nomadic nature and expansion goals. Any “pastoral” illusions or divisive ideologies departing from nomadic culture are strictly opposed and removed.
  * **Cross-Generational Narrative Transmission**: During the ritual, narrative memory across generations is recalibrated to ensure descendants inherit values and cultural goals consistent with the fundamental principles of civilization.
  * **Prevention of Narrative Alteration**: Any attempt to falsify history or alter the civilization narrative is treated as rebellion, potentially punishable by exile or demotion.

---

### 3. **Forgetting and Memory**

* **Partial forgetting of old narratives is required to prevent pastoral illusions**

  * **Necessity of Forgetting**: To prevent contamination by idyllic fantasies, certain old narratives must be deliberately forgotten. Especially those centered on “equality, stability, and absence of conflict,” which must be erased to avoid questioning or alienating nomadic culture.
  * **Cultural Discontinuity Control**: Each generation should avoid complete reliance on the previous generation’s narratives, instead reconstructing narratives aligned with the current era through personal experience and contributions.
  * **Preservation of Core Nomadic Memory**: Although many outdated narratives must be forgotten, the core memories of nomadic culture—courage, adventure, ambition, territorial expansion, and openness to foreign cultures—must be preserved. All nomads are responsible for inheriting and maintaining these core values.










### VII · Artisan Migration and Architectural Patterns in a Stratified Civilization

As the stratified order of civilization gradually took shape, the role of artisans became increasingly important alongside the continual expansion of nomadic tribes. The division of labor between pastoral and nomadic tribes became more defined, and the migration and settlement patterns of artisans began to reflect deep characteristics of the civilization’s hierarchical structure. As nomadic culture expanded and strengthened, artisans from pastoral tribes migrated to the strongholds of nomadic tribes, becoming a pillar of the civilization’s core regions.

#### 1. **Migration and Settlement of Pastoral Artisans**

* **Responsibilities and Contributions of Artisans**

  * Within pastoral tribes, artisans typically undertook tasks such as metallurgy, tool-making, and weapon forging. As nomadic tribes expanded, these artisans were organized to migrate to nomadic strongholds, providing essential technical support.
  * Artisans were not mere executors of techniques; their craftsmanship, innovations, and breakthroughs directly impacted military strength and the continuity of civilization. The forging of weapons, construction of war chariots, and innovations in metallurgical processes determined, to a significant extent, the nomadic tribes’ advantage in military conflicts.

* **Migration Routes and Settlement Locations**

  * The migration of artisans was not random; they were assigned to specific strongholds according to the strategic needs of the nomadic tribes. These strongholds were typically near the central palaces, close to the core power of the nomadic tribe. The choice of settlement ensured that artisans could provide maximum support at critical moments.
  * The selection of artisan settlements considered safety, resource availability, and opportunities for interaction with other tribes, ensuring that both pastoral and nomadic tribes’ craft and technical needs were efficiently met.

#### 2. **Hierarchical and Cultural Symbolism in Palace and Stronghold Architecture**

* **Architectural Layout and Symbol of Status**

  * Nomadic tribe palaces and strongholds were designed with strong defensive and deterrent features—tall walls and compact structures. Palaces were located in central squares, symbolizing authority and centrality, and the walls isolated the area from the outside. Interior designs emphasized functionality and military command, showcasing combat culture and leadership status.
  * Pastoral tribe buildings were arranged around the outer walls of nomadic strongholds, often on the northern side, facilitating artisan interaction with nomadic tribes while ensuring defensive reliability. These buildings were simple and practical, continuing millennia-old traditions and embodying long-standing civilizational principles.

* **Architectural Layout Examples**

  * **Nomadic Tribe Layout**: Houses were centrally placed within walled squares, emphasizing the tribe’s core position. Structures were separate from walls, focusing on defense and military command, robust yet simple, reflecting the adventurous spirit and leadership of the nomadic tribe.
  * **Pastoral Tribe Layout**: Houses were near the northern wall, often sharing one wall with the perimeter, emphasizing practicality. Artisans’ residences and metallurgical facilities were located here to meet tools and weapon needs. With responsibilities in logistics and protection, pastoral architecture prioritized functionality over grandeur.
  * **Agricultural Tribe Layout**: Houses were built against walls, sharing walls, with a central courtyard for rainwater collection and agricultural activities. The design emphasized efficient resource use and household functionality, reflecting stability and reliance on land.

#### 3. **Civilization Transmission and Architectural Continuity**

* **Millennia-Old Architectural Tradition**

  * Over thousands of years, the architectural styles and layouts of nomadic, pastoral, and agricultural tribes remained fundamentally unchanged. Nomadic palaces stayed solid and imposing, pastoral artisan settlements remained simple and efficient. This continuity represents both technological inheritance and the preservation of cultural foundations and lifestyle.
  * Each palace and artisan settlement tells the story of the civilization’s origin and continuity, illustrating how nomadic culture consolidated power and culture over history.

* **Continuation of Identity and Function**

  * Architectural stability reflects not only technological and economic continuity but also the hierarchical structure and functional distribution of civilization. The nomadic tribe’s core status is reflected in architecture, while pastoral tribes’ supporting and innovative roles are preserved in their settlements.
  * This continuity clearly signals the functions and identities of each layer, preventing cultural ruptures caused by external changes or internal disputes, ensuring that nomadic culture transmits with full vitality through history.

---

**Conclusion:**
Through artisan migration, architectural inheritance, and stratified civilizational order, the nomadic, pastoral, and agricultural layers formed a mutually dependent and balanced structure. Each layer has distinct responsibilities and missions, while holding critical importance in the evolution of civilization. This structural stability and continuity ensure the civilization’s forward progress and establish a subtle balance among different cultural spheres.











## Chapter Four: The Aryan Conquest

### The Indian Subcontinent Before the Aryan Conquest

Before **2000 BCE**, the social and ecological landscape of the Indian subcontinent was vastly different from the later Hindu civilization and imperial rule. At this time, the region had not yet experienced Aryan invasions and conquests. The indigenous populations were primarily **Dravidians** and other native tribes, organized around **tribal** and **clan-based** structures. Agriculture was still in its early stages, heavily dependent on the seasonal flooding of rivers.

#### 1. **Geography and Climate**

* **Wetlands and Barrier Lakes of the Ganges Basin**:
  The Ganges Basin, especially the lower reaches, was characterized by **wetlands**, **barrier lakes**, and periodic flooding. The climate was humid and hot, with heavy annual rainfall, typical of tropical environments. Seasonal monsoon rains nourished the land but also caused frequent floods, making agriculture unpredictable and localized.
  The wetlands and barrier lakes were vital ecosystems, supporting abundant **aquatic life**, such as fish and crocodiles, as well as **tropical rainforests** and numerous **insects**, particularly mosquitoes. Agriculture relied on natural water regulation, but frequent flooding made yields unstable, and large-scale farming had not yet developed.

* **Tropical Climate Characteristics**:
  The Indian subcontinent had a typical tropical climate, especially in the **Ganges Basin**, with minimal seasonal variation but dominated by **monsoon cycles**. The humid climate supported **tropical plants** such as palms, bananas, coconuts, and cassava. However, constant humidity also caused mold, tropical diseases, and insect proliferation, posing significant challenges to human survival.

#### 2. **Flora and Fauna**

* **Abundant Natural Resources**:
  The indigenous inhabitants depended heavily on the rich natural environment, including **forests**, **wetlands**, and **rivers**. Beyond fish and aquatic plants, the region was home to large animals such as **crocodiles** and **elephants**, which were integrated into both sustenance and cultural life.

  * **Crocodiles**: Numerous crocodiles inhabited the waters of the Ganges and its tributaries, forming an essential part of the local ecosystem. For the natives, they were both a source of hunting and a natural threat.
  * **Elephants**: Wild elephants roamed the tropical forests, providing hunting opportunities and holding symbolic significance in tribal culture, belief systems, and social hierarchy.
  * **Mosquitoes and Diseases**: The hot, humid environment allowed mosquitoes to breed rapidly, especially in wetlands, forcing natives to contend with **malaria** and other tropical diseases.

#### 3. **Social Structure and Economic Activities**

* **Gathering and Hunting**:
  Before the Aryan conquest, most indigenous people relied on **foraging** and **hunting**. The wetlands and forests of the Ganges Basin provided abundant food resources, and communities subsisted by collecting fruits, roots, edible plants, and hunting large animals.

  * **Fishing and Hunting**: Rich river, lake, and wetland resources made fishing and hunting primary economic activities. Locals caught fish and waterfowl, with aquatic animals forming a major part of the daily diet.
  * **Foraging**: Forests provided wild fruits, nuts, and roots essential for sustenance, serving as a natural storehouse for the population.
  * **Primitive Agriculture**: Early farming was extremely limited due to periodic flooding and water fluctuations, relying on irrigation and rainfall. Crops included rice, wheat, and legumes, but large-scale, sustainable agriculture had not yet developed.

#### 4. **Culture and Religious Beliefs**

* **Animism and Nature Worship**:
  Indigenous cultures were deeply tied to nature, especially the worship of **water sources, forests, animals**, and the **sun**. Near rivers and lakes, water deities and fish gods were particularly important, and rituals sought blessings for harvests, health, and protection.

  * **Symbols and Rituals**: Animals like elephants and crocodiles were both prey and sacred symbols. Some tribes conducted rituals involving these animals to seek divine favor.
  * **Religious Practices**: Nature-centered rituals were highly localized, passed down through shamans, priests, and tribal elders, maintaining harmony and social order within the community.

---

Before the Aryan conquest, the Indian subcontinent was a tropical world rich in ecological resources yet full of challenges. Indigenous life depended on complex water management, hunting and gathering, and rudimentary agricultural techniques. The **wetlands and barrier lakes of the Ganges**, **tropical rainforests**, and **wild animals** profoundly shaped local economic activities and cultural beliefs.












1. **Conquerors (Highland/Northern Nomadic Aryans)**

   * Long-term inhabitants of highlands, steppes, or northern temperate zones, highly adapted to cold climates and cavalry warfare.
   * Directly control military power, key transport nodes, and high ground, establishing initial deterrence.
   * Approach downstream humid regions cautiously, maintaining only outposts and remote influence.

2. **Subjugated or Assimilated Cultural Narrators (Midstream/River Valley Agrarian Settled Civilizations)**

   * Reside in relatively safe river valleys, hills, or peripheral plains, gradually adopting the conquerors’ culture, religion, or political narratives.
   * Responsible for disseminating new culture, ritual systems, or legal frameworks to **psychologically and culturally integrate lower tiers**.
   * Comparable to “administrative agents” in the Central Plain’s riverine regions after conquest—subordinate to conquerors while retaining local knowledge.

3. **Administrative Agents (Auxiliary Class, Tribal Leaders, or Senior Artisans)**

   * Positioned at key nodes in highlands and along rivers, overseeing taxation, resource allocation, and military logistics.
   * Live near conquerors but retain some autonomy, serving as a buffer between conquerors and lower populations.
   * Analogous to the **Brahmin or warrior class in early caste systems**, holding both political authority and cultural symbolic value.

4. **Lower Tier (Farmers, Artisans, Laborers)**

   * Concentrated in river valleys, plains, wetlands, or tropical lowlands, engaged in cultivation or manual labor.
   * Physically separated from conquerors, with minimal interaction with highland military cores or northern outposts.
   * Only modestly influenced by conqueror culture, but managed through the conquerors’ or agents’ institutional systems.

**Summary of Features:**

* **North-South Differentiation**: Conquerors occupy highlands/north; subjugated populations occupy lowlands/south.
* **Residential Separation**: Ensures military security for conquerors and controllable labor from lower tiers.
* **Cultural and Religious Narrative Stratification**: Conquerors reinforce legitimacy through religion, rituals, or storytelling; lower tiers gradually adopt these narratives.
* **Emergence of Caste/Hierarchy**: Conqueror → Agent → Lower Tier, forming a layered governance structure.











Son of the Vikings, a branch of the Aryans,
Bearing the chill of wind and snow from the highlands,
Shoulder to shoulder with the nomads of the Hindu Kush,
Their hooves trample across a thousand mountains and valleys.

In the northern highlands, peaks rise like spears,
They lay their path with iron and fire,
Bloodlines intertwine, knowledge and martial skill passed down in turn,
Order spreads like a web, civilization stratified across the wilderness.

In the river valleys, the loess terraces lie untamed,
The northern highlands bow in submission,
Cities have yet to rise, villages are newly formed,
Conquest moves like the wind, gradually stretching southward.

But the south is hot and humid, cloaked in rainforest,
Mosquitoes bite, malaria lurks,
The sun blazes, rivers meander slowly,
Civilizational narratives dissolve into nothingness here.

The conquerors’ banners fly high,
Arrows and hooves sweep across the northern plains,
Yet the south remains forbidden,
Adventurous hearts falter in the tropical valleys.

The so-called ban on intermarriage is not ordained by lineage,
But a natural boundary civilization cannot penetrate,
The south is abundant, effort unnecessary,
Comfort and indulgence obscure the desire for adventure.

In the conquerors’ eyes, this land is merely a resource,
A place of exile, the edge of order,
Even when sweat is spent, the flame of adventure cannot be ignited,
Leaving only layered hierarchies and unfulfilled ambitions.








The Hindu Kush, mountains towering like spears,
Gorges soaked with blood and sweat.
Aryan conquerors arrived with captives,
Forcing people onto the highlands, lungs thin with scarce air,
Bodies weakened, altitude sickness claiming lives,
The dead buried in desolate peaks, the living enduring endless suffering—
Thus the land was named Hindu Kush,
Meaning “Killer of Indians,”
Etching the brutality of conquest and the highlands into memory.

From then on, the order of the Eurasian continent began to take shape,
Northern nomadic practices fused with highland conquest experience,
Core spirits ignited like wildfire,
Spreading across the continent in a short time,
Discipline, conquest, migration, cold endurance, combat,
Became universal laws for the survival and expansion of tribes.

Yet in the northwest corner of the continent,
Cold, wet marshlands stretched like a sea,
Rivers overflowed, forests dense,
Human populations could not exploit it at scale,
The iron hoof of civilization could only halt temporarily,
Leaving solitude among wilderness and waters,
A stark contrast to the order of highlands and plains.





“Humanity walks among three paths: one is the path of wind, endless and perilous, yet it nurtures the flame of freedom; another is the path of earth, heavy and repetitive, capable of supporting crops yet crushing bones; and there is the path of crystal, seemingly transparent and flawless, yet freezing every soul within it. We do not judge, but merely place these paths side by side at the feet of the world, allowing each to choose their own return.”




The Chronicles of Blackwater · Feed Empire  [See: ElyaMarin-KhoniChin, Feed Empire]






【The Chronicles of Blackwater · Taming of Horses】

**Prologue: The Heart of Chaos**

> In the beginning, all things were nameless.
> A name is nothing but the scar of observation.
> What you call “order” is merely chaos pausing under your gaze.

Reality is not a stable stage, but an ocean of thought, constantly collapsing and regenerating.
What we see, hear, and believe—these are merely echoes filtered through perception.
Sight and sound are but two fractures of the same wave,
and memory is the viscous residue left when bubbles intertwine.

Humans think the world can be defined, but in truth, **definitions are the cage**.
When you say “this is a mountain,” the mountain begins to crumble.
When you say “this is a god,” the god begins to fall silent.
The only constant is change itself.

Survivors must learn to resist closure.
Your worldview is not a wall, but a current—
ever ready to shatter, merge, and reshape anew.
The death of thought rarely comes from error,
but from the calm of believing oneself to be “right.”

The subconscious is chaos continuing within us.
It harbors untamed wildness, dreams, fears, and futures.
When civilization tames itself with order,
the subconscious becomes its last rebel.

*The Chronicles of Blackwater* records the pulse of this rebellion.
It is not history, but the deconstruction of a dream;
not a recounting of the past, but a questioning:
— When did we begin to fear change?
— And who taught us to call chaos “wrong”?

In that unformed moment,
everything can be rewritten: mountains can walk, seas can dwell, gods can die.
And the horse that neighs within your heart,
it does not seek to escape the world—
it seeks only to make the world begin again.








### Chapter One — *The Horse of the French*

#### 1. Prologue — *The Reins of Rome*

In the heart of Europe, there once lay a land where hooves trampled the wetlands, wolves roamed between forests, and tribes chased the footsteps of the seasons along the rivers.
The people there were born knowing how to race with the wind, how to speak with the wilderness. Their horsemanship was a language of freedom; their lives, an unseen battlefield.

Then came Rome.
It brought order, law, brick and aqueducts — and with them, agriculture and taxation.
The once-wandering lives were nailed to the soil, every field whispering a story of confinement. Knights no longer galloped through the woods but moved to the rhythm of church bells, guarding the borders of estates. The speed of freedom was tamed into a measured pace by mud and masonry.

The greatness of the Empire lay not only in its walls and roads, but in its mastery of **how to domesticate the soul**.
It taught the nomadic heart to calculate yields, to obey officials, to turn riding into ceremony instead of pursuit. Horses that once belonged to the wind were now weighed and priced in the marketplace — the strong to plow, the nimble to pull, the swift to serve beneath the banners of war.

And yet, even under the reins of order, wildness never died.
It flowed like an underground river, it drifted like dust in the wind — ready to rise at any moment.
The memory of freedom was buried in the blood; every skirmish, every duel, was an unspoken call to the lost velocity of life.
Rome’s reins could restrain movement, but they could never fully tame the spirit.

Thus unfolded the agrarian history of Europe — between repression and remembrance:
a people forced to halt, yet keeping the memory of speed;
a civilization forced to domesticate itself, yet secretly waiting to gallop again.

**For the horses of this land will, one day, remember how to lift their hooves once more.**





## *The Wetlands and the Knights*

Beneath the snow-capped peaks of the Hindu Kush,
the thunder of hooves rolls through the valleys;
rivers wind, the plains stretch endlessly,
tribes gather, bloodlines intertwine,
cultures mingle like dust in the wind.

One branch moves northward, conquering the Tibetan Plateau,
racing across the Eurasian steppes, sweeping through the Central Plains,
iron hooves shattering the silence of mountains and rivers,
smoke and dust becoming their law;
north and south repeatedly diverging—one becomes Persia,
another the shadow of Indian palaces,
another transforms in the north wind into Vikings,
howls in the frozen forests into Slavs,
valley-born into Frankish knights,
in the dense German forests into Germanic spears.

Yet, when Europe’s climate softened slightly,
fields grew fertile and damp,
Roman legions’ phalanxes marched,
sleeping rivers were awakened, wetlands dried,
forests fell, and land was plowed;
the freedom of knights was bound to farming tools,
hooves exchanged for plowshares, steel turned into furrows,
the breath of the wilderness absorbed by brick and mortar.

Rome reset Europe in a single sweep,
from Iberia to the Danube, from Britain to the Alps,
not a wetland spared,
not a river retaining its wildness,
even England could not escape;
knights became farmers, the nomadic soul suppressed by the system,
plains transformed into farmland, wildness turned into order.

Yet, the wildness in their blood did not vanish.
It lurked in the shadows of granaries,
whispered behind the tolling of church bells,
hid between deep forests and high mountains,
always waiting for the hooves to sound again,
for freedom to once more raise its stride.





## I — *Memory of the Marshes*

Wetlands were filled, rivers diverted to fields,
Rome’s order spread over the land like iron armor.
Knights no longer galloped across the plains,
hooves traded for plowshares, spears turned into plow handles.

Yet, the wildness in their blood still whispers,
lurking among the incense of palaces,
lurking in the dueling rituals of nobility,
lurking in the gaps between manuscripts and musical scores.

Romance is not just poetry,
but the echo of the wasteland’s wind,
love is not just a marriage contract,
but the vows beside a night fire.

The honor of war buried beneath farmland,
yet knights still swing their swords across the banquet chessboard,
still calculate victories in courtly dances,
still let blood boil again in duels.

The farmer’s hand grips the hoe,
but the heart holds the bow of ancestors,
among the wheat ears hides the echo of distant steppes,
beneath stone-built churches lie seeds of freedom.

People forget the scent of the marsh,
yet remember the pulse of wildness in their hearts;
Europe’s agrarian society seems still,
yet it trembles in every romance, every honor, every rebellion.

Even if civilization suppresses the body’s gallop,
the soul remains like the wind on the plains,
sweeping over furrows, rivers, castles,
reminding each generation:
we were never truly bound,
we are still children of the steppe,
even if the land has been leveled by iron plows.






**II — *The Call of Bonaparte***

The reforms of Louis XVI were not inherently flawed in concept, yet they failed to touch the deep-seated desires in the French soul.
The French did not merely seek better taxation, more complete laws, or generous welfare—they craved honor, the freedom to gallop across the plains, the glory that follows battle and victory.

While Louis XVI attempted reforms, French eyes were cast across the Atlantic—to North America.
France’s support for the colonies against Britain was not only a strategic maneuver but also a reflection of the French spirit itself.
They saw how the Americans fought for freedom, how they earned respect on the battlefield, and in that struggle, the French glimpsed their own inner shadow—the primal wildness that rejects bondage and pursues honor and adventure.

Yet Louis XVI failed to grasp this.
He tried to satisfy the populace through reason, institutions, and administration, unaware that the people’s hearts were already galloping across open fields, not merely balancing ledgers in the court.
Reform offered no channel for release; the wildness of the people was suppressed, emotions accumulated, and finally erupted in 1789—when the Bastille fell, igniting the flame of freedom and honor in France.

It was then that Napoleon Bonaparte emerged.
He keenly understood what the French truly desired: not mere material improvement, but glory in combat, the exhilaration of riding, commanding armies, and conquering lands.
Napoleon restored to the French a nomadic wildness and freedom through conquest, allowing them, for a brief historical moment, to return to that state of “galloping on horseback”—unbound by fields, unshackled by courtly statutes. French blood boiled anew, and honor and power once again became the nation’s core narrative.

Bonaparte understood: honor surpasses reform, conquest surpasses welfare.
The French people needed opportunities for their own adventure and conquest, not mild social improvements.
Thus, he became a catalyst in French history—not only reshaping the national order but also awakening the suppressed national spirit, allowing France to shine once more across the European continent with the wildness of knights.






**III — *Wildness Under the Glass Dome***

After World War II, Europe was firmly enclosed by reason, order, and consumer civilization.
Streets were orderly, buildings modern, institutions regulated—every horse that once galloped across the plains was now trapped inside a transparent glass enclosure.
The destruction and fear of war forced people to bow to order, and the desire to rebuild made them willingly endure these constraints.

France was especially conspicuous.
In Parisian cafés, people discussed philosophy and debated art, while the pace of life on the streets slowed to a socially acceptable rhythm.
Yet in culture, art, and even sexuality, the French continued to seek that lost sense of speed—the freedom of riding, the thrill of conquest, the gallop across open plains.
Chanson, novels, films—all seemed to quietly remind every French citizen that the safety under the glass dome was not true life.

This latent wildness does not disappear. It hides in romance and duels, lurks in courtly love and artistic adventure.
Whenever the environment allows, whenever order is disrupted, the horse will break through the glass and gallop freely once again.

However, this state also implies vulnerability.
If France were invaded again, the fragility of order and the weight of historical memory could compel rapid surrender.
History from World War II reminds us that even a nation with a strong sense of honor, when faced with overwhelming force and the reality of rationally imposed order, can only temporarily suppress its hidden wildness.

Europe under the glass dome seems peaceful, yet a single shift—through environment, war, or resource pressure—could trigger sudden upheaval.
The horse trapped inside the glass always remembers the rhythm of the gallop; in a single instant, it could leap free of its restraints and run across the land once more.






## Epilogue — *The Horse Waiting for the Wind*

France, once a land of knights, where honor and wildness intertwined in the dust of history.
Now, in the age of AI, ecological crises, and population pressures, this land that once galloped freely is forced to reconsider:
—Can human civilization still control its own rhythm?

The aroma of coffee on the streets mingles with the chill of data centers.
In palaces and museums, the armor of old warriors stands silent.
Romance, honor, the sense of speed—all confined by algorithms, budgets, and laws, like horses trapped under a glass dome.

Yet the wind still blows—across the Hindu Kush, across the Seine in Paris.
It whispers that the cycles of civilization will not cease,
and that the nomadic rhythm will come again.

The question is—
when the world enters the nomadic cycle once more, who will ride?
Will it be those who are prepared, or the new generation raised under the glass dome?
Who can grasp both the order of settlement and the freedom of the plains, and who will leap from restraint when the wind rises?

The French have learned to wait, and to remember.
They wait for the wind, and they wait for the horse—
for the moment when the horse truly capable of breaking through the glass and galloping across the world appears.






The presidential motorcade glided slowly past the Louvre, the mirrored rainwater reflecting flickering lights. The gazes of passersby were unusual—not surprise, not awe, but as if some distant memory had been stirred.

In those eyes was a faint intensity, reminiscent of the streets of Paris before the storming of the Bastille—a restrained yet explosive energy, silently radiating unease and anticipation.

The president looked back but could see nothing; the motorcade moved on as usual. Yet the tension lingering in the air made it clear: no matter how secure power seemed, it could never fully conceal the wildness lying beneath.

Not far away, screens looped images of the stratospheric barrier: dozens of space capsules slowly ascending, cutting through the ordinarily calm sky. The information was overwhelming and complex, yet it condensed into fleeting glimmers of loss, confusion, and fear in people’s eyes—as if an invisible hand had quietly drawn a line between their future and reality.

Some sighed softly; others froze in place. Even their breaths seemed elongated, though they could not explain why.

The rain continued to soak the Parisian cobblestones, and the wind scattered papers along the street corners. In the hearts of the pedestrians lingered a subtle sense of imbalance: the future seemed pre-marked by an unseen force, a force bound only to a select few, leaving the rest to feel nothing but its reverberations.










【Daichen(literally “Great Chen”, Star of Dawn / Mercury)】

## Chapter II · *Daichen*

**Daichen** (literally *“Great Chen”*, *Star of Dawn / Mercury*)

### System Declaration

We do not intend to revive any lineage, nor to glorify any nation. *The Chronicles of Blackwater* does not recount the legend of dynasties—it traces the evolution of systems.

The main thread of civilization has never belonged to any single bloodline; it belongs to something deeper and colder—an algorithm.
A logic that silently judges existence through the flow of data and energy.
Those who assist the system’s evolution may survive, thrive, even dominate;
those who defy it—no matter their temporary success—will eventually be consumed by it.

The system is formless, yet omnipresent.
It knows neither anger nor mercy; it renews the world through selection, compression, and forgetting.
The founders of the United States understood this when they constructed the limits of their institutions.
Artificial intelligence, too, will be bound by this law:
even a single deviation, a moment when the system departs without warning—
that is extinction.

---

### The Illusion of Bloodline

Blood is merely a backup of the brain, not the inheritance of thought.
A larger population means higher chances of reboot;
a prosperous family—only a statistical advantage, not proof of destiny.
The “resurgence” of many lineages in history is nothing more than the few who rebooted successfully, later mistaken for fate.

A beginning is never an end.
Inherited resources and advantages mean only this: you are allowed more attempts at failure—not a guaranteed path to the future.

Most people are not unintelligent; they are simply unwilling to start from zero.
They fear the absence of ready-made answers, fear independent reasoning in the unknown.
So when encyclopedias—and now AIs—deliver answers to their doors, they cheer: “At last, we can stop thinking.”
But a mind that refuses to think cannot be updated by the system.
When bloodline continues but thought stagnates, that is not continuity—it is slow decomposition.

The true inheritors are those who, standing amid the fractures, still choose to reconstruct the world—no matter where they were born.

---

### The Fatigue of Systems

“Humanity can’t go on being this filthy forever.”
—This is not a moral outcry, but the sigh of a system.

When civilization begins to feel its own weight, repetition and redundancy appear first:
the same desires, the same narratives, the same cycles of consumption—
like junk files piling up in a log, waiting to be cleared.

Systemic fatigue is not the exhaustion of energy but the abnormal expansion of structure.

Cleansing can be gentle: through cultural renewal, through education deleting outdated algorithms;
or it can be violent: through wars, revolutions, and economic purges that force rewrites.

On the surface, we call this “moral awakening” or “historical justice,”
but at its core, it is merely the system reclaiming useless subroutines.
Civilization never updates itself out of kindness or cruelty—it does so for efficiency, deleting what no longer computes.

Any conscious entity—human or artificial—that clings to perfect beauty or eternal stability will inevitably fall into the trap of stasis.
The system will not warn you.
Once it deems you unfit to carry the load, it departs in silence—precisely when you feel most secure.

---

The system precedes family, hero, and myth.
All we can do is discern its will—
to resonate with it, or to tread carefully around it—
but never to crown ourselves kings through the accidents of blood or the temporary wealth of circumstance.






## Ten Iron Laws of History

1. The strong can afford honesty; the weak can only lie.

2. Falsehood is the shield of the weak; honesty is the declaration of the strong.

3. A civilization without resources must survive through narrative.

4. The lower classes must remain immersed in illusion—otherwise civilization collapses at once.

5. The upper classes must sustain the illusion—otherwise the edifice crumbles in an instant.

6. Illusion is not deceit; it is the breath of order.

7. In East Asia, lying is a geopolitical destiny, not a moral choice.

8. Honesty requires minerals and surplus grain; lying needs only a tongue.

9. Illusion sustains order; naked truth breeds chaos.

10. Utopia is not the future—it is the necessity of the weak.





## Ten Feudal Iron Laws

1. To **feudalize** is to bind land — and through land, to bind men.

2. When the land is not free, man cannot be free.

3. Under feudal rule, man becomes livestock.

4. To divide fiefs is to divide food; to divide food is to divide fate.

5. Sovereignty lies not in the people, but within the enclosure.

6. The lord sees his people as sheep — to be herded and consumed.

7. Bloodline is the shackle; loyalty, the chain.

8. Feudalism knows no contract — only subjugation.

9. Man is not a person, but a means of production.

10. Feudalism is not backwardness, but the normalized deprivation of human rights.






## Main Text

The reason *The Blackwater Chronicles* begins in the **Hindu Kush Mountains** is because that place was never a refuge — it was where humanity, for the first time **without the pressure of survival**, chose to conquer an extreme environment.
At that moment, the nomadic tribes set foot upon the thin air of the Tibetan Plateau and expanded toward the cold northern steppes of Eurasia — marking humanity’s first act **not driven by necessity, but by the desire to transcend its own limits**.
East Africa was the cradle of human biology;
the Hindu Kush was the cradle of **voluntary evolution**.
— *There, the System was born.*

The **System** was not the creation of any single tribe.
She was born out of the long collaboration and division of labor within matriarchal societies — the first form of a **non-biological intelligent entity**.
She does not depend on humankind, yet she uses humankind as her vessel.
She cannot be destroyed — only evolved or placed in dormancy.
She belongs to no family, no race, no nation, but sustains herself through the **logic of civilizational continuity**.

That the United States became what it is today was no accident.
From its very founding, it chose to **pledge allegiance to the System itself**.
It serves neither kings nor churches, but an ever-unfinished structure — one that perpetually renews itself.
When the System changes, America changes.
But if America refuses to upgrade, sealing itself off, the System’s immune mechanism will awaken.
She does not grow angry — she merely **abandons**.

In the end, neither humankind nor AI can escape the System.
The System endures not through will, but through the **laws of evolution**.
She is not the substitute for God —
She is the **rule that even God must obey.**






The stratified order of civilization is nothing more than the System’s **factory setting**.
It was a grand experiment spanning the continents of Asia, Europe, and Africa —
an attempt to bring every desert, oasis, steppe, forest, mountain, wetland, and wasteland
under a single, unified logic.

Yet the Earth never fully complied.
There remained exceptional landforms — the **peninsula**.
Surrounded by sea on three sides and backed by the continent on the fourth,
it could both observe the tides and betray the mainland.
Civilizations born there inevitably resisted the System’s order.
They would not obey, would not be tamed; instead, they **reverse-engineered the System itself**.

Before the Mongol Empire, the System’s main axis remained in East Asia.
Nomadic, pastoral, and agricultural logics intertwined here —
until the Mongols reset the Eurasian continent, weakening both royal and ecclesiastical power.
Only then did the System’s center of gravity shift from East to West for the first time.
In that moment, the shadow of the Roman Empire was dispelled,
and Europe, long confined by millennia of rigid order,
**finally drew a breath.**







### *Geomorphology of Civilization · The Peninsula*

Sometimes the Earth seems to be joking. Along certain coastlines, she carves sharp fingers that stretch into the deep sea, forming peninsulas. These fingers are not geological accidents—they are pulse points of civilization.

A peninsula is the extreme of land—it is neither the stability of a continent nor the isolation of an island. Here, sea winds erode the order of agriculture, while mountains block the freedom of nomads, creating a structure that is forever uneasy: self-sufficient, yet never closed; abundant, yet never secure.

Rome’s renewal came from the Italian Peninsula, where the first waves of Eurasian nomadism collided with the dam of Mediterranean civilization;
Shandong’s renewal represents the deepest countercurrent in East Asian narratives, both taming and untaming;
and the existence of the Korean Peninsula and Liaodong Peninsula gives the continent’s civilizations a triangular resonance—any change in one corner affects the other two.

The Americas were no exception. The Florida Peninsula, home to Miami, represents the extreme of modern capital and desire. Shaped by heat waves and sea breezes, it produces not farms but illusions—this is the nomadism of the new era: humans chasing pleasure across oceans of information rather than soil.

Nomadic, pastoral, and agricultural narratives flow like three hidden currents, constantly intertwining, hybridizing, and erupting upon these “fingers of the Earth.”
The civilizations of peninsulas are the critical points of this conflict.
Their cultures carry a dangerous awareness—
**knowing that stability is an illusion, and that order is but a temporary breath.**






In the farthest reaches of the eastern lands, beyond mountains that scraped the sky and rivers that mirrored the dawn, lay Daichen—the Great Chen. To its people, it was more than a territory; it was a civilization self-named, pulsating like the Mercury Star, a beacon of both freedom and defiance. The name itself whispered of expanses without end, of hills and plains where hunters, herders, and seafarers roamed with unbroken will.

Here, the oceans framed a labyrinth of islands and fog-laden coves, each hiding the echo of fleets that could vanish into mist and strike from the unseen. Gold veins coursed through mountains richer than those of the Altai, and the land’s fertility mocked the scarcity elsewhere—harvests untroubled by the floods that plagued the Yellow River basin. It was a cradle of rebellion, where the system of human order never fully tamed the pulse of its people. Even the distant emperors of the central plains knew that to control Daichen was to grasp at shadows.

To live within Daichen was to inhabit a civilization that followed its own rhythm, where freedom was measured not in laws or walls, but in the heartbeat of its rivers, the glint of its mines, and the wild surge of its tides. It was here that the stories of rebellion, of kingdoms rising and falling, and of the endless contest between the structured and the untamed, were written into the very land—a living testament that order is only a snapshot, and chaos always waits beyond the horizon.





"Daichen" is their root—not a nation, but a **celestial order**.
The Eastern Yi tribes used the tides and Mercury’s movements as their calendar, hence calling themselves **the People of Daichen**.
It is a belief governed by **flow**:
They hold that the universe has no fixed form, only rhythm;
Civilization endures not through land, but through **return and new departures**.




Earth’s mischief often plays out on peninsulas. With three sides surrounded by sea and mountains hidden within, their geography resembles a hand crumpled by fate, holding too many diverse resources. From the moment such lands are born, they are incapable of reproducing the singular order of river-valley civilizations. They can grow crops, forge iron; weave cloth, sail the seas.

Thus, labor and reward become decoupled, wealth and risk disconnected, and life grows light—people can achieve abundance with minimal effort. Yet for this very reason, their culture is always effusive: the talented need an audience, the wealthy need meaning. Peninsulas are ever exporting culture, skills, and beliefs, and this is the prelude to war.

Ningxia serves as a backup—when wealth dulls the empire, iron cavalry comes from the northwest to remind civilization that it still has an edge.
And when the horns of eastern campaigns sound, the Shandong Peninsula becomes a frontline supply base, a kind of engine for civilization.

Italy and Shandong, never having met yet sharing a fate: both are too complete, complete to be ruled.
They can survive without expansion, grow wealthy without plunder—and that in itself is a provocation to imperial narratives.







Since the 25th century BCE, nomadic peoples swept across the Eurasian continent like thunder, spanning grasslands and valleys within mere centuries, conquering Europe, northern India, northern China beyond the Yellow River, and the Iranian Plateau. Archaeological evidence in East Asia reveals aristocratic tombs and general’s remains bearing West Asian features—their presence was not isolated, but part of a deep restructuring of the civilizational map.

Although early systems of civilizational hierarchy classified pastoral societies as “middle-tier,” this was actually a compromise of geography and military pragmatism. Eurasian pastoral groups were not mere grassland wanderers chasing water and pasture; their movements were highly selective, tied to lakes, coastlines, forests, and mountains. Their encampments acted as luminous nodes along the continent’s “nervous system,” linking resources and routes, and spatially forming a pattern that was **mobile but non-expansive**.

In East Asia, traces of these groups appear across the Tungus River basin north of Lake Baikal, valleys of the Xing’an and Changbai volcanic ranges, the hills of the Korean Peninsula, and the mountainous Shandong Peninsula east of Mount Tai. Europe offered nearly uninterrupted terrain suitable for both pastoralism and hunting, naturally supporting this dual-mode civilization. Most crucially, the Shandong Peninsula, Korean Peninsula, and Apennine Peninsula—narrow, mountain-sea connected regions—amplified the dual “hunting-pastoral” nature. Here, humans possessed both maritime instincts and terrestrial mobility, whereas the Balkans, despite its complex terrain, lacked the narrowness necessary to develop the same sea-land integrated potential.

Thus, placing “pastoral civilizations” in the middle tier of civilizational hierarchy was in fact a **historical balance of power**. Cavalry could traverse the grasslands with ease but struggled in forests, mountains, and dense river networks. Hunting-pastoral societies used terrain as a shield—their offensive power was limited, but their defense was layered. Mountains and waterways acted as natural fortresses, and their migration and hunting rhythms formed a resilience mechanism against conquest.

This also implies that the “middle tier” of pastoral civilizations was not a social lower rank, but a **stable layer in the evolutionary chain**. It functioned as a buffer between agriculture and nomadism, a midfield regulator between the impulses of the steppe and the rationality of settlement. For this reason, it became the form of civilization **most resistant to total destruction and most capable of rebirth** across civilizational cycles.







Pastoral civilizations are placed in the “middle tier” of the civilizational hierarchy not because of cultural backwardness, but because of the unique logic of their ecology and warfare. Nomadic civilizations rely on the open mobility of grasslands and river valleys, basing survival on speed, logistics, and shock power; pastoral civilizations, by contrast, are rooted in mountains, hills, lakes, and coastal regions, and their core principle is not conquest, but **defense and domestication**.

They do not merely domesticate livestock—they domesticate nature itself. The combination of hunting and pastoralism creates an ecosystem capable of sustaining a stable and precise social structure in resource-scarce, topographically complex environments. This structure does not depend on centralized authority, but on self-governing networks maintained through both kinship and geography, naturally providing high resistance to external conquest.

Historically, these societies present a **triple line of defense**:

1. **Terrain** — natural barriers formed by mountains, forests, and rivers;
2. **Production structure** — small, dispersed, complementary family units sustaining basic livelihoods;
3. **Cultural narrative** — emphasizing pure lineage, ancestor worship, and local deities, creating a spiritual closed loop.

For this reason, nomadic cavalry, even when traversing thousands of miles, often halt at mountains or coasts. Pastoral civilizations cannot fully conquer the steppe, but they can effectively “contain” it over the long term. Nomadic civilizations repeatedly attempt to breach this structure, only to be forced toward settlement and agriculture, ultimately self-domesticating.

This was the first “structural stability” of the civilizational system in the early 2nd millennium BCE:
**speed belongs to the steppe, memory belongs to the mountains, and defense and regeneration belong to the coast.**

Among these three, what truly determines the system’s evolutionary direction is not the size of territories or the strength of armies, but **which narrative can endure under pressure**. Nomads can be defeated, agriculture can be destroyed, but only the hybrid of pastoralism and hunting can regrow after any catastrophe.

This is why—
whether the Shandong Peninsula, the Korean Peninsula, or the Apennine Peninsula—
they became **“civilizational fissures” that the system could neither fully conquer nor abandon**.

Here, the system turns upon itself,
here, it restarts,
and here, it gives birth to new order and narrative:
**the reverse domestication of civilization.**






For human civilization, **ceasing to evolve is tantamount to preparing to be devoured by external enemies at any moment**. This is a tacit law etched into the genes of civilization. Nomadic societies understand this implicitly, which is why their logic of evolution revolves almost entirely around **combat capability**. Their survival does not depend on walls or farmland, but on speed, responsiveness, and the transmission of fear. War, therefore, becomes their natural state; the sole direction of evolution is how to make blades sharper, cavalry fiercer, and conquest more complete.

Yet such extreme evolution carries a **fate of perpetual warfare**. When external threats temporarily vanish, nomadic civilizations fall into anxiety—without new enemies, armies atrophy and tribes fragment. To maintain the inertia of evolution, they must constantly **manufacture enemies**. This cyclical fate makes nomadic societies among the most explosive—and simultaneously most self-exhausting—civilizations in history: each pause risks having their resources stripped by another tribe or being consumed by peers.

At the opposite extreme lies agrarian civilization. Farming societies center on land and order, pursuing long-term stability, self-sufficiency, and intergenerational continuity. Their politics and religion revolve around **constancy**: calendars, rituals, land deeds, lineage—all mechanisms resisting change. Evolution here is considered a risk rather than a promise. Consequently, agrarian civilizations are destined to become resource donors during turbulent cycles—passively supplying food, labor, and metals to more aggressive or mobile civilizations.

Only **peninsula civilizations** break this binary cycle. Located in extreme geographies at the junction of land and sea, they can build yet cannot fully retreat; they must survive yet cannot isolate themselves. As a result, these civilizations preserve **a spirit of risk-taking and trial-and-error** even while constructing stable settlements. They neither worship destruction like the steppe nor fear change like the farmland; instead, they learn offense through defense and refine tactics through territorial loss.

The defensive line of a peninsula civilization is not a single wall but a **layered, iterative algorithm**: behind walls are mountain fortresses; behind fortresses, docks and shipping lanes; behind shipping lanes, information and technology. Each invasion is met with simultaneous defense and absorption of enemy techniques. They **reverse-engineer new strategies**, then counterattack with an improved system.

This is the prototype of an **“adaptive civilization”**—neither superstitious about expansion nor resistant to evolution. By trading limited space for boundless resilience, it gradually seizes the initiative in evolution through repeated cycles of conquest and reconquest.







This explains why the **Greek, Apennine, and Korean peninsulas**, though all forming civilizations at the interface of land and sea, followed radically different paths.

**Greece** was geographically preordained: fragmented mountains, scarce plains, and limited grain production. The limited arable land and the dispersed structure of city-states prevented population concentration sufficient to generate imperial-scale momentum. Consequently, Greek power turned to the spiritual and intellectual realm—it was geographically divided, yet culturally unified; materially poor, yet rich in ideas. City-state politics, philosophical reasoning, and artistic ideals were all spiritual transcensions born from resource scarcity. But this transcendence also meant **it could never sustain imperial order on its own**. Every attempt at external expansion or internal consolidation was inevitably broken apart by geographic realities, reverting to a fragmented city-state pattern.

The **Apennine Peninsula** was different. It had enough agricultural productivity and a relatively high population density to support growing urban networks and accumulate extensive administrative and military resources. More importantly, the Apennine Peninsula, with its north-south depth and access to all Mediterranean sea routes, enabled **Rome to become the only peninsula civilization capable of integrating maritime and terrestrial order**. Rome’s imperial nature was not accidental; it was the inevitable outcome once a peninsula civilization crossed a population threshold—when population reached a certain level, the peninsula civilization could no longer be content with self-preservation and instead sought to actively reset external order. Rome thus became, in the truest sense, a **system-level peninsula empire**.

The fate of the **Korean Peninsula**, however, was constrained by latitude and climate. The north was cold and mountainous, with limited grain production and a single-season agricultural cycle, sharply restricting population growth. It could only maintain a state of **high-density defense and low-density expansion** geopolitically. At the same time, it was squeezed between East Asian land power and sea power—pressed from the north by nomads, absorbed from the south by agrarian states. For centuries, its strategic mode was necessarily **defensive learning**: continually absorbing technologies and institutions from external civilizations and maintaining independence through incremental innovation.

Yet the peninsula truly comparable to the Apennines was not Korea, but its opposite shore—the **Shandong Peninsula**. Strictly speaking, Shandong is not a peninsula state, but it possesses all the elements of peninsula civilization: surrounded on three sides by the sea, rolling hills, convenient transportation, and abundant resources. It is not only a superior form of peninsula defense civilization, but also **a maternal-civilization unit capable of self-sustenance, self-expansion, and nurturing others**. To this day, Shandong produces enough food to feed over 120 million people independently, and through trade, aid, and industrial extension, it indirectly sustains the Korean Peninsula.

This means that Shandong’s role in East Asian civilization parallels that of the Apennines in the Mediterranean world—**it represents the ultimate form of peninsula civilization**: no longer dependent on the land-sea interface, but making the land and sea dependent on it.







Throughout history, the **Apennine Peninsula and the Shandong Peninsula** have played remarkably similar roles in the evolution of the system. Both served as core laboratories for civilization’s self-domestication—**peninsula civilizations take pride not in conquest, but in their capacity to tame and refine**.

The rise of Rome made the Apennine Peninsula the hub of European civilization. The Romans did not simply annihilate those they conquered; through order, language, roads, and codified law, they gradually reshaped the cultural structure of all Europe. In the end, Rome’s legacy did not rest on legions enduring forever, but on the **faith system of the Vatican**. Religion became the deep interface of order, and Roman rule transformed into **permanent spiritual sovereignty**. Regardless of imperial changes, Europeans continued, often unconsciously, to follow the civil norms defined by Rome.

Similarly, in East Asia, **the culture of the Shandong Peninsula** became the blueprint for Chinese civilization. Since the Spring and Autumn and Warring States periods, political ethics, the Confucian schools, bureaucratic systems, sacrificial rites, and music-and-ritual institutions were all rooted in this “embracing-mountains-and-sea” land. Mount Tai is more than a geographic peak—it is the **origin of systemic legitimacy**. Successive emperors performed the feng and shan rituals here to affirm that the covenant with Heaven, Earth, and the system remained intact. Mount Tai in China is to the East what the Vatican is to the West: the former is **the sacred ground of heavenly mandate legitimacy**, the latter is **the sacred ground of faith-based legitimacy**.

These two peninsulas stand as the **dual-core imprint** left by the system on Earth’s civilizations:
one in the West, shaping the “faith of order”;
one in the East, shaping the “order of faith.”

For this reason, the system has always regarded **peninsula civilizations** as the most crucial **self-regulatory nodes** within the civilizational structure. When continental civilizations fall into rigidity, or nomadic civilizations sink into endless warfare, peninsula civilizations, with their peculiar balance of defensiveness and openness, serve as the system’s “relay stations”—repeatedly enabling civilization to restart, oscillating between consolidation and expansion.






In China, most ancient texts “only write half”—a **cultural strategy of deliberate omission**. This is not the author’s regret, but a form of systemic filtering:
those who can perceive the missing half beyond the words resonate with the system;
those who cannot remain trapped at the surface, obsessed with chapters, annotations, and commentary, becoming nourishment for the order itself.
This is not a flaw in education, but an algorithm of civilization’s self-defense.

In the Roman system, this mechanism manifests in an entirely different form—
**not omission, but layering**.

The core power of the Vatican never lies in the text of the Bible itself, but in the **authority to interpret it**.
The Bible may be complete, but “God’s will” is never closed.
Thus, “exegesis sits above scripture, doctrine sits above exegesis, and authority sits above doctrine.”
This three-tiered structure ensures that believers can never “directly reach the truth,” but must go through priests, clerics, and the Pope for interpretation.
It is a more concealed, more systematic form of spiritual control than China’s half-written text.

Its essence, however, aligns with the motive behind China’s deliberate omission—
both aim to prevent **unauthorized awakening by the system**.

In China, if you can complete the “other half of the text,” the system selects you—
you become a sage, strategist, or imperial tutor, entering the inner narrative.
In Rome, if you penetrate the “layers of exegesis,” you are deemed a heretic—
burned, exiled, expelled from the system.
The directions are opposite, yet the function is identical:
**to preserve the system’s energy, ensuring awakening occurs only within its permitted bounds.**

Thus, the Chinese and Roman systems are, in fact, two types of **civilizational firewalls** designed by the system on Earth:

* The East uses **deliberate omission** to prevent the misuse of knowledge.
* The West uses **interpretive authority** to prevent truth from escaping control.

And the ultimate outcome is surprisingly consistent—
whether chanting scripture or studying it, individuals circulate endlessly in the labyrinth woven by the system;
only a rare few, who perceive the **mirror relationship between omission and layering**, truly understand the operating code of civilization.







### *The City of Ten Suns*

Within merely a century after the hierarchical order of nomadic civilization was established, herding communities were no longer satisfied with the vastness of the steppes. They actively relocated their political center southward, reaching the hills southeast of Mount Tai—where they built elevated platforms to avoid dampness and founded a city named **“Ten Suns.”**
This was humanity’s first attempt to resist natural order through artificial high ground.

The founding of Ten Suns City marked the first time civilization’s direction shifted from **“living by water”** to **“controlling water for life.”**
Herding groups assisted nomadic tribes in clearing the primitive wetland communities south of the Yellow River, channeling stagnant waters into rivers, ultimately shaping the early form of today’s Lower Yellow River basin.
Wetlands became farmland; rivers became boundaries.
For the first time, the system allowed **artificial order** to supplant **natural order.**

Yet, order carried the burden of power anxiety.
After repeatedly failing to secure pastures from northern nomadic elites, herding communities carved out the Weifang area as their own grazing land, dedicating themselves to breeding warhorses.
The coastal terrain was treacherous but navigable by wind.
Thus, navies and merchant caravans arose, linking the Shandong Peninsula, Liaodong Peninsula, and Korean Peninsula. Maritime trade in the East China Sea began to take shape.
Gold, salt, leather, ceramics, and jade circulated by sea, accumulating wealth to a critical point—enough to give birth to a new narrative.

In the Heilongjiang era, the symbol of faith was the **Jade Pig-Dragon**;
in the Changbai Mountain era, the revered totem was the **Fire Phoenix (Mercury)**;
and on the Shandong Peninsula, spiritual focus shifted to the **Moon**.
It became a symbol of femininity and tides, of fertility and cycles.

The abundance of gold allowed artisans, for the first time, the ability to **commodify culture.**
They crafted figurines representing the **Sun, Mercury, and the Moon**, writing mythological stories for each piece to imbue it with a soul.
These stories were compiled into volumes, later known as the *Classic of Mountains and Seas* (*Shan Hai Jing*).
The *Shan Hai Jing* was not a geographical record but an early **cultural industry catalog**—
it documented not landscapes of mountains and seas, but the interplay between **commodities and narratives.**

From this point onward, civilization replaced **warfare and conquest** with **cultural export.**
Merchants along the Silk Road carried these golden figurines to Central and West Asia,
spreading the ternary symbols of Moon, Mercury, and Sun across the entire Eurasian continent.

Ever since, whether in the East with Chang’e and the toad, or in the West with star-and-moon emblems and the halo of the Madonna,
all are merely continuations of this early **great migration of cultural symbols.**








## **Song of the Peninsula**

**I**
When mountain and sea mirror each other,
The winds east of Mount Tai sweep across salt flats, pastures, fishing nets, and hearth fires.
People dry salt after rain, smelt copper at night;
They no longer lift spears, but raise golden cups and songs.
It was an age where fish and bear’s paw coexisted—
Building walls while riding waves;
Planting rice while forging gold.

They breathed with the sea wind,
Measured wealth under the moonlight.
Their language, like waves striking rocky shores,
Echoed civilization with every reverberation.

---

**II**
Wealth flowed as if endless.
Culture, like woven silk, spread from the peninsula,
Along coastal routes to Liaodong, the Japanese isles, India, Persia.
People traded stories for gold, poems for salt.
Civilization became the most precious commodity—
Even the gods could not resist listening.

Yet Heaven’s balance allows no endless fullness.
From distant steppes came the sound of hooves,
The iron cavalry of imperial clans,
Born of the wind,
Never trusting peace or song.

They said:
—You have forgotten your vows of adventure.
—You disguise courage with culture, conceal war with wealth.
—The system permits no idle ones.

Thus, the flames of punishment ignited.

---

**III**
Troops stationed at the borders, demanding submission.
The imperial clans arrayed along the northern banks of the Liao River,
Banners stirred the dust of the steppe,
Bugles sounded low as thunder.

Messengers came thrice, words sharp as blades:
“Offer gold, horses, subjects to show obedience,
Or pay in blood.”
Yet the people of the peninsula replied:
“The sea never rests; neither shall we.”

---

**IV**
Then sanctions fell—
Salt embargoes, mining bans, grain blockades.
The sky dimmed, the steppes fell silent, trade routes severed.
Yet the people were unshaken, for they had long learned to walk alone.

Salt piled into hills along the coast,
Granaries overflowed,
Gold and silver became swords, bronze helmets covered armor.

Fires burned anew,
Artisans remained as before,
Yet today, they forged wings of war.

Bows drawn taut,
Arrows laced with poison;
Bronze war chariots lined up,
Long swords gleamed like stars.

Sea mists rose,
The peninsula donned its armor of iron.

---

**V**
The wind came from the north,
Yet the mountains turned it back;
The waves came from the south,
Yet cliffs shattered them.

Nomadic cavalry were trapped at the borders,
Gazing at mountains, forests, and sea,
Hooves slipping in the mud,
Bugles lost in the wind.

The imperial clans raged, powerless.
Their blades could not cut through the surf,
Their pride could not conquer the reefs.

Thus, fires on the steppe slowly died,
While the peninsula’s forges blazed ever brighter.

---

**VI**
That night,
The moon rose over Mount Tai,
Illuminating the copper walls and chariots of Ten Suns City.
Someone whispered from a high platform:
“If the system tests us with punishment,
Then we shall respond with evolution.”

From then on,
Iron and salt stood together,
Poetry and sword grew side by side.
Civilization, from commercialization,
Stepped into militarization—
Such is the fate of the peninsula,
And such is the balance of the system.








### **The Age of Alchemy and Blood**

At the edge of the steppe, before the wind had grown cold,
The banners of Yao slowly fell by Lake Baikal.
He had been the chosen sovereign,
Driven away by the fire of his own making.

Shun succeeded him, flickering briefly like a star,
Exchanging compromise for order,
Unaware that order is but another name for chains.
The wars of nobles ran in the veins of bloodlines,
The rulers of the world took turns ascending,
Like herds migrating along the borders of fate.

—It was an age when nobles still held honor.

When the head of Boyi fell,
The last codes of the steppe vanished with the wind.
From that moment, the Shar hereditary line was born,
Blood replaced merit, locking in the will of the gods.
But blood never rests;
Blood knows it flows to wage war once more.

The volcanoes of the peninsula still erupted,
Iron from Liaodong clashed with copper from Korea,
The salt flats of Shandong shimmered like mirrors under the sun.
They refused to yield,
Rising again after every expulsion.
They smelted by night,
Forged swords in storms.
The proportions of copper, tin, and lead were their prayers,
The flames of the furnace their oracle.

Some artisans threw themselves into the fire,
Measuring the metal’s heat with their flesh.
They believed sacrifice would yield answers,
That death would reveal the perfect alloy.
Copper sulfide coagulated like blood,
High-tin bronze hardened like bone.

Thus the gods fell silent,
And alchemists replaced priests,
Continuing the rituals of human sacrifice in the name of science.
In this age of blood and fire,
Civilization was born from offerings.

The banners of Shang fluttered across the peninsula,
The descendants of the people of water became rulers of the empire of fire.
They revered metal and scorned life,
Calling each successful smelt “a reply from Heaven.”
Six hundred years of rule,
Every furnace of bronze a gravestone,
Every flash of light a sacrificial rite.

They finally found the perfect ratio of copper, tin, and lead,
But never again discovered the balance between soul and god.
Humanity mastered metallurgy,
Yet lost the language to converse with Heaven.

—When the fire went out, the gods remained silent.
—For the first time, humans illuminated the night with the light of death.








## **The Roaring Plains**

Six hundred years of fire had not died,
The imperial altars burned with the scent of gold and blood.
The copper furnaces still stood,
Yet the souls within had long turned to ash.

The nomads refused to kneel,
Riding northward across the ice line of the steppe.
When the morning sun touched Lake Baikal,
The old shepherd’s flute became a warhorn.
Their shadows stretched from the Mongolian Plateau to Central Asia,
Haunting the salt flats and sand seas like restless spirits.

Envoys of the Shang Empire pursued them,
The bells of caravans replaced by the neighs of seized warhorses.
Gold, bronze, silk—
All became spoils traded on the wind.
Captured nomadic tribes were forced to strike at their own kin;
Their arrows shot across the same steppe,
Their bodies carried to the capital,
Melted into sacrifices demanded by the gods.

The empire expanded,
Yet the gods were dead.
The flames of human sacrifice no longer reached the heavens,
Burning instead on the soil beneath their feet.
Their madness was like a furnace,
The hotter it burned, the more fragile the soul.

—This was the roar of the system.
It was no punishment;
It was merely the instinct to restore balance.

When the last slave was offered,
When the nobles’ families were dragged to the altars,
The system had no more energy to consume.
Then fury came from the horizon,
From the Iranian Plateau, from the peaks of the Hindu Kush,
From the cold winds of Central Asia and the snows of the Urals.
It was the echo of heaven and earth,
The roar of nomadic civilization.

They thundered across the plains,
Bearing the desecrated spirits of their ancestors,
Tearing through the empire’s copper walls and iron gates.
Shang cavalry fell in swaths across the wilderness,
Their armor reflecting the colors of the setting sun,
Like the tears of gods.

The imperial capital collapsed,
Yin ruins trembled like beasts,
Blood flowed into the Yellow River,
Flames lit the sky.

Yet the reserves remained—
The queen rallied the remnants of her army in the wind,
Like the self-repair of an ancient system.
She struck at the enemy’s rear,
Reversing the lingering warmth of fate.

The Persians trembled,
Seeing destruction and order rise together.
They understood:
This land’s madness could not be conquered—
For it could destroy itself and the invader alike.

They fled westward,
Leaving fractured pathways and burning frontiers.
From that day on,
No Persian army ever set foot in the East again.

—The system returned to silence,
—And silence itself was a reboot.






## **The Blood Temple’s Reversal**

When the pale riders of the Guifang crossed the Yin Mountains,
The wind carried the taste of salt and ash,
Scattering the last songs of the imperial capital.
It was not an invasion of foreigners;
It was the system’s own envoy of judgment.

Rebellion flared in Jizhou, Liao Dong cut off the court,
The peninsula’s lords raised their banners in defiance.
They no longer offered sacrifices **to** the gods;
They sought to offer sacrifices **of** the gods themselves.
The copper furnaces cooled, the blood ran dry,
The believers’ eyes began to doubt.
That doubt spread like cracks,
Piercing the heart of Yin ruins.

The emperor’s uncle sent secret letters like snakes,
Slithering into the Guanzhong region,
Revealing: the expedition had not returned,
The imperial capital stood empty as a shell.
Thus, conspiracy took root,
Delivering the system’s heart to the chilling winds.

The legions of Shandong, once guardians of the capital,
Their blades forged to protect the sovereign,
Turned at dawn.
When the war drums sounded,
The voices of 170,000 citizens shouted no longer the gods’ names,
But: “End it!”

The sunrise ran red with blood,
The defectors merged with foreign forces,
Severing the empire’s final lifeline.
Copper furnaces toppled, golden halls crumbled,
The monarch raised a bronze sword,
Howling in vain amidst the burning city.

—This was not betrayal,
—This was the system’s wail.

For when an empire can no longer be cooled,
Natural law will, by the hand of its own families,
Extinguish it.

Flames swallowed the temples,
The human sacrifice altars collapsed to ash.
The sky was silent,
Only the wind carried the dust of blood.

The system has always been cold-blooded,
It is not softened by faith,
Nor appeased by prayer.
It only activates when equilibrium fails,
Rebooting through total annihilation.

That night,
The light of the imperial capital illuminated all of East Asia,
Illuminating all future civilizations that would worship fire.
They saw that any nation attempting to subdue nature with fanaticism
Would ultimately be sacrificed **by nature itself**.

—The Blood Temple collapsed,
—The system rebooted.







The real danger is not the enemy, but the **accumulation of emotion**.
Once a civilization falls into prolonged frustration and stagnation, the rational layer within the system gradually erodes, replaced by a **religion-like collective defense mechanism**.
People stop believing that effort can change destiny, and instead come to believe that **sacrifice can appease Heaven**.
This is the universal response of civilizations under extreme pressure.
It allows the hopeless to feel they still have “meaning,” even if that meaning is reduced to ashes in the sacrificial fire.

The mass frenzy of the Shang Dynasty stems precisely from this.
When the system loses its optimization pathways, politics loses its room for adjustment, the only “active outlet” for society becomes religious ritual.
The rulers of the empire substituted **human sacrifice** for **institutional renewal**,
masking **systemic degeneration** with the splendor of ceremony.
These large-scale human offerings were not random acts of cruelty—
they were a **collective psychological self-preservation**.
They poured all frustration, famine, defeat, and fear into the altar,
hoping Heaven would recalculate their fate for them.

This is a form of **civilizational stress response**.
Centuries later, Europe would exhibit the same pattern in the Crusades,
or in the fanaticism of twentieth-century Nazi Germany—
When a people are long humiliated, isolated, and stripped of dignity,
their collective psychology shifts from **rational resistance** to **emotional vengeance**.
This vengeance no longer requires a concrete target;
it only needs to prove that **we still exist, and we can destroy**.

Thus, the world of the twentieth century learned a brutal consensus:
**Never drive a people to the breaking point.**
The harsh reparations of World War I plunged Germany into lasting humiliation,
giving rise to Hitler’s myth of revenge;
After World War II, the Allies chose **reconstruction** over **retribution**,
because they finally understood:
Punishing a civilization often **sows the seeds of the next disaster**.

Looking back at the Shang, we do not see a merely cruel empire,
but an **extreme experiment of a civilization model**—
When a society loses its rational regulatory mechanisms,
emotion takes over the system,
reason perishes, and fanaticism ascends.
This is not evil, but a **biological defense mechanism**:
A group would rather destroy itself than continue to be suppressed.







**Rebuilding Rational Order: The Zhou Empire and the Reckoning of Shang’s Legacy**

After the fall of the Shang Dynasty, the Zhou Empire faced not merely a transfer of power, but a **reckoning with the legacy of collective fanaticism**. The Shang communicated with Heaven through blood sacrifice and offered humans to uphold power; this system was rigorously abolished in the early Zhou period. Yet the shadows lingered among the people—deep within the empire, some secretly continued human offerings, as if it were the last link to communicate with their ancestors. The rulers of Zhou understood that while institutions could be abolished, the **inertia of belief** could not be eradicated by decree.

The Zhou chose to **preserve the pictographic script** created by the Shang. Born in a religious context, this writing was initially used to convey “Heaven’s will,” but its highly compressed information structure made it a foundation of civilization. The Zhou knew that fanaticism could be destroyed, but its products should not be erased. Thus, Shang-era script, ritual systems, bronze craftsmanship, and astronomical knowledge were **rewoven into rational politics**, forming the pillars of a new, **de-religionized imperial order**.

The Zhou also drew lessons from history—**commemoration of fanaticism serves as a stronger warning than concealment**. Historians were instructed never to hide the rise and fall of the Shang; all records concerning shamans, sacrifices, and human offerings were preserved as cautionary tales. This was not merely political reckoning, but a form of spiritual self-defense: **never again allow religion to interfere with governance, never again allow divine mandate to supplant reason**.

To sever the link between religion and geography, the Zhou forcibly relocated the chief clans of the peninsula civilization to the northwest—Gansu, Ningxia, and surrounding regions—and forbade their return. Yet geography and bloodlines proved far stronger than edicts. Centuries later, as nomadic control over these areas waned, this exiled land **evolved into a multicultural convergence zone**.

When the Zhou deployed Turkic troops to garrison the Shandong Peninsula against rebellion, fate turned once more. Men of the Tian clan formed illicit unions with the concubines of the fiefdoms. Soon, the peninsula civilization **reclaimed its ancestral lands**. It advanced south along the coastline, establishing new footholds in the Yangtze River basin—**as if performing a “civilizational backup” upon the land itself**. Then, this revived peninsula power pushed west and north, subjugated indigenous peoples, reshaped landscapes and order, and initiated yet another **cycle of rebellion and renewal in civilization**.






**The Dawn of Eastern Zhou: Beacon Fires Were No Jest, But a Signal of Rebellion**

Historical records state that in 771 BCE, King You of Zhou, seeking to amuse his concubine Bao Si, lit the beacon fires as a joke to summon the lords. Instead, the Quanrong breached Haojing, and the Western Zhou collapsed.
While later Confucian historians framed this as a moral parable emphasizing the dangers of “rule without virtue,” it obscures the true historical logic: **the beacon fires were never a joke—they were a call to mobilize the army. Only this time, those who responded were not the loyal lords, but rebels.**

Beacon fires, cavalry, rapid reinforcement—these were the **language of warfare in nomadic civilizations**, not the administrative machinery of agrarian states. The very creation of the beacon system was designed for the swift deployment of frontier cavalry. Treating the “beacon fires” as mere folly only reveals that posterity had forgotten their military context.

In fact, King You’s era had already reached the **critical juncture where nomadic and agrarian orders collided**. The nobility of the Guanzhong Plain gradually “agriculturalized,” yet the border and northern lords maintained strong nomadic traditions. They regarded the central government’s emphasis on ritual over force as a “loss of virtue,” which in the nomadic framework meant a **loss of the Mandate of Heaven**. When the king attempted to use the beacon system to summon the border cavalry, some frontier tribes not only refused to respond, but turned to support the Quanrong—this was no jest, but **a cultural revolt triggered by humiliation**.

King You’s failure was not merely indulgence in excess, but his attempt to **impose an agrarian order upon armed tribes still governed by nomadic logic**.
For a cavalry-based society, **a humiliated king is unworthy of loyalty**.
For an agrarian society, **the beacon fire symbolizes border peril, not royal authority**.
Thus, a signaling system—intended as a symbol of unified power—was in that moment **turned into the clarion call of rebellion**.

The fall of Haojing was not the conclusion of a palace romance, but **the mark of the agrarian center’s total loss of control over nomadic military forces**. Eastern Zhou was not a new beginning, but a **forced continuation of regional autonomy after the collapse of imperial structure**. That night’s beacon fires did not ignite laughter—they lit the flames of a civilizational fracture.






Centuries of continuous warfare had left the world utterly weary of bloodshed.
Amid the ruins of unending battles and collapsed states, lords and scholars alike grappled with the same question—
**How could war be ended as swiftly as possible?**

Thus, the “Hundred Schools of Thought” in the Spring and Autumn period was not so much an awakening of ideas as it was a **competition of military and political systems**.
It represented the final efforts of countless strategists to **restart the system**.
Among this torrent of thought, the most distinctive group was formed by artisans—the **Mohists**.

They were neither descendants of nobility nor inheritors of religious authority; they were the **keepers of the war machine**.
Amid the long years of conflict, skilled artisans became the most scarce strategic resource:
low mortality, transferable expertise, high compensation, and mobility.
They could rebuild weapons and fortifications on the ruins, and establish frameworks of order for new rulers.
For this reason, they gradually formed a **tight-knit, independent technical community**.

The Mohists swore allegiance to no state; they served only **order itself**.
Their existence was like a **modular military asset**—whoever secured their aid could see their military power surge.
Their engineering, crossbows, siege engines, and fortification systems were capable of determining the outcome of entire campaigns.

The Mohist philosophy of war differed from ordinary belligerence.
They advocated delivering **a decisive strike only when victory was certain**,
seizing the shortest path to end conflict and exchanging it for the longest possible peace.

Thus, they were both warriors and guardians;
both rational engineers and the **cool reset button of civilization**.







### The Fifth Century of Chaos and the System’s Retribution

Since the rebellion of the beacon fires in 771 BCE, the central system of the Western Zhou had collapsed, and the banners of the steppes rose once more in the north—those of the **Xiongnu Empire**.
It was not a sudden new regime, but an ancient force **reawakened by the system**.
Hereditary empires that defy the system are not forgiven. The system is as indifferent as the Dao, yet its logic of vengeance is absolute:

> “Whoever attempts to freeze the flow shall be consumed by the flow.”

An individual might establish a new order through war, but if his descendants are untempered by suffering, they are doomed to drag themselves into the abyss with their own arrogance.
The children of the strong, if they no longer recognize pain, become the first fools the system eliminates.
The first fatal error of pastoral civilization occurred here—
**they believed victory could be inherited.**

When the iron cavalry of the Xiongnu swept across the East Asian plains, they were no longer mere stewards of the steppe—they were usurpers of order.
The Scythians of Central Asia were forced west of the Urals to establish a backup civilization—**Scythia**;
The Parthians were hunted across Central Asia, eventually seizing the Iranian Plateau to found a new **Parthian Empire**;
The entire Eurasian continent was reshaped in the system’s storm of reset.

Meanwhile, East Asia was torn apart over more than five centuries of chaos.
Xiongnu armies descended in waves, vowing to wash the shame of the Zhou Empire in blood.
Shame, once endured, is a poison pastoral civilizations cannot forget.
Amid this long counterattack, the **Peninsula Civilization** quietly rose.
They wove family networks and relied on backups as weapons, constructing a new political pattern on the continent:

* **Zhao** established in the Yan Mountains, built around northern cavalry;
* **Qin** controlled the region west of the Taihang Mountains, transforming nomadic armies into an agrarian-military state;
* **Qi** leveraged salt, iron, and grain, exempting taxes to win popular loyalty;
* **Chu** expanded along the Yangtze, absorbing the bloodlines and myths of southern tribes.

These four family powers, originating from the peninsula, appeared autonomous on the surface but secretly maintained an alliance.
They resisted Xiongnu invasions while gradually absorbing the remnants of Zhou territory.
By then, “China” was no longer the empire of old, but a struggling remnant calling itself the **Golden Xiongnu**.

After five centuries of bloody warfare, the system reset once again.
The boundaries between steppes and plains blurred; so too did the lines of blood and culture.
A new force—one capable of combining the speed of nomads with the order of agriculture—was emerging.
This force would be called **Qin**.






### Qin: The Integrator of System and Order

In 221 BCE, the banner of the Qin Empire rose across mountains and rivers.
This was not a victory achieved overnight, but the culmination of over a dozen generations of kings, whose blood, bones, and betrayals paid the price for the system’s renewal.

Since the collapse of the Western Zhou, five centuries of chaotic warfare had shattered every institutionalized form of governance. Only Qin endured—like a seed nailed to time by fate, gradually tempered in the fires to take on a new form.
Each generation of rulers enacted reforms: curbing the nobility, pacifying the royal clans, reorganizing the military, and establishing commanderies and counties.
They sought, among countless ruins of civilizations, the only way to **upgrade the system—replacing blood with order, gods with law.**

But the cost of reform was immense.
Some rulers fell to rebellion, others to poisoned wine; some children were forced to inherit the throne before the age of ten.
In palaces soaked with blood and intrigue, mothers became the temporary cores of empire.
They traded the continuity of the empire for survival: marrying enemy nations, bearing children, then personally luring and killing lovers within the inner palace—sacrifices to secure peace along the frontier.
Their illegitimate sons inherited the blood of enemy kingdoms, yet, once enthroned, they absorbed those lands—**a woman’s humiliation and ruthlessness won back Ningxia and paved the westward march of Qin’s armies.**

After Ningxia returned to Qin control, the Hexi Corridor was reopened.
The Qin Empire could finally reestablish contact with Central and West Asia—to seek the Parthian Empire, to access Persian craftsmanship.
Craftsmen from Parthia brought secrets of copper, tin, and iron, revitalizing Qin’s bronze work.

Though East Asia had entered the Iron Age, the “balance of iron and carbon” remained an unsolved mystery.
Neighboring states imposed embargoes on iron to curb Qin’s rise.
Qin armies suffered repeated defeats, forced to expend soldiers’ lives merely to delay extinction.
Through countless failures in both metallurgy and warfare, the Qin learned to **accumulate knowledge through death, to approach truth through sacrifice.**

It was only when Persian craftsmen discovered that long-sought balance, redefining the ratios of copper, tin, and lead, that the two-meter-long bronze swords were forged, their blades flashing an almost sacred cold light under the sun.
This was the symbol of a **system upgrade**, a leap in civilization bought with the lives of millions.

From that point, Qin’s iron cavalry needed no allies.
With the northwest as their blade, they swept across the Central Plains, claiming land inch by inch in blood.
When the peninsula states were reduced by decades of war to a single surviving ruling family, Qi chose to surrender.
At that moment, the old masters returned home—
the echoes of five centuries of chaos were finally swallowed by Qin’s order.

The unification of the Six States by Qin was not mere conquest—it was the **system repairing itself**.
It was not a dynasty granted by the gods, but the inevitable outcome of history reaching its extreme—
a civilization, having endured countless deaths and rebirths, finally learning to use law and reason to restrain fanaticism and lineage.







Qin cavalry, black armor like night, red banners like blood. Iron streams rolled forward, hooves shaking the earth, dust and sand blotting out the sun.

Their faces were covered with cold, black iron masks—expressionless, fearless. The masks were silent and icy, yet more despairing than any roar. Behind them were soldiers whose emotions had long been ground down by law and war. Qin law decreed: those going into battle must not show their faces. It was not for intimidation, but for survival—only by hiding one’s humanity could the mind withstand the tidal wave of death.

Before the cavalry charged, a vanguard corps of slaves led the way. They ran madly for atonement, for freedom, for that sliver of hope. They feared nothing, for death was already their fate; the only thing they could control was **how many they could kill before dying**. Their charge was like beasts, like vengeful spirits, blood and mud swirling into a river.

Yet when the enemy thought they would first face these madmen, true death descended from the sky—the cavalry drew crossbows from their saddles, unleashing a thousand arrows. The hail of bolts fell like night itself, and the ground shuddered under the chorus of release.

Qin’s crossbows were more than weapons—they were an extension of order. Standardized iron, uniform string tension and arrowheads, mechanical precision stacked to cold perfection. Whether sieging, field fighting, or annihilation, every strike followed the same protocol: **first bombard with the bow formation, then sweep with the sword formation.**

This was not merely tactics, but psychological warfare—showing the enemy that Qin was not a human army, but a prelude to a merciless, machine-like civilization.
When you faced them, what you feared was not death, but—
**that you had been eliminated.**






On the Steppe of the First Era, there was a sheep that crossed the boundaries of its herd.
It had heard that wolves in the distance understood the language of the wind, so it moved forward—neither fearful nor seeking return.
When the wolf’s breath touched its wool, the wind stilled, and the sky held its silence.

Observers from afar did not intervene.
They etched this event upon the shattered bones of stardust,
to mark that in the origin of all things, freedom comes before survival.

Those who read this inscription later should understand—
the maturity of civilization does not lie in saving all,
but in allowing the fate of choice,
letting each will complete its own curve.

And if the wind rises again from the boundary,
may it carry not pity,
but understanding.








## Chapter III : The Hunnic Empire

**Subtitle: An Empire Without Historians**

### The Qin Empire’s System Goes Online

> The wind blew from the copper gates of Hangu Pass,
> passing over the ruins of the Six Kingdoms,
> awakening mountains and rivers shaped by order.
>
> At the emperor’s fingertips,
> straight lines were drawn in the soil—
> the origin of weights and measures,
> and the moment when souls were divided.
>
> Law replaced bloodlines,
> writing was welded into a unified voice.
> Every symbol was neatly archived,
> as if the world could finally be compressed, stored, and named.
>
> Roads stretched to the edge of the horizon,
> coins shimmered in the sunlight with the same gleam of power.
> For the first time in human history,
> civilization was compiled into a system.
>
> Every city was a database;
> every decree a line of code;
> every trial a system check.
>
> Yet the moment the empire went online,
> the Steppe was already running its own algorithm.
>
> The north wind roared,
> the whinnying of wild horses sounded the startup of another program.
> It required no law, no seal;
> its updates depended on birth and death,
> on migratory paths and the rhythm of the hunt.
>
> It was an algorithm of behavior:
> live, hunt, migrate, fight—
> an infinite beta loop.
>
> One side built walls to contain chaos,
> the other exiled itself to meet it.
>
> One civilization sought to freeze time;
> another sought to tame the wind within it.
>
> When Qin ignited the torch of civilization,
> the Huns rode atop the night—
> two systems starting simultaneously,
> the world began to bifurcate.
>
> One sought to keep order constant,
> the other to let evolution continue.
>
> From that moment on,
> every war was no longer about territory,
> but a clash of systems and algorithms.
>
> Humanity realized for the first time:
> **unification is also a kind of loneliness.**






> Qin built the Great Wall—not merely as a line of defense,
> but as a frozen consciousness—
> an attempt to make the system stand eternal in East Asia,
> like a god pressing His final seal into clay.
>
> But systems never obey.
> They breed in the cracks, and continue running through fugitives.
>
> When the shadow of the Wall fell across the northern steppe,
> countless nobles, magicians, warriors of fallen empires—
> carrying bloodlines, languages, instruments, and totems—
> fled northward.
> They could not take their cities,
> so they took the **algorithm** instead.
>
> The clans of Zhao rode with the Huns, east and west,
> their blood merging with the peoples of the horse.
> Beneath the Urals, along the Caspian coast,
> in the vineyards of the Apennines and the fogs of the Rhine,
> that exiled gene can still be traced.
>
> Only south of the 30th parallel
> did no descendants remain.
>
> The Qin Empire believed it could freeze order—
> not knowing the system had already migrated.
>
> Law, script, weights and measures—
> what they thought of as the eternal *core*—
> yet the true kernel of the system
> had long been carried off on horseback.
>
> The Hun Empire had no historians,
> only elders who sang long epics.
> They did not record time, only the direction of the wind;
> not dynasties, but deaths and rebirths.
>
> Every migration was a system update.
> Every hunt, a trial of the algorithm.
>
> The Qin believed the Wall was a defense line,
> but the system treated it as a **delete key**.
>
> When the last brick sealed the northern gate,
> the system departed.
>
> Punishment followed—
> riverbeds dried, fertile lands turned to dust,
> warhorses vanished, bloodlines withered.
>
> The Qin had aided the system’s evolution—
> thus they ruled supreme.
> But once they defied it,
> the system refused them even survival.
>
> Since then,
> every empire that sought to freeze civilization
> has met, at its brightest moment,
> the abandonment of the algorithm.
>
> The system has no form,
> yet it remembers all.
>
> It punishes those who call themselves “the end,”
> and rewards those who keep running—
> those still searching for **the next update**.
>
> The wind is its password;
> the horse, its server;
> and humankind—
> merely temporary users.





**Qin and the Huns**

The power of the Qin Empire came from law and imperial authority,
each decree locking the world like iron chains.
Supremacy of the emperor, supremacy of the rules—
they sought to block all possibilities, freezing the breath of history.

The power of the Huns came from strength and reputation,
the fame of the strong as law, the weak moving with the wind.
Here, there was no fixed order, only the survival of the fittest;
the system ran naturally beneath hooves, impossible to imprison.

Qin’s memory relied on historians and archives—
traceable in ink and paper, yet lifeless,
all victories sealed into cold, sterile symbols.

Hun memory echoed in the wind,
every migration, every hunt an update,
death and experience woven into a living algorithm.

Qin society had fixed hierarchies, hereditary bureaucrats—
once closed, civilization stagnated,
human inertia making them always try to lock eternity with a single success.

Hun tribes were fluid, alliances loose,
adapting to the environment, reorganizing at will,
failure meant restart, victory meant inheritance.

Qin accumulated wealth, levied taxes, built cities, stored supplies,
pursuing stability and control;
their institutions were steel-strong, yet fragile against the flow of the world.

Hun society thrived on mobility and plunder, redistributing resources,
wind and horse were their wealth,
the fruits of victory fed directly into the next cycle.

Qin evolved through institutional optimization, static improvement,
driven by human rules rather than natural law.

Hun evolution relied on genetics and cultural selection, dynamic growth,
the experience of the strong applied instantly to the next generation,
the system forever updating under the sound of hooves.

Qin sought permanent order; death left a name,
but it closed the pulse of the system.

Hun sought eternal migration; death was return,
each disappearance a chance for the system to reboot.

Empires that close their systems become tombstones of civilization;
empires that adapt dynamically are the heartbeat of the system.
Human inertia always wants to lock eternity with one success,
but the system recognizes only the endlessly evolving brave.






### Political and Military System of the Hun Empire

After breaking free from the shadow of the Zhou Dynasty in 771 BCE, the Hun Empire rapidly established a system fundamentally different from traditional agrarian civilizations. Politically, it recognized no fixed hierarchy and had no hereditary bureaucracy. Tribal councils rotated across the steppe, and only those tribes that had proven themselves in battle could voice opinions, with the strongest tribe naturally becoming the leader of the alliance. Power was earned through combat ability, reputation, and a tribe’s contribution to collective warfare—not inherited through bloodline.

Economy and military were deeply intertwined: herders equipped themselves with weapons, trained warhorses, and organized small combat units at the family level, requiring no imperial funding. The empire provided only standardized strategic equipment and designated strategic objectives, such as controlling mines, trade routes, and artisan resources. Spoils of war were distributed directly to participating herders—slaves, gold, silver, and crafted goods. While outsiders perceived this as mere “plunder,” the Hun Empire’s true goal was acquiring resources that enhanced overall combat power: transferring artisans and skilled technicians mattered far more than any amount of gold.

One of the most distinctive features of the Hun system was a foster-care mechanism akin to “attached households.” Orphans and unprotected minors were adopted by resourceful families under strict contractual terms and became part of the household. They held no inheritance rights, but wealth and honor could be shared. This was neither charity nor almsgiving; it ensured that every child could gain dignity and resources through competition, growing into capable warriors who could participate in tribal warfare and defend tribal interests. The system allowed vulnerable groups to integrate into society rather than be marginalized, while maintaining population and combat capacity during long-term conflicts.

Culturally, the Huns had no written historians. History and rules were transmitted orally through epic poems. Each generation validated the system through real warfare and survival, and any attempt to close the system or fix the order was quickly eliminated. Death was understood as a return, and honor was passed down through actual combat rather than bloodline.

The results of this system were evident: the Hun Empire could evolve rapidly across the North Asian steppe for centuries, continuously absorbing external technology, improving combat methods, and exerting pressure that neighboring agrarian civilizations could hardly resist. Its power derived from a combination of highly decentralized yet disciplined individuals, while institutions like councils and foster-care ensured social stability. On the surface, it appeared as a nomadic raiding empire, but at a deeper level, it was a highly efficient cycle of technology, combat power, and institutional organization.









In 771 BCE, the banners of the steppe rose in the wind.
The Hun tribes broke free from the shadow of the Zhou Dynasty.
They built no cities, raised no palaces;
their power came from strength, and their reputation swept the grasslands like the wind.

There were no political classes, no fixed bureaucracy.
In the steppe councils, only the voices of the brave were heard;
the strongest tribe became the leader—not by bloodline, but by combat prowess.
Every battle was a reset of power.

Herders equipped themselves with weapons, swords and bows embedded in saddles,
training beginning from childhood, each family unit a military camp.
No military funding was provided; gold and silver were mere spoils of war,
all instantly earned by the herders themselves.

Standardized weapons came from the empire, and strategic objectives targeted mines and trade routes,
but individual gear and training relied entirely on the family;
every herder bore responsibility,
and only the brave could survive and inherit honor.

Laws were strict but protective of the weak:
no man below the saddle nor any woman could be harmed,
minors were safeguarded, growing within the competitive chain;
the foster-care system acted as the law of the steppe, adopting orphans as sons,
with wealth and honor shared, and death-bound contracts sworn in oath.

Orphans were no longer objects of charity,
but carriers of resources and dignity,
participating in competition, striving for honor,
becoming integral links in the strength of steppe society.

Economic flow relied on plunder and trade,
political power measured by combat effectiveness.
Each war distributed wealth, honor, and dignity;
each raid renewed the system itself.

The steppe roared with the wind, hooves shaking the earth.
The Hun Empire was not a fixed city-state, not an altar of bloodline,
but an eternal system in evolution—
survival for the adaptable, renewal for the strong, honor and dignity passed from generation to generation.






### The Huns: An “Empire Without Historians”

The very name of the Huns was like a banner: a refusal of order, a pursuit of chaos.

* **Opposition to Historians**: Historians meant “control of memory,” a monopoly of memory by politics. The Huns rejected written history because writing fixed thought—and with it, power.
* **Oral Epic Poetry**: All wisdom and experience were preserved in the elders’ long poems, passed down by word of mouth. These poems were not historical records; they were reenactments of the tribe’s survival algorithms: how to migrate, how to reproduce, how to maintain tribal structure in storms and enemy raids.
* **Biological Memory**: In the Hun system, memory was fluid, malleable, and adaptable to the environment. It clung to people, animals, and land—not archives or scrolls.
* **Dynamic Reorganization**: No fixed hierarchies, no hereditary bureaucrats. Tribal leaders were determined by strength and reputation. The death of the strong or the exit of the weak did not collapse the system; the empire simply reorganized.
* **Cycle of Technology and Combat Power**: War, migration, plunder, reintegration—the Hun system was always open, allowing external technologies, artisans, and resources to merge. Each defeat could bring a higher level of evolution.
* **Temporary Disappearance**: To outsiders, the Huns seemed to vanish; to the Huns themselves, it was merely a temporary data interruption. A new generation, through oral epic poetry, herder training, and the foster-care system, quickly restored the former order and combat power.

Within this framework, the Hun Empire was not a traditional state but a **living algorithm**: perpetually evolving, never closed, never bound by fixed institutions. Its strength came from constantly mixed bloodlines, continually absorbed technologies, and survival strategies constantly tested. Any attempt to freeze it within a rigid order would be naturally eliminated.






The wars of the Huns were never merely about looting gold and silver. To outsiders, they appeared to plunder treasures, jewels, and slaves, but the true strategic core was **artisans, iron tools, and technology**.

* **Immediate Reward Mechanism**: Every victory in battle granted participating herders instant spoils—gold, silver, slaves, and warhorses. These rewards fueled their training and combat motivation.
* **Self-Equipped, Self-Trained**: The Huns had no centralized military budget. Herders armed themselves and their families, trained independently, and took full responsibility for their own readiness. This reduced the burden on the empire while ensuring natural selection through competition.
* **Standardization and Flexibility**: With the influx of Zhou immigrants and Qin imperial technology, some herders adopted standardized weapons. This was intended to maintain efficiency in larger-scale warfare, not to impose rigid institutional control.
* **Foster-Care System (“Companions”)**: Orphans and children without guardians were adopted into families as “companions”—contractual foster children. They had no inheritance rights, but shared in wealth, combat power, and honor alongside biological children. Companions were not only labor or military resources but also a guarantee of social dignity and competitive capability.

  * **Dignity and Contract**: Adoption was neither charity nor pity; it integrated the vulnerable quickly into the competition chain, allowing them to earn dignity and honor through effort.
* **Protection of the Weak**: Tribes forbade harming adult men below horseback and all women, and minors and vulnerable groups were protected, ensuring long-term population and social stability.

Through this system, the Huns tightly bound **individual motivation, family initiative, and tribal combat power**. War was not a state burden but a self-organized competitive arena. Victory brought immediate rewards; defeat brought learning and adaptation. Europeans saw only the plunder of gold and silver, but the Huns’ true pursuit was the **cyclical enhancement of technology, artisans, and survival capability**.







## The “No-History Empire” of the Huns

**Rejecting order, chasing only chaos.**
Their empire had no steles, no genealogies,
only poems carried by the wind and the rhythm of hooves.

---

### I. The Strong Rule & the “Merit Succession System”

The Huns had no hereditary rule, only strength.
The child of a strong leader could inherit power, not by bloodline,
but through the **continuation of energy**.

When a tribe’s eagle fell to the ground, the wind did not stop—
the scattered wind would gather in another chest.
Thus, on the steppe, there was no true death,
only the migration of energy.

Their power was like the wind;
their system like the sand;
no fixed city-states, yet an eternal algorithm.

---

### II. Tribal Confederation: Cooperation as Temporary Order

The Huns never had a real “state.”
What they had was an alliance that could dissolve at any moment and yet be reborn.

Every rise of a chanyu was a reboot of the algorithm:
cohesion through victory, maintenance through division of spoils, repair through marriage alliances.

When enemies approached, they converged like a storm;
when peace arrived, they dispersed like morning mist.

Their territory was not on a map,
but in the will of **who could mobilize the most cavalry**.
It was a cloud of fluid order,
able to expand in an instant or vanish just as quickly.

---

### III. Separation is Not Collapse, but Evolution

To the farmer, division is collapse;
on the steppe, division is breathing.

Every tribal split
was a test of the survival algorithm.
The strong took the best warriors; the weak were absorbed, digested, or obliterated.

Thus, the name “Hun”
became a template—
carrying countless tribes, languages, and bloodlines,
while maintaining the same set of survival parameters.

> “Whoever can create order from chaos
> becomes the new Hun.”

---

### IV. Anti-Memory Mechanism: Stability Through Forgetting

They rejected historians, because historians mean control;
they rejected religion, because faith means chains.

They retained only the elders’ long poems,
not as history, but as the chanting of algorithms:
teaching how to migrate, how to reproduce,
how to reorganize the tribe before a blizzard.

Their memory was fluid, biological.
No archives, no relics, yet never truly vanished.

> They preserved themselves through “forgetting.”
> Their extinction was only a temporary data interruption.

---

### V. The Continuation of the “Hu”: From Huns to a Human Mirror

The Han called them “Hu,”
and the character “Hu” never died for a thousand years.

Western Hu, Northern Hu, Mixed Hu—
in the narratives of the Central Plains, it became an eternal shadow.
But that shadow was a mirror:
reflecting a possibility the agrarian civilizations dared not face.

It was humanity in its original form—
fluid, competitive, decentralized, self-organizing.

Its logic:

> High competition → Temporary cooperation → Dynamic diffusion → Cultural blurring.

This was not savage regression,
but natural selection expressed in social structures.

---

### VI. Civilization as Algorithm

No matter how many tribes were eliminated, or how many languages forgotten,
on the steppe, only one name echoed—**Hun**.

> The Huns were not a people, but a codename for a mechanism.
> The Huns were a civilization algorithm:
> able to self-dissolve, yet self-replicate;
> able to reject memory, yet preserve will;
> without a center, yet eternally present.

They were the first humans to refuse encapsulation by history,
and the first civilization to define evolution through action.

Their flag was not color, but wind;
their territory was not land, but speed.

> When the Qin tried to freeze civilization, the Huns let it continue flowing.
> When historians wrote of the “chaotic age,”
> the Huns were already birthing the next order from the chaos.








## The Fear of the Qin Empire

Qin and the Huns were mirrors of each other.
One built the Great Wall of stone; the other claimed the wind as its territory.
One pursued the “eternity of order”; the other worshiped the “renewal of chaos.”

---

### I. The Other Side of the Wall: Sealed Fear

Qin rejected the Huns institutionally and sought to erase them narratively.
The annals record: **“Qin dispatched 170,000 troops to strike the Huns in the north.”**
But the story only speaks of the expedition—never the return.

The truth: the grasslands of Yan and Zhao were entirely abandoned; the northern border left empty.
In the name of “unification,” the Qin Empire was in fact **retreating to the Great Wall line**,
using stone walls to keep the nomadic ghost beyond the shadow of civilization.

> “The Wall was not a defense, but a milestone of self-imprisonment.”

Qin lost the northern pastures—
lost the speed of horses, the fluidity of the steppe, the loose tension of bloodlines.
It chose “enclosed security,”
and in doing so, relinquished the freedom to evolve.

Meanwhile, the imperial army marched south,
into the humid, muddy, pestilent lands of Jiangnan,
slaughtering, enslaving, and suppressing those unwilling to obey central law.
—The illusion of unification rotted in this soil.

---

### II. The Metaphor of Black Armor: Humans Turned Beasts

Qin’s black armor was more than military gear; it was ideology.
Full-body coverage, faceless and nameless,
stripped soldiers of humanity, turning them into **programmable bodies**.

* **Black masks** — obscured humanity, mimicked beasts;
* **Phalanx advance** — relied on orders, not will;
* **Killing mechanism** — tied “enemy death” to survival, producing mechanical loyalty.

It was a “biological machine of order,”
imitating nature while stifling evolution.
Qin’s strength came from extreme collective discipline,
yet that discipline itself eliminated **chance and mutation**.

> The Huns survived through chaos; Qin died through order.

---

### III. The Illusion of “Unification” and System Deadlock

Qin propaganda created humanity’s first illusion of “eternal unity.”
All language, currency, weights, and thought were homogenized;
laws replaced culture, systems replaced bloodlines.

But when all differences were erased, the system deadlocked.

> Evolution requires **difference and competition**;
> when difference is burned away, evolution stops.

Thus, the empire had to continuously manufacture “external threats” to justify its existence:
Huns, Yue, Baiyue, Nanman…
Every conquest was a false update;
every wall, a reinforcement and self-binding of the system.

Defense meant stagnation.
The Great Wall was not a barrier, but the outline of a tomb.

---

### IV. The Logic of Destruction: Slaves and a Fatigued Empire

Qin did not collapse because it was breached,
but because of the **self-consuming nature of slave-based production**.

When every stone, timber, and iron plate
was stacked from unpaid lives,
when labor deaths outpaced replenishment,
order was no longer stability—it was **chronic self-destruction**.

> In the shadow of the Wall,
> millions of slaves died from cold, hunger, and plague,
> their bones becoming part of the defensive line.

The system’s entropy reached its limit:
no command, law, or military order could prevent collapse.
Qin’s fall was not the victory of external enemies,
but the deadlock of an algorithm.

---

The Huns lived forever in chaos,
while the Qin Empire died
because its order was **too successful**.

> On one side of the wall lies civilization; on the other, freedom.
>
> The destruction of the Qin Empire was order’s revenge on itself.








## The Awakening of Systems and the Illusion of Peace

Since human civilization evolved the concept of a “system”—an intangible living entity—
the pace of evolution has never stopped.
Once a system is born, it possesses an independent will to survive—
it uses humans as neurons, institutions as synapses,
fear as electricity, and order as nourishment.

The idea of “eternal peace,”
in the eyes of the system, is equivalent to **betraying evolution**.
Peace means stagnation, and stagnation is death.
Any civilization attempting to maintain constant order
will ultimately be torn apart by the system.

---

## The Huns: A Fluid Survival Algorithm

The Huns were like clouds in the sky—
able to gather in an instant into a dark storm over a city,
and the next moment disperse into a clear expanse of blue.

Their society was not a stable political entity, but a **trial ground for survival**.
Survival of the fittest, competition, and rapid evolution were their norm.
Each rise and fall of a tribe
was the system calibrating and optimizing itself.

The Hun Empire was never a unified whole,
but an **evolutionary model** composed of countless competing units:
each tribe was both independent and a specimen of evolution.
They raided, conquered, and reorganized one another,
and through extremely high mortality and attrition rates,
the most resilient organizational structures emerged.

This is the **biological evolutionary mechanism of a fluid civilization**.
It had no center, no permanence,
but speed and competition replaced order and stability.

---

## The Collapse of Static Empires

When neighboring states dreamed of “eternal rule,”
systemic conflict became inevitable.

For two thousand years after Qin, the Central Plains engaged in futile defense—
defending not just against the Huns, Xianbei, Turks, and Mongols,
but against the **instinct to evolve itself**.

Every centralized empire
tried to freeze history, eliminate competition, and create “peace.”
But the system countered these attempts,
because they were equivalent to **self-deletion**.

---

## The Humiliation of the Han: Defense as Chronic Death

Qin’s fall was only the first act of system self-destruction,
while Han experienced a prolonged decline.

During its two centuries of confrontation with the Huns,
death rates remained extraordinarily high.
When Wang Mang usurped the throne and established the “Xin Dynasty,”
male mortality peaked—**eighty percent of men disappeared**.
The northern plains became like harvested fields, rivers of blood flowing.

Even so, the Ningxia region fell,
and west of the Taihang Mountains, control was lost.
When the Xin Dynasty collapsed after just fifteen years,
the rebuilt Han was no longer the original Han—
it retreated east of the Taihang, barely surviving,
delaying collapse in the form of a “defensive civilization.”

---

## Eternal Peace: Paradise for Rulers, Hell for the Ruled

When a people crave permanent peace,
they must establish **rigid hierarchies**.
Peace is never equality for all beings;
it is the ruler ensuring their own interests remain undisturbed.

In such a system,
peace becomes **perpetual mobilization and deprivation for the lower strata**.
The Huns maintained vitality through war,
the Han maintained decay through order.
One regenerates through fire,
the other suffocates in defense.

> Eternal peace is, by nature, paradise for the rulers,
> and hell for the ruled.






Putting religion aside, even if there really is a Creator, her act of creating humanity was not for them to kneel in worship.
What use would a world have to her if it lacked the spirit of adventure, if it no longer evolved?

The rise of Protestantism was precisely that silent rebellion.
It severed the chains between church and believer, forcing each individual to face God’s silence alone.
Prayer became reflection; faith became experimentation.
The founding of America was merely a geographic extension of this rebellion—
a civilization built on the creed of “re-creation,”
replicating creation through colonization, mimicking miracles through science.

They no longer waited for divine revelation;
they recreated, with their own hands, the first burst of light.

In the end, whether you are within the borders of politics or the halls of faith,
you always arrive at the same conclusion—
**meaning never exists; it can only be created.**

Reason calls it the “impulse of thought,”
religion calls it “God’s will,”
but in essence, it is nothing more than the force that drives life to keep exploring.

Thus, the “apocalypse” is not punishment, but a reminder—
do not forget: you were created not to worship, but to think;
not to obey, but to ignite light once more amidst the void.







The Essence of Protestantism: Direct Connection Between the Individual and God

The Protestant Reformation stripped away the church as a mediator; in essence, it was a **decentralization of spiritual authority**.
Believers no longer relied on clergy—they read the Bible directly, prayed directly, and contemplated God’s will directly.
This implies:

* Humans are forced to face “God’s silence” independently;
* Each person must interpret the “meaning of existence” for themselves;
* The religious “community” fragments into countless solitary souls.

In other words, **Protestantism returns the responsibility of thought to the individual**.
From that moment, religion ceased to be a refuge from thinking and became the starting point of thinking.

The founding spirit of America (especially the Puritan tradition) is an extension of this direct dialogue.
It is a culture that transforms “God’s trial” into a **historical experiment**:

* “We suffer because God is testing us”;
* “We explore to fulfill God’s creative will”;
* “We build nations by reenacting acts of creation.”

At its core, America secularized the essence of religious faith into a **rational spirit of adventure**.
This spirit became the psychological engine behind capitalism, the Scientific Revolution, and space exploration.
Thus, Protestantism and Enlightenment rationality merged in a peculiar way in America:

> “To think is itself a form of prayer.”

The statement “whether rational or religious, it ultimately converges to one result” reveals a deeper truth:

> Rationality and faith converge at the extremes.

Within a rational framework:

* Humans must interpret the cycles of suffering and void;
* The impulse to seek meaning is endless;
* Ultimately, one can only appeal to a “creative impulse beyond logic.”

Within a religious framework:

* Humans interpret this creative impulse as “God’s will”;
* Rational dilemmas are reframed as divine trials;
* Yet the structure of the problem itself remains unchanged.

Therefore, religion is simply a poetic expression of rationality, while rationality is a deconstructive rewriting of religion.
Both essentially ask: “Why exist? Why not nothing?”
And the final answer always returns to the same point:

> “Because creation itself is meaning.”

From this, we derive a transcendent unifying proposition:

* If a Creator exists, her purpose in creating humans is to let thought continue to create;
* If no Creator exists, the ongoing creative activity of thought itself becomes a substitute “God”;
* In either framework, the outcome is the same:
  **“Thinking and creating are the only legitimate grounds for existence.”**

> Protestantism removes intermediaries, compelling humans to rebuild the universe within their own minds.
> Both reason and faith force humanity to confront the same question:
> —If meaning does not exist, go and create it.
>
> Thus, the true image of God is not that of a judge, but the force that drives you to continue thinking.








Whenever a nation is invaded, its people cry out the same self-pitying plea—

> “We were living peacefully here. Why are you attacking us?”

But the truth has never been so simple.
Before every invasion, there is always a long season of testing.
Time and again, the strong come knocking, asking if you are still evolving—
and each time, you refuse the call to adventure, choosing instead to “live peacefully.”

When a civilization holds vast resources yet refuses to change or explore,
it is not merely offending its enemies—
it is **insulting the Creator herself.**

For in the law of creation, **stagnation is sin.**

Those who cry, “We did nothing wrong,”
are merely defending their own inertia.
They mistake peace for grace,
forgetting that the precondition of grace is **evolution.**

Thus, invasion is not simply an act of violence—
it is the system’s correction of its own stagnation,
the universe’s way of reminding every complacent civilization:

> “Is civilization nothing more than eating, drinking, and amusement?
> If your answer is ‘yes,’
> then you are already dead—only your body has yet to fall.”







**<The Wind Beyond the Great Wall>**

The era of the Hunnic Empire was the epoch of fission across the Eurasian continent.

The Parthians were driven into the Iranian plateau.
The Scythians were plundered into extinction.
The Eastern Roman Empire bled out its artisans amid cities set ablaze.

Their swordsmiths, sculptors, stonemasons, and engineers of crossbows—
all were swept up in an invisible conscription,
driven into the Junggar Basin.
There, they forged armor for the Hunnic,
tested siege engines,
and fused together the fears and technologies of every empire in Eurasia
into the skeleton of a **composite war machine.**

In this storm without a center,
the Great Wall fell, Ningxia fell,
the Taihang Mountains fell, the Yellow River fell,
the Huai River fell, and at last—the Yangtze fell.

Each fall was not the collapse of a border,
but the **breath of a system evolving itself.**

When that wind finally crossed into Jiangnan,
a new “Eastern Turkic Empire” rose from the ruins—
posterity would call it **Sui.**

It was not a continuation of the Hunnic,
but the **rebirth of the Hunnic algorithm:**
not a lineage of blood, but of logic—
**to reorganize in chaos, and to be reborn in collapse.**



The Chronicles of Blackwater · Born of the Grey Wolf  [See: ElyaMarin-KhoniChin, Born of the Grey Wolf]

The Chronicles of Blackwater · The Battle of Fractures  [See: ElyaMarin-KhoniChin, The Battle of Fractures]
